1
CHAPTER XXII.
I have nursed him at this withered breast, said the old
woman, folding her hands on her bosom as if pressing an infant
to it; and man can never ken what woman feels for the bairn
that she has first held to her bosom.
Scott
.
Poor Arthur
! B had predicted too truly that
his heart would have some hankerings at the thought
of leaving the house where he had, of late, spent so
many pleasant hours. It is so long that I have said
nothing about him, that the reader may think him
forgotten, or may, himself, have forgotten that there
was such a person. He had, in truth, no part in the
transactions of which we have been speaking. He
was at that time of life when the mind, chameleon
like, takes its hue from surrounding objects. He
was too young to be advised with, or trusted with
important secrets. I have already mentioned that,
on the day of the election, he had been detained at
home by indisposition. But he had heard of the
occurrences
of that day; and he was, moreover,
unconsciously
exposed to influences from every member of
the family, all tending to the same point. Least
apparent
,
but not least efficacious, was that of his cousin
Lucia. They were of that age when hearts, soft
and warm, grow together by mere contact. With
thought of love, but without thinking of it, they had
become deeply enamored of each other. The thing
came about so simply and so naturally, that the result
alone needs to be told.
They were now to part, and the thought of parting
first made them both feel that something was the
matter. They talked of the separation, and Lucia
shed some tears. Arthur kissed them off, and then
she smiled; and then she wept again; and then they
agreed never to forget each other; and so on, till the
secret was out, and their innocent hearts were fondly
plighted.
Such things do not pass unmarked by older eyes.
The maternal instinct of Mrs. Trevor, and the sagacity
of her husband, had detected that of which the
parties
themselves were unconscious. And now, in the
few hours that they were to remain together, occupied
as the old people were with important engagements,
neither the glowing cheek, the swimming eye, and
the abstracted look of Lucia, nor the rapt
enthusiasm
of Arthur's countenance, escaped observation.
But as no disclosure was made of what had passed,
their fancied privacy was not invaded by question or
insinuation. They were too young to marry, and secret
love is so sweet! Why not let the innocent creatures
enjoy the idea that their attachment was not
suspected
?
Their friends smiled indeed, but tenderly, not
significantly. To them, they did but seem kinder
than ever; and that, at a moment when they were
most sensible to kindness, and most ready to
reciprocate
it. In this heart-searching sympathy, Arthur
found himself indissolubly united to the destiny, the
opinions, and the feelings, whatever these might be,
of those who so loved his dear Lucia.
But I am not writing a love tale. I am but
interested
that the reader should understand by what
process two principal actors in the scenes of which
I am about to speak, were diverted from a zealous
devotion to the authority of the United States, in
which they had been educated, to a devotion yet
more enthusiastic in the cause of Virginia. Enough
of them has been seen to show that I must be
anxious to vindicate them from any charge of
inconsistency
.
I trust the reader enters into this feeling,
and deems them worthy of it. If he requires any
farther account of the causes which wrought so great
a change, I have none to give. It was through their
eyes and hearts that conviction entered. Outrage to
the laws; outrage to the freedom of election;
outrage
to one respected and beloved; left nothing for
reason to do. Doubtless much had been said to them
by their uncle and Mr. B, in explanation of the
great principles of the American Union, which had
been trampled on by the Federal Government. But
I am not aware that any ideas were presented to their
minds on this subject, with which the reading public
had not been familiar for twenty years before, and I
shall not repeat them here. Let us rather
accompany
Douglas to Mr. Trevor's magazine of arms. It
was in a garret room, where he found Mr. B busy
in the examination of arms, and portioning out
ammunition
,
with the aid of Jack.
You come in good time, said B. Here is
work that you understand. Come help me examine
these arms, and see that they are all clean, dry, and
well flinted.
What do you propose to do with them? asked
Douglas, lending a hand to the work.
We propose, said B, to arm the negroes in
defence of their master, in case of need.
But what need can there be, if we set out for
Carolina in the morning?
They may be wanted before morning, said
B, coolly. Lieutenant Johnson left the county
on the night of the election, and travelled express to
Washington. His intelligence was anticipated, and,
no doubt, the warrants were all ready before he got
there. I dare say they had a ready-made affidavit
for him to swear to. This plot was got up so
suddenly
,
that I was hardly advised of it in time. But
I hope it is not too late. I have no mind to fire the
train too soon. I would rather you should get off
1
peaceably, but, if we do come to blows, I shall take
care that the blue-coats have the worst of it.
You move in this business, said Douglas,
like a man not unused to danger. I presume you
have taken the precaution to warn in the hardy and
resolute neighbors, whom I saw stand by my uncle
the other day.
By no means, answered B. Were we so
minded, we could command a force that would
demolish
any that will be sent against us. But it is
not desirable to show the strength of our hand. I
should be glad, if possible, that the temper of the
people were unsuspected. At the same time, there
is an exhibition to be made, which will have a good
effect on friend and foe,I mean an exhibition of
the staunch loyalty and heart-felt devotion of the
slave to his master. We must show that that which
our enemies, and some even of ourselves, consider as
our weakness, is, in truth, our strength.
Is such your own clear opinion? asked
Douglas
.
I have lived so long in the North, that I have
imbibed too many of the ideas that prevail there.
But, on this point, it appears to me that they must be
right.
You have not lived there long enough, said
B, to forget your earliest and strongest
attachments
.
You had a black nurse, I presume. Do
you love her?
My mammy! exclaimed Douglas; to be
sure I do. I should be the most ungrateful
creature
on earth, if I did not love one who loves me like
a mother.
And your foster-brother? asked B; and
his brothers and sisters? Do not they, too, love him
their mother loves so fondly?
I have no doubt they do, especially as I have
always been kind to them.
From these, then, I presume, you would fear
nothing. Then your brothers and sisters. They,
too, have their mammies and foster-brethren. Among
you, you must have a strong hold on the hearts of
many of your father's slaves. Would they, think
you, taken as a body, rise against your family?
I have not the least apprehension that they
would, replied Douglas.
Yet they, thus considered, are one integral part
of the great black family, which, in all its branches,
is united by similar ligaments to the great white
family
.
You have the benefit of the parental feeling
of the old who nursed your infancy, and watched
your growth. You have the equal friendship of
those with whom you ran races, and played at
bandy, and wrestled in your boyhood. If sometimes
a dry blow passed between you, they love you none
the less for that; because, unless you were
differently
trained from what is common among our boys,
you were taught not to claim any privilege, in a
fight, over those whom you treated as equals in play.
Then you have the grateful and admiring affection
of the little urchin whose head you patted when you
came home, making him proud by asking his name,
and his mammy's name, and his daddy's name.
These are the filaments which the heart puts out to
lay hold on what it clings to. Great interests, like
large branches, are too stiff to twine. These are the
fibres from which the ties that bind man to man are
spun. The finer the staple, the stronger the cord. You
will probably see its strength exemplified before
morning. There are twenty true hearts which will
shed their last drop, before one hair of your uncle's
head shall fall.
You present the matter in a new light, said
Douglas. I wish our northern brethren could be
made to take the same view of it.
Our northern
brethren
, as you call them, said
B, never can take this view of it. They have
not the qualities which would enable them to
comprehend
the negro character. Their calculating
selfishness can never understand his disinterested
devotion. Their artificial benevolence is no
interpreter
of the affections of the unsophisticated heart.
They think our friend Jack here to be even such as
themselves, and cannot therefore conceive that he is
not ready to cut his master's throat, if there is any
thing to be got by it. They know no more of the
feelings of our slaves, than their fathers could
comprehend
of the loyalty of the gallant cavaliers from
whom we spring; and for the same reason. The
generous and self-renouncing must ever be a riddle
to the selfish. The only instance in which they have
ever seemed to understand us, has been in the
estimate
they have made of our attachment to a Union,
the benefits of which have all been theirs, the
burthens
ours. Reverse the case, and they would have
dissolved the partnership thirty years ago. But they
have presumed upon the difference between us, and
heaped oppression on oppression, until we can bear
no more. But, when we throw off the yoke, they
will still not understand us. They will impute to us
none but selfish motives, and take no note of the
scorn and loathing which their base abuse of our
better feelings has awakened. Would they but
forbear
so much as not to force us to hate and despise
them, they might still use us as their hewers of wood
and drawers of water. But he who gives all where
he loves, will give nothing where he detests. But
this, too, is a riddle to them.
I must own, said Douglas, that these ideas
are new to me, too.
Not the ideas, but the application of them.
Three months ago, you were the devoted soldier of
Martin Van Buren. Had you then believed him
capable of a conspiracy so base as that which has
been plotted against your honor and life, could you
still have served him?
I should still have wished to serve my country,
replied Douglas; but I should, probably, have
doubted whether I could have served her in serving
him.
And do you think you would view the matter
differently, had another been the intended victim,
and not yourself?
I trust not. My personal concern in the affair,
I think, has done no more than to emancipate me
from my thraldom. But the display of his character
is what makes me detest him; and the scenes of the
election day have opened my eyes to the wrongs,
and the rights, and the interests of Virginia. The
scales have now fallen from them, and I am
impatient
for the day when I may apply in her service the
lessons learned in the school of her oppressors.
You shall have your wish, said B. The
flint you are now fitting may yet be snapped against
the myrmidons of the usurper.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Osric
....
How is it, Laertes?
Laertes
....
Why as a woodcock to my own spring, Osric.
Shakspeare
.
While
this conversation was going on, the arms
had been all examined, loaded, and ranged against
the wall, and due portions of powder and ball
allotted
to each firelock. Their work being nearly
completed
,
Douglas was dispatched with some message
to his uncle. As he descended the stairs, he heard,
not without a smile, the quick impatient step of
Arthur
,
pacing to and fro, the length of a passage
leading
from the front door through the building.
Arthur
was just turning at the end next to the door,
when a rap on the knocker arrested him. The door
was instantly opened, and he was heard to ask some
one to walk in. It was night, and the passage was
dark. Arthur conducted the stranger to the door of
his uncle's study, which was his common reception
room, ushered him in, drew back, and having closed
the door behind him, resumed his musing
promenade
.
Douglas went on, suspecting nothing. He was
not aware that the servants had been cautioned
against admitting strangers; and poor Arthur was
not
au fait
to what was passing. He entered the
room. His uncle had risen from his chair in the
corner farthest from the door, and was standing
behind
a large table, at which he usually wrote. He
heard him say: Please to be seated, sir, in a
voice between compliment and command, and with
a countenance in which courtesy and fierceness were
strangely blended. As the stranger, not regarding
this stern invitation, continued to advance, the glare
of the old man's eye became fearful, and he laid his
hand on a pistol which lay on the table before him.
Stand back, sir, said he, in a low and resolute
tone. Stand back, on your life.
The stranger wore a long surtout, in which
Douglas
,
dazzled by coming into the light, did not at first
discover the usual characteristics of an officer's
undress
.
It was thrown open in front, and the badges
of his rank were displayed to Mr. Trevor, who stood
before him. He was arrested by Mr. Trevor's
startling
words and gesture, and was beginning to
speak, when Douglas exclaimed: What does this
mean?
The stranger turned, extended both his arms, and
Douglas rushed into them.
My dear Trevor! My dear Whiting! were
the mutual exclamations of two young men, who had
long been to each other as brothers.
To what on earth, asked Douglas, do I owe
this pleasure?
I come, said the other, with a melancholy
smile, and in the kindest tone, while he still held
the hand of Douglas, to make you prisoner.
Douglas started violently, and tried to disengage
his hand; but the other held him firmly and went
on: Be calm, my dear fellow. I am your friend
as ever, but yet I do not jest. You are my
prisoner
,
on the absurd charge of high treason against
the United States. My warrant is against you and
your uncle. As it was thought a military force
might be wanted to support the arrest, I volunteered
myself to receive a deputation from the marshal,
that I might shield you both from any indignity.
You, on your part, I am sure, will do nothing to
make my task more painful than it is. Is not that
gentlemanbless me! where is he? Was not
that Mr. Bernard Trevor who just left the room?
I
am
Mr. Bernard Trevor, said a voice
behind
.
Whiting turned again, and saw Mr. Trevor
standing where he had been before. He now
observed
that there was a door beside him, at which
he had stepped out and returned. I am Mr.
Bernard
Trevor, sir, and am sorry that I cannot welcome,
as I would, the friend of my nephew. You see that
I have no mind to leave the room, and I therefore
2
hope you will content yourself to accept my
invitation
to be seated. You say that you wish to shield
me from indignity. Of course, you will not
unnecessarily
offer what I shall feel as such. The
hand
of authority must not be laid on
me
.
I shall gladly dispense with an unpleasant form,
sir, said Whiting, and I trust I shall have the
satisfaction of convincing you that my errand,
though painful to all of us, is an errand of
friendship
.
I have no doubt of it, sir. I have heard of you
from my nephew, and from under your own hand, in
terms that give full assurance of that. I shall be
happy, therefore, to do by you all the duties of
hospitality
.
I merely ask of you to give your word of
honor, that, while charged with your present
functions
,
you will be careful not to touch my person.
I should be most happy, said the young man,
to take by the hand one whom I so highly respect,
but I find I must forego that pleasure; and I give
the required pledge most cheerfully.
The courteous old gentleman now summoned
Tom, and ordered some refreshment for his guest;
then throwing into his manner all the frank courtesy
of a polished Virginian, he led the way in a desultory
conversation on all sorts of indifferent subjects. Half
an hour passed in this way, when Tom appeared and
summoned the gentlemen to supper.
I fear, said Whiting, I am abusing my
authority
over my poor fellows without. I have a
sergeant
and half a dozen men waiting at the gate,
on whose behalf I would fain invoke your
hospitality
.
But it would be much more agreeable to me,
if you and my friend Douglas will pass your words
that their aid shall not be necessary, and permit me
to order them back to the next public house.
I am sorry to say, replied Mr. Trevor, that
I cannot do either; but I pray you to postpone the
discussion until after supper.
How, sir? exclaimed Whiting. You surely
do mean to try to escape me.
Nothing is farther from my thoughts, sir, said
the old man, with a proud smile, than to try to
escape
you, or permit you to escape me.
To escape you
, sir! What do you mean? asked
Whiting.
I mean not to wound your ear with a word I
would not have endured to have applied to myself.
I will not say that you are
my
prisoner; but I will say
that
we
will leave this house as free as you entered
it. Come, my dear sir, while I endeavor to requite
your courtesy, permit me also to appropriate your
words, and say, as you said to Douglas, that I trust
you will not render it necessary to avail ourselves of
our superior force.
I am not sure you possess that superiority, said
Whiting; I have a strong guard without.
But they
are
without, and you are within.
Besides
,
you will be readily excused from availing
yourself
of them, when it is known that they are
prisoners
,
in close custody.
Prisoners! exclaimed Whiting. To whom?
To my negroes, said Mr. Trevor.
Regular soldiers prisoners to negroes! said
Whiting, in amazement. It is not credible; and
you manifestly speak by conjecture, as you have had
no means of communicating with your friends
without
.
I am not in the habit, young gentleman, said
Mr. Trevor, in a tone of grave rebuke, of
speaking
positively, when I speak by conjecture. My
orders were, that I should not be called to supper
until they were secured. As to the strangeness of
the affair, continued he, resuming his cheerful and
good-humored smile, think nothing of that.
Remember
that night is what the negroes call `their time
of day.' The eagle is no match for the owl in the
dark. The thing is as I tell you; so make yourself
easy, and let me have the pleasure of doing the duties
of hospitality by my nephew's friend. You shall not
be unnecessarily detained. We must ask the pleasure
of your company for a three hours' ride across the
line in the morning. I will there give you a clear
acquittance against all the responsibility you may
have incurred, for what you have done, or left
undone
;
and, as soon as you return, to restrain your men
from acts of license, they shall be given up to you.
There was no remonstrating against this
arrangement
;
and Lieutenant Whiting, putting the best face
he could on the matter, permitted himself to be
conducted
to supper.
At the head of the supper table stood, as usual,
Mrs. Trevor. She seemed some six inches higher
than common, her cheek flushed, her nostril spread,
her eye beaming; yet with all her high feelings
subdued
to the duties of hospitality and courtesy. She
met and returned the salutation of Whiting with the
stately grace of a high-bred lady, and then her eye
glanced to her husband with a look of irrepressible
pride. His glance answered it, and, as they stood
for a moment facing each other at the opposite ends
of the table, Whiting felt a sense of admiring awe,
such as the presence of majesty in full court had
never inspired. But this feeling, in a moment,
passed
away, with its cause. The urbanity of the
gentleman
and the suavity of the lady soon removed all
the painfulness of constraint, and the evening
passed
as it should pass between persons who in heart
were friends.
Neither Mr. B nor Arthur made their
appearance
.
The girls, indeed, were present. The air
and manner of Delia reflected those of her mother.
Virginia looked a little alarmed, and Lucia blushing,
tender, and abstracted. The interest of the realities
2
that surrounded her could not quite dispel the visions
of excited fancy.
With these exceptions, which a stranger would not
observe, every thing passed as in the company of an
invited and cherished guest, and Whiting could not
be sorry, at heart, that he had been baffled in his
attempt to disturb so sweet a domestic party. The
evening wore away not unpleasantly, and he retired
to rest in the same room with Douglas, to guard him,
or be guarded by him, according as it suited his
fancy to consider himself or his friend as the other's
prisoner.
A word of explanation is due on the subject of
the captive guard, which will be given in the next
chapter.
CHAPTER XXIV.
Massa mighty cunningwatch he nigger like a hawk;
But nigger like a owlhe watch massa in e dark.
Jim Crow
.
The
first words which passed between Mr. Trevor
and Lieutenant Whiting, had been overheard by Tom,
who was in the act of leaving the room at the
moment
.
He gave the alarm to his mistress, who,
hastening to her husband, met him at the door, and
just received from him the instructions already
mentioned
.
She immediately sent for Mr. B, who, with
Jack's aid, was in the act of distributing arms and
ammunition
to the negroes. To him the management of
the whole affair was committed. No doubt was
entertained
that Lieutenant Whiting had not come
unattended
.
The first thing to be done was to ascertain
the force by which he was supported, and the place
where he had posted his men.
They, meantime, quietly awaited the return of
their officer at the great gate, a quarter of a mile
from the house. Rather as a point of military
etiquette than from an idea that any precaution was
necessary, they had stacked their arms in form before
the gate, and stationed a sentinel, who, with head
erect and military step, walked his post in front of
them. They had not long been there, before they
heard a negro's voice, who, as he approached from
the house, sung merrily a song, of which only the
following lines could be distinguished:
Peep froo de winder; see break o' day;
Run down to riber; canoe gone away.
Put foot in water; water mighty cold;
Hear O'sur call me; hear Missis scold.
O dear! my dear! what shall I do?
My Massa whip me, cause I love you.
The song ceased, and cuffee advanced in silence,
but with a heavy swinging step, that rung audibly
on the hard ground. As soon as his dusky figure
began to be distinguishable, which was not until he
was quite near, he was arrested by the sharp
challenge
of the sentry.
High! exclaimed the negro, in a tone of
amazement and alarm: Law-Gorramighty! what
dis?
Advance! said the sentinel, mechanically,
and give the countersign.
What dat, Massa? I never see sich a ting in my
life.
Advance! repeated the sentry, bringing his
piece down with a rattling sound against his right
side.
The metal glimmered in the light from the
windows
.
The negro caught the gleam, and, falling flat
on his face, roared lustily for mercy.
The Sergeant now went to him, raised him up,
calmed his fears, and, as soon as he could be made to
understand any thing, asked if Lieutenant Whiting
was at the house.
I hear 'em say, sir, one mighty grand gentleman
went there while ago. Old Tom say, he Mass
Douglas'
old crony, and Massa and Mass Douglas, and all,
mighty glad to see him.
The devil they are! said the Sergeant. Well,
I hope they'll be mighty glad to see us, too. I do not
care how soon, for this night air is something of the
sharpest; and I have drawn better rations than we
had at that damned tavern. I say, darkee; the old
man keeps good liquor, and plenty of belly-timber,
don't he?
Ah, Lord! Yes, Massa, I reckon he does. But
it an't much I knows about it. Old Massa mighty
hard man, sir. Poor negur don't see much o' he
good ting.
But, I suppose, he gives his friends a plenty?
Oh, to be sure, sir! Massa mighty proud. Great
gentleman come see him, he an't got nothing too
good for
him
. But poor white folks and poor negur!
pshaw!
A bad look out for us, Rogers, said the
Sergeant
to one of his men. Damn the old hunks, I
hope he don't mean to leave us to bivouack here all
night. Well, we must wait our hour, as the
Lieutenant
told us, and then he'll come back to us, or we
have to march to the house. Damn it! I shall be
pretty sharp-set by that time, and, if it comes to that,
the old gentleman's kitchen and wine-cellar may look
out for a storm.
You talk like you hungry, Massa, said the
negro, in a tone of sympathy. I mighty sorry I an't
got nothing to give you.
But could not you
get
something, cuffee? Is
there no key to your master's cellar and smoke-house
besides the one he keeps? Don't you think, now,
you could get us some of his old apple-brandy? I
hear he has it of all ages.
Ah, Lord, Massa; dat you may be sure of. I
hear old Tom say brandy dare older an he; and he
most a hundred. 'Spose I bring you some o' dat,
Massa, what you gwine give me?
Will a quarter do for a bottle of it?
Law, Massa! why he same like gold.
Half
a
dolla, Massa!
Well, bring us a bottle of the
right old
stuff,
mind!and you shall have half a dollar. And see,
darkee; cannot you bring us a little cold bread and
meat?
I don't know, Massa, what de cook say. I try
her.
Well, go; and, while your hand is in, help
yourself well. If the liquor is good, may be we'll
take two or three bottles.
Well, Massa, I try old Tom. He keep de key.
Ah, Lord! Old Massa tink Tom mighty desperate
honest; and he tink Tom love him sobetter an
he own self. He better mind; one o' dese days
Tom show him how dat is.
I don't think you love him much yourself,
Sambo
.
Who?I, Massa? My name Jack, sir. Lord,
no sir! What I love him for? Hard work and
little
bread, and no meat? No, Massa, I love soldier;
cause I hear 'em say soldier come after a while, set
poor nigur free.
That is true enough. I hope it will not be long
before we set you all free from these damned
man-stealers
.
How would you like to go with us?
Lord, Massa, you joking. Go wid you? I reckon
the old man find it right hard to get somebody to
saddle his horse if all our folks was here.
Well, cuffee, the old man's in hockley by this
time; and when we march him off in the morning,
you will have nobody to stop you. But bring us the
brandy, and then we'll talk about it.
Ees, Massa! tank ye, Massa! But, Massa, I got
two boys big as me, and my brother, and my wife,
and all; I don't want to leave them. And, Massa,
my boys got some apples. You want some, sir?
To be sure I do. Bring them along; but mind
and bring the brandy, at all events.
The negro disappeared, and the soldiers occupied
themselves in discussing the means of making a
profitable
speculation on their disposition to leave their
master. They were still on this topic when they
heard Jack returning, with several more. One
brought a chunk of fire; another a basket of apples;
another one of eggs; a fourth came provided with
some cold provisions; Jack himself brandished a
couple of bottles of brandy; and one of his boys
brought a pint of water and a tin cup. The liquor
was tasted, approved, paid for, and eagerly
swallowed
.
A torch of light-wood being kindled, a
chaffering commenced, interrupted by occasional
allusions
to the interesting subjects of slavery, hard
masters, and emancipation. The brandy, however,
chiefly engaged the attention of the soldiers. The
sentry, whose duty was but formal, was permitted to
join, as the guns were but a few feet off, just without
the gate, which stood open. The light of the torch
glittered strongly on the arms, and seemed to make
all things distinct, while in fact its unsteady
flickering
did little more than dazzle their eyes. The
negro held it aloft, and, as if to brighten the flame,
occasionally waved it to and fro. Suddenly it
dropped
from his hand into the pail of water, and in an
instant the blackness of impenetrable darkness
shrouded every eye.
At the same moment, a heavy trampling, as from a
rush of many feet, was heard without the gate, and a
shivering clash from the stack of arms, as if it had
fallen down. The soldiers groped their way towards
it, feeling where they supposed it to be. They felt
in vain. They winked hard, as if to free their eyes
from the blinding impression left by the flaring
light, then opened them, and looked about. Judge
their astonishment, when, as they begun to recover
their sight, they found themselves surrounded by a
dusky ring, from which issued a voice, not unlike
that of their friend Jack, which informed them, in
good English, that they were prisoners. The prick
of a bayonet on one or two who endeavored to pass
through the circle, convinced them that such was
the fact; and, after a short parley, they permitted
themselves to be marched off, and safely stowed
away in a strong out-house.
I would not have the reader give the negroes the
credit of this stratagem. It had been devised by
B, who knew that he could depend on the address
and quick wit of Jack for drawing the soldiers into
the snare. All that part of the business had been
left to his own discretion. As soon as he had
secured
the amicable reception of himself and a few
others, the rest, dividing into two parties, left the
house, and, crossing the fence at some distance from
the gate, and on each side of it, advanced stealthily
toward it. Here they met, and having arranged
themselves for a sudden rush on the stack of arms,
an agreed signal was given by a negro who
possessed
a faculty of mimicking the voices of all
animals
.
3
As soon as the light was extinguished, the
necessary number rushed forward to the object on
which their eyes had been fixed; seized the arms,
and, falling back, ranged themselves in a half circle
outside of the gate. Those who had been with the
soldiers, and who all wore concealed arms, closed
in behind them, and completely hemmed them in.
B, in the mean time, who had his reasons for not
wishing to be seen, kept aloof; and, as soon as he
knew that the soldiers were secured, returned to the
house. There, too, he took care not to show
himself
;
and Arthur was advised that he should not, by
making his appearance, at all involve himself in
what had been done.
CHAPTER XXV.
And even there, his eye being big with tears,
Turning his face, he put his hand behind him,
And, with affection wondrous sensible,
He wrung Bassanio's hand, and so they parted.
Shakspeare
.
At
day light, all was in motion. Arthur and
Virginia
,
being affectionately dismissed by their friends,
were first upon the road, before Lieutenant Whiting
was awake. Much of the night had been spent in
preparations, and long before sunrise Douglas handed
his aunt and cousins into their carriage. His uncle
mounted the barouche, with Jack for driver, by whose
side old Tom was placed; while the lady's maid
took her seat by her single-minded master, with a
freedom from which an amalgamationist would have
drawn the most pleasing inferences. No other white
person was seen; but a body guard of twenty negroes,
well armed, and mounted on plough horses, some
saddled, some cushioned, and some bare-backed,
surrounded the carriages and baggage-wagon. In
the midst rode Douglas and his friend on
horseback
.
You see, said Mr. Trevor to Whiting, as he
took his place in the barouche, that the part these
faithful creatures took in last night's work, drives
them into exile as well as me. I must not leave
them behind to be the victims of baffled malice.
What is to become of my plantation, is a question
of less importance. I suppose I may say with
Cincinnatus
,
when honor was forced on him as it is on
me, my fields must go untilled this year! You see
here, sir, my whole male force. Not one proved
recreant.
This affair is altogether unaccountable to me,
said Whiting to Douglas, as they moved off
together
;
and this the strangest feature of the whole.
Do men, then, act without motives; and against all
assignable motives?
I asked the same question myself last night,
said Douglas, and was referred to coming events
for the answer. I was partly taught, at the same
time, to account for what I was told to expect.
And how can it be accounted for?
I cannot say I have my lesson perfect; but
something was said about the difference of character
produced by peculiar training, and habitudes of mind
formed by circumstances. For my part, it appears
to me that there must be something, by nature, in
the moral constitution of the negro, intrinsically
different
from the white man.
It would, indeed, seem so, said Whiting, if
we are to credit what we see. But, in that case, we
must reject the authority which tells us that all are of
one race.
So are all dogs, said Douglas; and dogs can
no more act without motive than man. It depends
on temper and character what shall be motives of
action. The wolf would be sadly puzzled to judge
of the motives of the Newfoundland dog. May not
circumstances, which have made the difference
between
them, have produced the much less difference
between the white man and the negro? I have no
measure for the effect of such causes. If I am put
to choose between rejecting the evidence of my own
senses, or the evidence of God's word, or the
philosophy
which teaches that man is to be considered as
a unit, because all of one race, philosophy must go
by the board. It may be, that what is best for me, is
best for my friend Jack there, and
vice versa;
but as
long as neither of us thinks so, why not leave each
to his choice? Besides, there is more room in the
world for both of us, than if both always wanted the
same things.
A ride of a few hours carried the party across the
line into North Carolina. Here they stopped at the
first public house; and Mr. Trevor drew up a hasty
statement of the events of the night, which
should
have the effect of acquitting Lieutenant Whiting of
all blame, on account of his own escape from the
fangs of his enemies. In this he set forth that,
3
having been warned of the intended prosecution, he
had made his preparations accordingly, and that the
officer had but fallen into a snare from which no
vigilance could have saved him. This he signed,
and gave, moreover, a clear acquittance to Lieutenant
Whiting for all he had done; and having thus placed
him, as far as depended on himself,
rectus in curia
,
he announced to him that he was now at liberty to
go whither he would.
And now, sir, said he, as the spell which
would have made your touch degrading is broken
by the State line, let me have the pleasure of taking
you by the hand, not only as my nephew's friend,
but as one who, in the extremes of victory and
defeat
,
as captor and as prisoner, has borne himself as
became a gentleman.
Saying this, he extended his hand, which
Whiting
grasped with fervor, and they parted as friends
cordial and sincere.
Douglas accompanied his friend a short distance
on his return, the latter walking, and leading his
horse. They conversed of the past and the future.
I have been a volunteer in this business, said
Whiting. I shall not disguise that my friendship
for you led me to offer my services, and I fear that
no excuse will be received for my failure. There is
a spirit somewhere at work, to which I will give no
name, that will be implacable at the thought that any
advantage may have been lost by my respect for your
feelings.
I am afraid it may prove so, replied Douglas.
The consequence may be fatal to your
advancement
in the army, and perhaps you may be driven
from it, as I have been. Should it be so, my dear
Whitingbut I will not profit so little by the
example
of delicacy set me while I wore the epaulette,
as to say any thing to you now. I would content
myself with telling you where I shall be found, if I
myself knew. But shall I keep you advised of my
movements?
By all means, said Whiting. I shall
always
wish to know your fate, whether good or ill.
I know that, replied Douglas. But that is
not my meaning. Shall I let you know where to
find me, in case circumstances should lead you to
share my fate?
Don't ask me that, Trevor. The question
implies
ideas which I must not entertain. But should
such a time as you suppose ever arrive, I shall know
where to find you, should my opinions make it right
to seek you.
Then, God bless you, Whiting! That we
shall meet again is sure. That we shall stand
shoulder to shoulder in the strife of battle, as, in our
day dreams, we have so often thought of doing, I
cannot doubt.
And thus parted these gallant and generous
youths; the one into exile from the country that he
loved, the other to return to the service of an
unthankful
master.
A farther ride of a few miles brought our party to
the village, in which Mr. Trevor wished to take up
his temporary residence. Here they found Mr. B,
who had been engaged in investigating the comforts
and capabilities of the different public houses, and
having fixed on that he liked best, met Mr.
Trevor
in the street, and conducted the party to it.
The two friends soon drew apart to discuss with the
landlord the necessary arrangements for the comfort
of the family during their proposed stay.
While they were thus engaged, Douglas seated
himself, after the manner of the country, in the
bar-room
;
in which, besides some travellers, there was a
motley assemblage of the inhabitants of the village,
who had come in to stare at and talk about the new
comers. By the time Douglas had taken care of the
ladies and baggage, they were deep into the merits
of the whole party; and, when he entered the room,
they were too busy talking to pay any attention to
him. The principal interlocutors were three. First,
a well-dressed, middle-aged man, whose dapper air
and delicate hands bespoke one accustomed to
bowing
across a counter over lace patterns and painted
muslins; and whose style of eloquence was exactly
adapted to the praise of such articles. Then there
was a coarse, strong man, with a bacon-fed look,
plainly, cheaply, and untastefully dressed, in clothes
which, by their substantial goodness, indicated at
once the wearer's prudence, and the length of his
purse. His voice was loud, strong, and
self-important
,
entirely devoid of melody, and incapable of
inflection or modulation. His whole appearance
showed him to be a substantial planter, ignorant of
every thing but corn and tobacco. A huge whip in
the hand of the third, together with his dusty and
travel-soiled appearance, denoted the driver of a
wagon
which stood before the door.
Their conversation I reserve for the next chapter.
CHAPTER XXVI.
If she be not kind to me,
What care I how kind she be?
Suckling
.
I cannot
say I like it altogether, Squire, said
the planter. It may suit my neighbor Jones, here,
well enough to have one of them high-headed
Roanoke
planters to come here with his family, and spend
his money. I dare say he will make a pretty good
spec out of them; but, for my part, I would rather
they would stay at home, and live under their own
laws. I ha'nt got no notion, after they saddled that
damned rascal Van Buren upon us so long, that now,
the minute we have shook him off and made a good
government, and good treaties, and all, they should
be wanting to have a sop in our pan. If that's what
they are after, in rebelling against their government,
I don't want to give them no countenance. What
we have done, we have done for ourselves, and we
have a right to all the good of it. They have fixed
their market to their liking, and let it stand so. If
we can get thirty dollars for our tobacco, and they
cannot get ten, I reckon we ha'nt got nobody to thank
for it but ourselves. I dare say, now they see how
the thing works, they would be glad enough to share
with us, but I see plain enough that all they would
get by joining us, we would lose, and may be more
too.
You are right there, Mr. Hobson, said the
merchant
;
and that is not all. There's an advantage in
buying as well as selling. Now as to this Mr. Trevor,
or whatever his name is, coming over here, and buying
things cheaper than he could get them at homewhy
that he is welcome to. Though yu may be sure,
neighbor
,
I don't let him have them as cheap as I sell to
you. But as to letting in the Norfolk merchants to
all the advantage of our treaty with England, that is
another matter. For though, when we deepen the bar
at Ocracock, I have no doubt our town down there
will be another sort of a place to what Norfolk ever
was, yet if Virginia was to join us now, right away,
the most of the trade would go to Norfolk again, and
they would get their goods there as cheap as we get
them here, and may be a little cheaper. So you see
it is against my interest as well as yours; and I don't
like the thoughts of putting in a crop, and letting
another man gather it, any more than you do.
It would be harder upon me than any of you,
said the wagoner; for if that was the case, that
damned railroad would break up my business, stock
and fluke. As it is, there never was such a time for
wagoning before. Instead of just hauling the little
tobacco that is made here to the end of the railroad,
now
I have the hauling of the Virginia tobacco, and
all, down to
Commerce
.
[1]
[1]
The reader will look, in vain, on the map, for the name of this
place. It was somewhere on the waters of the Sound, and,
doubtless
,
would have become a place of some consequence, had not the
union of Virginia to the Southern Confederacy laid the
foundation
for a degree of prosperity in Norfolk, which bids fair to
make it the first city on the continent. The town of Commerce,
of course, went down with the necessity which gave rise to it.
It is hard to say whether surprise or disgust most
prevailed in the mind of Douglas at hearing these
remarks. The idea of the advantages lost to
Virginia
,
by her connexion with the North, had never
entered his mind; but still less had he conceived it
possible that a sordid desire to monopolize these
advantages
,
could stifle, in the minds of the North
Carolineans, every feeling of sympathy with the
oppressed
and persecuted assertors of the rights of
Virginia. The reply of Mr. Hobson to the remark
of the wagoner gave him a yet deeper insight into
that dark and foul corner of the human heart, where
self predominates over all the better affections.
I don't think that's right fair in you
wagoners
,
said he. You haul the Virginia tobacco
down to Commerce, and when it gets there it is all
the same as mine. Now, if it was not for that, I am
not so mighty sure but I'd get forty dollars instead
of thirty; and I don't like to lose ten dollars to give
you a chance to get one.
It is all one to me, said the wagoner. You
may just pay me the same for not hauling that they
pay me for hauling, or only half as much, and I will
not haul another hogshead.
But if you won't, another will, said Hobson.
Like enough, replied the wagoner; for all
trades must live; and if them poor devils get a
chance to sell a hogshead or two, instead of leaving
it all to rot, you ought not to grudge them that.
Certainly not, said the merchant, for I guess
that whatever they get, they take care to lay it all out
in goods on this side of the line. So the money
stays with us after all, and friend Stubbs's hauling
does good to more besides him.
I see, said Hobson, how it does good to
you, but none to me.
But that an't all, Mr. Hobson, said the landlord,
who had entered while this conversation was going
on. Them hot-headed fellows over the line there,
like this old Squire Trevor, will be getting
themselves
into hot water every now and then; and when
they run away and come to us, if they did not bring
no money, we'd have to feed them free gratis for
nothing. Now Stubbs hauls Squire Trevor's
tobacco
to Commerce, and he gets a good price; and
then he gets into trouble, and comes over here to stay
with me, and so he is able to pay me a good price;
and here it is, added he, showing a roll of notes.
Still, said Hobson, I don't see how that
4
does me any good. If they were to come here
begging
,
damn the mouthful I'd give them.
Then you would leave the whole burden on
the poor tavern-keepers, said the landlord.
NoI would not. I would not let them come;
or, if they did, just give them up to their own
government
.
If they had not a chance to be running
over here, as soon as they got into trouble, they
would keep quiet, and never get a chance to separate,
and so ruin our business, whether they joined us
or no.
Old Rip is wide awake at last, said a voice
from behind; but it is to his interest only.
Douglas turned to the voice of the speaker, the
tone of which expressed a scorn and derision most
acceptable to his feelings. He was a tall and fine
looking man, powerfully made, and inclined to be
fat, but not at all unwieldy. The half laughing
expression
of his large, blue eye, and the protrusion of
his under lip, spoke his careless contempt of those
whose conversation had called forth his sarcasm.
The attention of the whole company was drawn to
him at the same moment; all looking as if they
wished
to say something, without knowing what. At
length the wagoner spoke, on the well understood
principle that, when men talk of what they
understand
imperfectly, he who knows least should be
always first to show his ignorance.
I cannot say I understand rightly what you
mean, stranger, said he; but I guess, by the cut
of your jib, that you are one of them high dons from
South Carolina, that always have money to throw
away, and think a body ought never to care any more
for himself than another. But this business don't
consarn you, no how, because these people don't
interfere
with your cotton crop.
Yes, but they do, though, said Hobson; for
if they drive me from tobacco, I shall make cotton.
But, if I can keep them out of the tobacco market,
I shall be willing to give up the making of cotton to
South Carolina.
Why that is true, said the stranger, with a
sudden change of his countenance, from which he
discharged, in a moment, every appearance of
intelligence
,
but that which seemed to reflect the superior
wisdom of Mr. Hobson. That is true, said he,
looking as if making a stupid attempt to think; I
had not thought of that before.
As he said this, he sunk slowly and thoughtfully
into a chair, his knees falling far asunder, his arms
dropping across his thighs, his body bent forward,
and his face turned up toward Mr. Hobson, with the
look of one who desires and expects to receive
important
information. The whole action spoke so
eloquently to Mr. Hobson's self-esteem, that he went
on, with an air of the most gracious complacency.
You see, stranger, just shutting only a part of
the Virginia tobacco out of the market, makes a
difference of ten dollars, at the very least, in the price
of mine. Now, we used to make a heap of cotton
in this country, but we are all going to give it up
quite entirely, and then, you see, it stands to reason
it will make a difference of five cents a pound, or
may be ten, in your cotton.
This interesting proposition was received by the
stranger with a sluggish start of dull surprise; from
which he sunk again into the same appearance of
stolid musing. To think what a fool I have been,
said he, after a long pause. Then, scratching his
head, and twisting in his chair, he added: You are
right. You are right; and the only way to manage
the matter is to get your Legislature to pass a law, as
you say, to make those fellows stay at home.
To be sure it would, said the gratified
Hobson
;
but then there are so many conceited
fellows
in the Legislature, with a fool's notion in their
heads about taking sides with them that cannot help
themselves, that there is no getting any thing done.
Well, said the stranger, this gentleman
guessed right when he said I was from South
Carolina
.
So I don't know any thing about your laws
here. But I suppose you have no law to hurt a
man for taking up one that runs away from the law
in Virginia, and carrying him back. I expect old Van
would pay well for them.
Hobson looked hard at the stranger, and only
answered
with that compound motion of the head,
which, partaking at once of a shake and a nod,
expresses
both assent and caution.
The landlord and merchant both exclaimed against
this suggestion, the one illustrating his argument by
the freedom with which his guest had ordered wine
from the bar; the other, by his former experience of
his liberality as a purchaser of goods, while he kept
a store in Mr. Trevor's neighborhood, which he had
withdrawn since the revolution. Among the
bystanders
there was no expression of opinion, but that sort
of silence which betokens an idea that what has been
said is well worth considering.
4
CHAPTER XXVII.
Sic vos non vobis
.
Virgil
.
In
the meantime, Mr. B had entered the room,
and, hearing the stranger's voice, placed himself at
the back of his chair, looking on with a playful smile.
He now spoke
Have you played out the play? said he.
The stranger sprung to his feet in a moment, and,
facing B, caught him by the hand, which he shook
with an energy which seemed to threaten dislocation.
The two then turned off, and left the room together.
This is most fortunate, my dear sir, said the
stranger; but, pray tell me, how happens it that I
find you here?
Do you not perceive, said B, that I have
a friend in trouble, and that I am here with him? Did
you not hear the name of Trevor just now?
Trevor! NoI did not distinguish the name.
What Trevor? Bernard? Is he here? In trouble?
About what? I came this far to see you both, and
not choosing to go into Virginia, was listening to the
conversation of those fellows, in hopes to find some
one among them whom I could trust to send with a
request that you would both meet me here.
Here we both are, said B, and here
Trevor
is like to remain for a while. He has been elected
to the Legislature, and they have gotten up a
prosecution
against him before that iniquitous court of
high commission at Washington, to hang him, if they
can, or at least to drive him off.
Can you think him safe here, asked the
stranger
,
among such mercenary wretches as those we
have just left?
O yes! You must not judge of this people by
those muck-worms. The best of the three is a
Yankee tin-pedler, turned merchant. The other two
are the worst specimens of their respective species.
I dare say there are many more like them, but there
are fifty gentlemen of property in this county who
would stand by us; and are ready, in their individual
capacity, to aid us with purse and sword, whenever
we raise our banner.
But where is Trevor? said the stranger. I
am impatient to see him.
We will go to him, said B; but first let me
introduce you to a young friend of ours, whom
you
must receive as a friend. He is the sort of man we
should cherish, and, besides that, he has been in
trouble on your account. You must understand that
he was an officer in the army of the United States, and
incurred the mortal displeasure of his master for not
joining one of his minions in abuse of you, when the
news of your successful negotiation with the British
Government was received.
Douglas was now called into the room, and
introduced
to the stranger; and the three gentlemen
repaired
together to the parlor of Mr. Trevor. A
cordial greeting between the two friends, and a
sprightly conversation on various topics, ensued; but
at length the ladies left the room, and affairs of
moment
came under discussion.
I am come, said the stranger, to learn your
plans, and to consult of the best means of affording
such aid as we can. When, where, and how, do
you mean to move?
We have carried the elections, said B, so
as to be sure of a majority in the Legislature, if they
can be freed from the presence of the federal army.
But, unless that can be done, our friends here, and
many others, will not be permitted to attend, and the
weaker brethren will be overawed.
Of course, then, you will attempt that. What
measures do you propose to take?
None that shall attract observation, said B.
It is impossible, at this time, to draw together any
force which might not at once be overwhelmed by
the army at Richmond. We are, therefore, obliged
to lie quiet, and suffer our people to see for
themselves
the advantages they are losing. They are
beginning to understand this. They perceive that
your commercial arrangements are making their
neighbors in this State rich, while they can sell
nothing that they make, and are obliged to give
double price for all they buy. The abatement of
duty in the English ports on your tobacco, and the
corresponding abatement of your impost on British
manufactures, is driving trade, money, and even
population, to the South; and nothing but
separation
from the northern States can prevent our whole
tobacco country from being deserted. This, of course,
will open the eyes of the people in time, and we
hope, that when the Legislature meets, it may be
practicable to draw together, on the sudden, such a
force as may drive the enemy from Richmond, and
give time at least to adjourn to a place where they
may deliberate in safety.
Is there any such place in the State? asked the
stranger.
I am not aware that there is at this moment, but
such a one must be provided for the emergency,
should it arise.
And what means do you propose to use for that
purpose?
There is a section of the State, replied B,
where circumstances enable me to exert a powerful
influence, and where, from its localities, a partisan
corps might maintain itself, in spite of the enemy,
and might give so decided a disposition to the
surrounding
population, as to establish perfect security
within a pretty extensive district.
But is there no danger, said the southron,
that such a corps would induce an increase of the
force at Richmond and elsewhere, and so make the
first step in your enterprise more difficult?
It would have that effect, said B, were
not the scene of action remote from Richmond, and
unless the operations of the corps were so conducted
as to create no alarm for that place. Of course, there
should be no appearance of concert with this lower
country; and, so far from increasing apprehension
of our ulterior designs, our failure to rally to the
banner
of a successful leader might disarm suspicion.
Then it seems that all you want is a Marion, a
Sumpter, or a Pickens?
We have such a one, said B; and it is
well that you are here with us to aid in consecrating
him to his task. Here he stands.
As he said this, he laid his hand, solemnly, gently
and respectfully, on the head of the astonished
Douglas
.
What, I! exclaimed he. For God's sake, my
dear sir, what qualification have I for such service?
Courage, talent, address, and military
education
,
said B, with a quiet smile.
And where should I find men willing to be
commanded
by me, in an enterprize which, of course,
supposes the absence of all legal authority?
Suppose them provided, said B. Is there
any other difficulty to be removed?
I should still be bound to enquire, said
Douglas
,
what good end is proposed, before I could
agree to enter on a course of conduct which nothing
but the most important considerations could justify.
All that you have a right to ask, and are bound
to understand clearly. You would have understood
it long before this, but that as long as one shred
remained of the tie that bound you to the army of the
United States, a delicate respect to you imposed
silence on your uncle and myself. You now require
that we show you some prevailing reason why Virginia
should detach herself from the Northern Confederacy,
and either form a separate State, which we do not
propose, or unite herself to the South, which we do.
Is not that your difficulty?
It is, replied Douglas. I have long been
sensible that there were views of the subject which
my situation had hidden from me, and have
frequently
lamented (while I was grateful for) the resolute
reserve which my friends have maintained.
You must be sensible, said B, that the
southern States, including Virginia, are properly and
almost exclusively agricultural. The quality of their
soil and climate, and the peculiar character of their
laboring population, concur to make agriculture the
most profitable employment among them. Apart from
the influence of artificial causes, it is not certain that
any labor can be judiciously taken from the soil to be
applied to any other object whatever. When Lord
Chatham said that America ought not to manufacture
a hob-nail for herself, he spoke as a true and
judicious
friend of the colonies. The labor necessary
to make the hob-nail, if applied to the cultivation of
the earth, might produce that for which the British
manufacturer would gladly give two hob-nails. By
coming between the manufacturer and the farmer,
and interrupting this interchange by perverse
legislation
,
the Government broke the tie which bound the
colonies to the mother country.
When that tie was severed and peace established,
it was the interest of both parties that this
interchange
should be restored, and put upon such a
footing
as to enable each, reciprocally, to obtain for the
products of his own labor as much as possible of the
products of the labor of the other.
Why was not this done? Because laws are not
made for the benefit of the people, but for that of
their rulers. The monopolizing spirit of the landed
aristocracy in England led to the exclusion of our
bread-stuffs, and the necessities of the British
treasury
tempted to the levying of enormous revenue
from our other agricultural products. The interchange
between the farmer and manufacturer was thus
interrupted
.
In part it was absolutely prevented; the
profit being swallowed up by the impost, the
inducement
was taken away.
What did the American Government under these
circumstances? Did they say to Great Britain, `
relax
your corn-laws; reduce your duties on tobacco;
make no discrimination between our cotton and that
from the East Indies; and we will refrain from laying
a high duty on your manufactures. You will thus
enrich your own people, and it is by no means sure
that their increased prosperity may not give you,
through the excise and other channels of revenue,
more than an equivalent for the taxes we propose to
you to withdraw.'
Did we say this? No. And why? Because,
in the northern States, there was a manufacturing
interest to be advanced by the very course of
legislation
most fatal to the South. With a dense
population
,
occupying a small extent of barren country,
with mountain streams tumbling into deep tide-water,
and bringing commerce to the aid of manufactures,
they wanted nothing but a monopoly of the southern
market to enable them to enrich themselves. The
alternative was before us. To invite the great
European manufacturer to reciprocate the benefits of
free trade, whereby the South might enjoy all the
advantages of its fertile soil and fine climate, or to
transfer these advantages to the North, by meeting
Great Britain on the ground of prohibition and
exaction
.
The latter was preferred, because to the
interest of that section, which, having the local
majority, had the power.
Under this system, Great Britain has never
wanted a pretext for her corn-laws, and her high
duties on all our products. Thus we sell all we make,
5
subject to these deductions, which, in many instances,
leave much less to us than what goes into the British
treasury.
Here, too, is the pretext to the Government of the
United States for their exactions in return. The
misfortune is, that the southern planter had to bear
both burthens. One half the price of his products
is seized by the British Government, and half the
value of what he gets for the other half is seized by
the Government of the United States.
This they called retaliation and indemnification.
It was indemnifying an interest which had not been
injured, by the farther injury of one which had been
injured. It was impoverishing the South for the
benefit of the North, to requite the South for having
been already impoverished for the benefit of Great
Britain. Still it was `indemnifying
ourselves
.' Much
virtue in that word, `
ourselves
.' It is the language
used by the giant to the dwarf in the fable; the
language
of the brazen pot to the earthen pot; the
language of all dangerous or interested friendship.
I remember seeing an illustration of this sort of
indemnity in the case of a woman who was whipt by
her husband. She went complaining to her father,
who whipped her again, and sent her back. `Tell
your husband,' said he, `that as often as he whips
my daughter
, I will whip
his wife
.'
But what remedy has been proposed for these
things? asked Douglas.
A remedy has been proposed and applied,
replied
B. The remedy of legislation for the
benefit, not of the rulers, but of the ruled.
But in what sense will you say that our
legislation
has been for the benefit of the rulers alone?
Are we not all our own rulers?
Yes, replied B, if you again have recourse
to the use of that comprehensive word `WE,'
which identifies things most dissimilar, and binds up,
in the same bundle, things most discordant. If the
South and North are one; if the Yankee and the
Virginian are one; if light and darkness, heat and
cold, life and death, can all be identified; then WE are
our own rulers. Just so, if the State will consent to
be identified with the Church, then WE pay tithes
with one hand, and receive them with the other.
While the Commons identify themselves with the
Crown, `WE' do but pay taxes to
ourselves
. And if
Virginians can be fooled into identifying themselves
with the Yankeesa fixed tax-paying minority, with
a fixed tax-receiving majorityit will still be the same
thing; and they will continue to hold a
distinguished
place among the innumerable WES that have been
gulled into their own ruin ever since the world began.
It is owing to this sort of deception, played off on the
unthinking multitude, that, in the two freest countries
in the world, the most important interests are taxed
for the benefit of lesser interests. In England, a
country of manufacturers,
they
have been starved that
agriculture may thrive. In this, a country of farmers
and planters,
they
have been taxed that manufacturers
may thrive. Now I will requite Lord Chatham's
well-intentioned declaration, by saying that England
ought not to make a barrel of flour for herself. I
say, too, that if her rulers and the rulers of the
people
of America were true to their trust, both sayings
would be fulfilled. She would be the work-house,
and here would be the granary of the world. What
would become of the Yankees? As
I
don't call
them WE, I leave
them
to find the answer to that
question.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
Such is the aspect of this shore;
'Tis Greecebut living Greece no more.
Byron
.
The
impression made on Douglas by these
observations
was so strong and so obvious, that his friend
paused and left him to meditate upon them. Some
minutes elapsed before he made any reply. When
he did speak, he acknowledged the existence and
magnitude of the grievance, and again enquired,
with increased solicitude, what remedy had been
found.
You heard what passed in the bar-room, just
now, said the stranger.
I did, replied Douglas; and I was as much
surprised at the facts hinted at, as disgusted at the
sentiments of the speakers.
Then your surprise must have been extreme,
said the other; for I hardly know which amused
me most: their unblushing display of selfish
meanness
,
or the glow of indignation in your countenance,
which showed how little you know of this world of
5
philanthropy and benevolence that we live in. But
had you no suspicion of the cause of those enviable
advantages which these sons of Mammon are so
anxious to monopolize?
Not at all, and hence my surprise; for I had
supposed heretofore, that, between the two States,
all the advantage lay on the side of Virginia.
You judged rightly, replied the other. In the
way of commerce, nature has done nothing for the
one, and every thing for the other. But the
conversation
you have heard is a proof that the sand which
chokes the waters of the Sound is a trivial obstacle,
in comparison with the legislative barriers which
have shut out prosperity from the noble Chesapeake.
Look at your rivers and bay, and you will see that
Virginia ought to be the most prosperous country in
the world. Look at the ruins which strew the face
of your lower country, the remains of churches and
the fragments of tombstones, and you will see that
she once was so. Ask for the descendants of the
men whose names are sculptured on those
monuments
,
and their present condition will tell you that
her prosperity has passed away. Then ask all
history. Go to the finest countries in the worldto
Asia Minor, to Greece, to Italy; ask what has laid
them desolate, and you will receive but one answer,
`misgovernment.'
But may not the fault be in the people
themselves
?
asked Douglas.
The fault of submitting to be misgoverned,
certainly
.
But no more than that. Let the
country
enjoy its
natural advantages, and they who are too ignorant or
too slothful to use them will soon give place to others
of a different character. What has there been to
prevent
the Yankee from selling his barren hills at high
prices and coming South, where he might buy the
fertile shores of the Chesapeake for a song? No
local attachment, certainly; for his home is every
where. What is there now to prevent the planter
of this neighborhood from exchanging his thirsty
fields for the rich and long coveted low grounds of
James River or Roanoke, in Virginia? Are these
people wiser, better, more energetic and industrious
than they were twelve months ago, that their lands
have multiplied in value five fold? Is it your uncle's
fault, that, were he now at home the tame slave of
power, he could hardly give away his fine estate?
The difference is, that this country now enjoys its
natural advantages, while Virginia remains under the
crushing weight of a system devised for the benefit
of her oppressors.
I see the effect, said Douglas. But tell me, I
beseech you, the cause of this change in your
condition
here.
The cause is free trade.
And how has that been obtained?
I will answer that, said B; because my
friend's modesty might restrain him from giving the
true answer. It has been obtained by intelligence,
manly frankness, and fair dealing. It has been
obtained by offering to other nations terms most
favorable to their peculiar and distinctive interests,
in consideration of receiving the like advantage.
Instead of nursing artificial interests to rival the iron
and cotton fabrics, and the shipping of England, the
wine of France, the silk and oil of Italy, and
enviously snatching at whatever benefit nature may
have vouchsafed to other parts of the world, this
people only ask to exchange for these things their own
peculiar productions. A trade perfectly free, totally
discharged from all duties, would certainly be best
for all. But revenue must be had, and the impost
is the best source of revenue. No State can be
expected to give that up. But it has been found
practicable so to regulate that matter as reduce the
charges which have heretofore incumbered exchanges
to a mere trifle.
How has that been effected? asked Douglas.
If that question were to be answered in detail,
said B, I should leave the answer to him by whom
the details have been arranged. I will give you the
outline in a few words. These States were first
driven to think of separation by a tariff of protection.
Their federal constitution guards against it by
express
prohibition, and by requiring that the impost,
like the tax laws of Virginia, should be annual.
They have felt the danger to liberty from
excessive
revenue. Their constitution requires that the
estimates of the expense of the current year shall be
made the measure of revenue to be raised for that
year. The imports of the preceding year are taken
as a basis of calculation, and credit being given for
any surplus in the treasury, a tariff is laid which, on
that basis, would produce the sum required.
Then there can never be any surplus for an
emergency, said Douglas.
Always, replied B; in the right place, and
the only safe place,the pockets of a prosperous
people
.
There is no place in the treasury to keep money.
The till of the treasury has a hole in the bottom, and
the money always finds its way into the pockets of
sharpers, parasites, man-worshippers, and pseudo
patriots. But let that pass. You see that a small
revenue alone will probably be wanting, and being
raised annually, the tariff can be annually adjusted.
Now, what says justice, as to the revenue to be
raised by two nations on the trade between the two,
seeing that it is equally levied on the citizens of
both?
On that hypothesis each should receive an equal
share of it, said Douglas.
Precisely so, answered B; and let these
terms be held out to all nations, and if one will not
accept them another will. On this principle a system
of commercial arrangements has been set on foot
which, by restoring to these States the benefit of
their natural advantages, is at once producing an
effect which explains their former prosperity. It
places in stronger relief the evils of the opposite
system to Virginia, and really leaves her, while she
retains her present connexion with the North,
without
any resource. Tobacco she cannot sell at all.
Invita natura
, she will have to raise cotton to supply
the beggared manufactories of the North, from which
she will not receive in return the third part as much
of the manufactured article as the Carolina planter
will get for his. This is her fate. She sees it, and
would throw off the yoke. But her northern masters
see it too. She is all that remains to them of their
southern dependencies, which, though not
their
colonies, they have so long governed
as
colonies.
Take her away, and they are in the condition of the
wolf when there are no sheep left. Wolf eat wolf,
and Yankee cheat Yankee. This they will guard
against by all means lawful and unlawful, for
Virginia alone mitigates the ruin that their insatiate
rapacity has brought upon them. They will hold on
to her with the gripe of death; and she must and
will struggle to free herself, as from death.
And now, how say you? Are you prepared to
do your part in furtherance of this object?
I am, replied Douglas promptly; and I now
eagerly ask you to show me the means by which I
can advance it.
You asked for men, said B, and you shall
have them. They are already provided, and want
but a leader.
But what authority can I have to be recognized
as such?
You have heard your uncle, aunt, or cousins,
speak of Jacob Schwartz.
I believe I have; but what can such a fellow
have to do with such affairs as we now speak of. Is
he not an ignorant clown?
He is all that, said B. But he writes as
good a hand as Marshal Saxe, and has probably
read as many books as Cincinnatus. But to speak
seriously, he is no common clown. I picked him
up, nearly forty years ago, a little, dirty, ragged
boy, without money, without friends, without
education
,
and without principles. All these wants I
found means to supply, except that of education,
which to him would be quite superfluous. But he
now has money sufficient, and friends without
number
;
and, what is better still, he has become an
honest man, and discharges the duties of one none
the worse for having had a pretty large experience
in knavery. Such as he is, he is bound to me by
gratitude, such as few men are capable of. More
than a dozen years ago, he followed the bent of early
habit, and retired to his native mountains, where
he has married, and lives after the manner of the
country, as if he were worth nothing in the world
but his rifle. He has a good deal of money, which
I manage for him; and as he has no taste for
extravagance
of any sort, and is generous as a king, he
always has a dollar to spare a friend.
When I tell you that the people of that district
see so little money that they always count it by
four-pence-half-pennies
,
you will readily believe that a
little help goes a great way. They don't see that
Schwartz has any property; but their opinion of his
sagacity and enterprize takes away all wonder at the
fact, that he is always able, as well as ready, to give
aid to a friend at time of need. You will of course
infer, that his influence among them is very great.
Now that, and all his faculties of body, mind, and
purse, are at my command. He is aware of the state
of public affairs; adopts all my views, as far as he
can understand them, and beyond that point trusts
me implicitly. It is through his instrumentality that
the minds of the mountaineers of that district are
prepared for action at this moment. No force is
actually organized, but every thing is ready for the
emergency. The dispositions of the people, and the
strong fastnesses of the country, will make it a
secure retreat to a partisan corps. The materials for
such a corps may be found in part among the
inhabitants
.
A nucleus is all that is wanting, and to
that all the persecuted and distressed, from every
quarter, will gather.
You show me, then, said Douglas, that you
already have all you wantmen and a leader. Your
friend Schwartz must be the very man to command
those fellows, and might not like to submit to the
authority of another.
He is not the man to command, said B,
because he could not keep up intelligence with
other parts of the country, though as a medium of
intelligence there is none better. Indeed he cannot
be spared from that branch of service. Besides,
though he might command his neighbors, you will
be joined by men who will not submit to be
commanded
by any but a gentleman. As to any
reluctance
on his part, go to him in my name, or in that
of your uncle or aunt, and you command him, body
and soul. You will find all his faculties devoted to
your service, without envy, jealousy, or grudging;
and you will do well to use his mind more than his
body. In many particulars he is one of the most
efficient men in the world; and as he perfectly
understands himself, and knows what he is fit for,
you may always leave him to choose his own
function
,
and to execute it in his own way.
6
CHAPTER XXIX.
The heath this night must be my bed,
The bracken curtain for my head,
My lullaby the warder's tread,
Far, far, from Love and thee, Mary!
I think
, said Douglas, I now understand
your general purpose, and the means to be placed at
my disposal. Let me now know your plan of
operations
.
What am I to do, and when?
The task I propose to myself, replied B, is
one which requires that I keep myself out of harm's
way, and free from all suspicion, until the time shall
come; when I propose to act a part which shall make
me a conspicuous mark for the malice or policy of
our enemies. Hence I affect to live, and keep
myself
as much as possible on this side of the line.
What you do there must be done in such a way as to
indicate no connexion with me. I therefore propose
that you accompany my friend here to South
Carolina
,
where you may derive much benefit from seeing
the first men in that State, with whom he will make
you acquainted. From thence I would have you
address letters to your friends (especially those in
the army) so worded as to lead them to attribute
your change of opinions (which should be made to
seem progressive) to the influence of these new
associations
.
A few weeks will be sufficient for this
purpose, and you may return to Virginia early in the
summer. Here, continued B, pointing to a map
which hung in the room, is the point at which you
will enter the State, and here will be the principal
scene of your operations. You will there find
Schwartz, to whom you shall be properly accredited,
and from whom you will learn the resources to be
placed at your command, and the capabilities of the
country.
Now observe. Our object is to organize a small
force, under which the district may be protected in
declaring for the Independence of Virginia, and
prepared
to afford a place of refuge to the Legislature,
should they be driven from Richmond, before they
have time to organize the operations of the
Government
.
Of course, they must have an opportunity to
assemble there, if but for a day. This it must be
our
care to secure, by a sudden movement from the
midland counties on the southern boundary, and in
this we
may
need your co-operation. On that point
we shall take care to keep you advised.
Now our first object being to free Richmond
from the presence of the federal army, at the moment
the Legislature is to meet, we must be careful to
cause no alarm for the safety of that place. Any
movement in that direction would produce a
concentration
of force there, and increase our difficulties.
You should, therefore, be careful so to shape your
operations as rather to call the attention of the enemy
to other points; and if you can make them of sufficient
importance to draw detachments from Richmond, a
double purpose will be answered. You will have no
cause to fear any force that can be brought against
you. Your field of operations affords situations which
may defy assault, and, the line of North Carolina
being at your back, you may, at any moment, cross
it and disband for a time.
But I am not sure whether our end may not be
answered best by giving to all your operations such
a character as may exclude the idea of any political
object. As none of those who are conspicuous as
malcontents in the lower country will join you,
this deception will not be difficult. In beating up
the quarters of the troops near you, you may seem
to act but in self-defence; and should you extend
your blow so far as Lynchburg, your mountaineers
will hardly fail to levy such contributions on the
camp-followers
,
and Yankee pedlars there, (who call
themselves
merchants,) as to give the measure the
appearance
of a mere marauding expedition.
I am not so very sure, replied Douglas, that
I should like to mix my little reputation as a soldier
and a gentleman with an affair of that sort.
I am not suggesting any thing contrary to the
laws of war, said B. The violation of them
would be but in appearance. Care would be taken
to indemnify any who might be wronged,
whenever
it shall be expedient for you to throw off the
mask. As to any temporary misconstruction, your
name would connect you with your uncle, and,
through him, with me and all our friends; and
moreover
,
would whet the malice of your worthy friends,
the Bakers, who would move heaven and earth to
circumvent you. Better, therefore, to drop the last
name. Archibald Douglas is name enough to satisfy
the ambition of any reasonable man, at least until he
can cap it with a yet more honorable addition, if that
be possible.
While this conversation was going on, there was
some appearance of embarrassment about Douglas,
which did not escape the observation of his uncle.
At length he said to him, in an under tone, that,
before
carrying the matter under discussion any
farther
,
he would be glad to have a few words with
him in private.
I understand your wish, said the old
gentleman
,
aloud; it shall be indulged.
I suspect you mistake me, said Douglas,
coloring
very high.
Not at all, replied the other. You only
suppose
so because you do not know that one of my
friends here received his wife in marriage at my hands,
and that the other stood father to mine. Hence I
6
have no such reserves with them as you may suppose.
Now
, do I understand you?
I dare say you do, replied Douglas, blushing
yet more deeply.
Then I say, again, your wish shall be indulged.
You shall not leave us until you are fully established
in all the rights which it is mine to confer. But you
must suppress your raptures until you hear the
conditions
.
Our plan requires secrecy, and, above all,
that there should be no appearance of concert
between
you and us, and no cause to suspect it. This
thing, therefore, must be absolutely private; no
witnesses
but those here present, and your aunt, and
Lucia; and in the next moment your foot must be in
the stirup. Are you content?
Content! said Douglas. Indeed I am not;
but I see that you are acting upon a concerted plan,
and that all expostulation must be vain. Let me at
least see Delia now.
I suspect she has gone to bed, said Mr. T.
Retired!
I believe is the word introduced by our
Yankee school-mistresses, whose prurient
imaginations
are shocked at the name of a bed. Poor girl, she
was glad to retire, in the plain English sense of the
word, as soon as we got here, and, I dare say, has
been in bed half an hour. She and your aunt were
on active service all last night, while you were
keeping
a snoring watch over our friend Whiting. Come,
my boy! You shall not infect her with the fever of
your brain to night. If you cannot sleep, it is no
reason why she should not. And now let us turn
again to other matters.
The next question, then, said the southron, is
how we can aid you? By sword, or tongue, or pen,
or purse?
By purse as much as you please, said B.
Our young friend here will need a small military
chest, which we have no means of filling. As to
the rest, keep out of the scrape. We wish to join
you in peace, and then remain at peace, which will
not be, if you strike a blow in our behalf now. As
much
individual
aid as you please to our rendezvous
just before the first Monday in December. A
thousand
independent volunteers,
pour le coup
, would be
welcome. In the meantime, if you can send our
young friend here a promising young officer from
your military school, to be his second in command, it
is all we would ask. Of course, he will come as of
his own head, for you must not seem to have any
thing to do with the matter.
Many other topics connected with our subject were
discussed, but I deem it unadvisable to speak of
more than is necessary to explain the subsequent
situation of the parties. When they met again at
breakfast, the swimming eye and changing cheek of
Delia told that she had been made acquainted with
all that had passed. The countenance of Douglas
beamed with high excitement, at once pleasant and
painful. A glance of triumphant encouragement to
Delia, and her answering tearful smile, showed that
they perfectly understood each other. Indeed it was
time they should, for it had been settled that B,
who was a resident and justice of the peace of the
county, should perform the marriage ceremony,
according
to the unceremonious law of North Carolina,
immediately after breakfast.
As soon as it was over, they adjourned to the
parlor
,
where B, drawing Delia to him, seated her
on his knee. I don't half like this business, said
he. I have no mind to take an active part in
giving
up my own little girl to this young fellow. I
am too old to think of loving and fighting all in a
breath, as he does, and I thought to wait till the wars
were over, and here he comes and cuts me out. But
I am determined to do nothing in prejudice of my
claim, until I find that I have no chance. Young
man, added he, in a tone gradually changing from
playful to serious, do you love this dear girl with
that faithful, single-hearted love, which man owes to
a woman who gives him all her heart, and entrusts
to him all her happiness, and all her hopes?
As he said this he took the hand of Douglas, and
went on: Do you thus love her, and will you in
good faith manifest this love, by being to her a true
and devoted husband, in every change and vicissitude
of life, so long as life shall last? Answer me,
Douglas
,
he continued, with a voice approaching to
sternness, and a fixed and searching look, while he
strongly grasped the young man's hand.
Assuredly I will, said Douglas, somewhat
hurt.
And you, dear, said B, resuming his kind
and playful tone, do you love this young fellow
in like sort, and will you, on your part, be to him thus
faithful as his wife?
While B said this, the blushing Delia tried to
disengage
herself. But he detained her, and caught
the hand with which she endeavored to loosen his
from her waist, and held it fast. At length she hid
her face on his neck, whispering:
You know I do. You know I will.
Then God bless you, my children, said B,
bringing their hands together and grasping both
firmly in one of his; for you are married as fast as
the law can tie you.
In a moment the whole party were on their feet,
each expressing a different variety of surprise.
Douglas
was the first to understand his situation fully, as
appeared by his springing forward and catching his
bride to his bosom, imprinting on her pure cheek the
kiss that holy nature prompts, and that all the
caprices
of fashion (thank God!) can never shame.
From him she escaped into the arms of her mother,
who, caressing her with murmured tenderness, looked
half reproachfully at B. Then smiling through
the tear that filled her large blue eye, she shook her
finger at him, and said, Just like you! Just like
you!
Fairly cheated you of your scene, Margaret. All
the matronly airs, and maidenly airs, that you and
Delia have been rehearsing this morning, gone for
nothing. And there is dear little Lucia crying as if
to break her heart, because sister Delia was married
before she could fix her pretty little face for the
occasion
.
Never mind, dear! When your turn comes
there will be less hurry, and you shall have a
ceremony
as long as the whole liturgy. Well, Douglas,
you will not quarrel with me, I am sure; and I think
Delia will forgive me for the trick I played her. You
have but an hour to stay together, and where was the
sense of giving that up to the flutter and agitation
of a deferred ceremony? I suspect if I were always
to manage the matter in this way, I should have my
hands as full of business as the dentist that used to
conjure people's teeth out of their mouths without
their knowing it, while he was pretending just to fix
his instrument. But go, my children. Empty your
full hearts into each other's bosoms, and thank me
for the privilege.
CHAPTER XXX.
Gathering tears and tremblings of distress;
And cheeks all pale, which, but an hour ago,
Blushed at the praise of their own loveliness:
And there were sudden partings, such as press
The life from out young hearts, and choking sighs,
Which ne'er might be repeated: Who could guess
If ever more should meet those mutual eyes?
Byron
.
And
so it was. I can add nothing to the language
of the poet. I can supply nothing to the imagination
of the reader. Thus Douglas and Delia parted. He
accompanied his new acquaintance to the southern
capital; he there met with men whose names live
and will live in the history of their country, and
whose memories will be honored while virtue is held
in reverence among men. From these, and especially
from the accomplished gentleman to whose
friendship
he had been introduced by his uncle and Mr.
B, he received such lights as dispelled every
shadow of doubt from his mind. The wrongs of
Virginia, her rights and her remedies, became the
subject of all his thoughts, and he burned with
impatience for the time when he might draw his
sword on her behalf, and turn to her use, as he had
expressed it, the lessons learned in the school of her
oppressors.
That time at length arrived. Returning by the
upper road which skirts the foot of the mountains,
he re-entered Virginia nearly at the spot to which
his brother had gone in quest of him. There, as he
had been taught to expect, he found Schwartz,
whose reception of him fully justified the assurances
of B. To that gentleman he showed unbounded
devotion, delighted to speak of favors received at
his hands, and of moving accidents by flood and
field, which they had encountered together. Next
to B, in his estimation, stood Mrs. Trevor; then
Delia, for whom when a child he had formed a
passionate
attachment; and last, Mr. Trevor himself,
whom, after the rest, he respected and admired above
all human beings. A hint from B that Douglas
was the husband of Delia placed him at once in the
same catalogue of worthies, and from the first
moment
he devoted himself not less to his personal
service than to the advancement of the common
cause. He had already organized a small corps, the
command of which he unreservedly surrendered,
making it his constant study to recommend the new
commander to the confidence of the men.
No man could deserve it better, or was better
qualified to win it. Frank, affable, generous and
kind, his deportment was marked by that
self-respectful
courtesy which has all the good effect of
dignity, without ever passing by that name. With
nothing repulsive, austere, or cold in his demeanor,
he was a man whose orders no soldier would
question
,
whose displeasure no gentleman would choose
to incur, whose feelings no friend, however careless,
would wound. Liberally supplied with money by
his southern friends, and instructed by Schwartz in
the judicious use of it, he took effectual measures to
prevent distress in the families of his followers. A
small sum amply satisfied their simple wants, and
his men had the satisfaction of knowing that their
families suffered nothing by their absence from their
little farms.
Beside the small embodied corps I have
mentioned
,
the whole population of that warlike district
were placed under a sort of organization, so that,
while they pursued their occupations of hunting or
farming, they were prepared, at any moment, to join
an expedition or to resist an attack.
Schwartz, who knew the country, inch by inch,
made Douglas acquainted with all its strengths and
all its passes, so that he soon became an expert
woodsman, and an active mountaineer. His first
care was to select a place for a stationary camp. For
this purpose he chose a position strong by nature,
which he made nearly impregnable. He next
provided
horses enough to mount a part of his corps.
For these the rich herbage of the mountains afforded
abundant subsistence during the summer months.
7
Of ammunition there was no stint. The lead mines
were just at his back, beyond the Alleghany.
Powder is made of good quality in all that region,
and the quantity necessary for the rifle is so small,
that the rifleman may be said to carry a hundred
lives in his powder-horn. Of provisions he had
plenty, though wanting many things deemed
necessary
in a regular army. But the pure air of the
mountains, and the exercise of hunting and scouting,
preserved the health of the men, without tents, or
salt, or vinegar, or vegetables of any kind. Venison
and beef, dried in the sun, or over the fire by the
process called jerking, was prepared in the season
of abundance for winter use, and proved the best
sort of food for a marauding corps. Light,
compact
,
and nutritious, there is no diet on which a man
can travel so far or fight so hard.
Nothing now remained but to make his enemy
feel him. Stooping from his mountain fastness, he
soon broke up all the military posts in the adjacent
counties; so that, in a few weeks, not a blue-coat
was to be seen on the south side of Staunton river.
Freed from the presence of their enemy, the people
were found ready to rise en masse. He dissuaded them
from doing more than to put themselves in readiness
for action, to furnish him needed supplies, for which
he paid fairly, and to give him notice of the approach
of the enemy. For this purpose he established a sort
of half military organization, and had it in his power
to increase his little force to five times its number in
a few days. His strength being thus adapted to any
occasion which could be expected to offer, after
sweeping away the enemy from the south side of the
river, he proceeded to break up the posts in the
counties on the northern bank. In the end, though
the enemy were nominally in possession of all the
country between James river and Roanoke, they held
no post higher than Lynchburg, nor any farther
south than Farmville. Above this last place, their
scouts and foraging parties showed themselves
occasionally
,
but never ventured to leave the banks of
James river for more than a single night.
At Lynchburg, not long before the time at which
our story commences, two companies had been
posted. As Douglas had never shown a force of
more than a hundred men, no fear of an attack on
that point was entertained. But suddenly collecting
a number of auxiliaries, he struck at them, drove
them from their post, enriched his men with every
thing that the laws of war permitted him to seize,
and retreated to his strong-hold in the mountains.
The supplies of arms, ammunition, clothing, and
blankets, thus procured, put him in condition to
increase his corps, if necessary. Thus, at the time
of which we speak, having little more than a
hundred
men embodied, he could have marched five
times that number to Richmond; and, for any service
near at hand, could have commanded a yet larger
force. Though unprovided with many of the
conveniences
of military life, they were not deficient in
essentials. There was not a bit of feather in his
host, nor drum, nor trumpet, nor banner. But there
were stout hearts, and strong hands, and fleet limbs,
and good rifles, and knives and tomahawks; and that
system and harmony which spring from a sense of
danger, a high purpose, and confidence in a leader.
To the listening ear, a whisper speaks louder than a
trumpet to the heedless. To the trusting heart, the
chieftain's voice supersedes the spirit-stirring drum.
While Douglas thus maintained his position among
the mountains, it became a sort of Cave of Adullam.
His little corps was a nucleus to which the
discontented
and persecuted gathered continually. His
embodied force was increased, while the
organization
of the neighboring population became more
perfect, their confidence firmer, their zeal more
ardent. So effectually had he broken the power of
the Central Government in that quarter, that it had
been deemed expedient to throw a much larger force
into Lynchburg, to curb his progress in that
direction
,
and to restrain the disaffected in the counties
along the north bank of James river. Could he have
co-operated with the friends of Virginia there, it was
not clear that the flame might not spread on and on,
in the direction of Washington, until the very seat
of empire might be unsafe. Hence a regiment had
been detached from the army at Richmond, and
another from the North, originally destined for that
place, was turned aside to Lynchburg. Aware of
these movements, Douglas had no doubt that the
purpose of such an assemblage of force was not
merely preventive. He saw that attempts would be
made to recover the ground which the enemy had
lost on the south side of James river; and that, by
remaining strictly on the defensive, he might be
forced to withdraw his embodied force to their
mountain
strong-hold, and not only lose the aid of his
irregulars, but give them up to the vengeance of the
enemy. Under these circumstances, attack was the
most effectual form of defence, and boldness was
true prudence.
The time, too, was at hand for the decisive
movement
,
in the lower counties, for the relief of
Richmond
.
The desired diversion had been effected,
and Douglas found himself capable of bringing into
the field a force, the presence of which would be no
inconsiderable aid to that about to assemble below.
To strike at his enemy therefore, to overwhelm him,
if possible, and, if not, to elude him and fall down
to the assistance of B, seemed to him the surest
plan for preserving the safety and independence even
of the mountain region. If successful, every
desirable
end would be accomplished. Even should he
fail, his duty to the faithful yeomanry and peasantry
of that devoted section, was rather to draw the
enemy away after him toward Richmond, than by
7
falling directly back, or even by remaining where
he was, to invite them to overrun the country which
had afforded him such zealous and efficient
co-operation
.
Influenced by these considerations, Douglas had
despatched Schwartz to lay them before B, and
receive his instructions. He had long ago recognized
him as the person of whom his aunt had said that
the destiny of Virginia depended on him. He
had received at his hands the sort of authority which
he wielded, now indeed by his own personal
influence
and character, but originally as the trusted
representative of B. He had no mind to shake off
that character. He had seen that, by means not
exactly understood, that gentleman commanded
resources, both at home and abroad, which enabled
him to meditate plans, in which all the operations of
Douglas's corps, however brilliant, were but
circumstances
of less importance in themselves than in
their relations.
Schwartz was the sole medium of communication
between the two. With nothing in his appearance
to attract attentionnothing in his manners or
common style of conversation betokening powers
superior to those of any other peasanthis
intelligence
and fidelity supplied the place of letters. He
understood every thing, and forgot nothing that was
said to him. He therefore carried no papers, and
passed unsuspected through the country, amusing
with the most harmless gossip, all he chanced to fall
in with. He was a man who knew how to have
business any where, and at any moment; and he
passed along more like a sparrow hopping from twig
to twig, pecking at a berry here and a leaf there, and
never seeming to have an ulterior object, than with
the strong-winged flight which indicates a distant
and important destination.
In one of Arthur's visits to Lucia, (his betrothal
to whom was no longer a secret in her father's
family,) he was made acquainted with the history of
Douglas's marriage. He was also entrusted with the
important information that the gallant leader, with
whose exploits the country rung, and whom his
imagination had endued with almost superhuman
powers, was his own best beloved brother. He was
instantly on fire to join him, and Schwartz was
instructed to convey to him the necessary
intelligence
;
and, if possible, to fall in with him on the
way. But he had been turned aside by objects of
higher moment on his return, and Arthur had got
ahead of him. Having ascertained this fact in the
county of Charlotte, where their roads came together,
Schwartz travelled hard to overtake him; left his
tired horse at the entrance of the defile, and,
following
on foot, came up with him as we have seen.
CHAPTER XXXI.
It is, that she will cherish the renown
Of noble deeds, achieved her name to grace
And prize the heart that beat for her alone,
In Glory's triumph, or in Death's embrace.
Anonymous
.
Let
us now return to the deep glen, at the bottom
of which we left our friend Arthur, accompanied by
his mountain guide. Schwartz was welcomed with
cordial joy by his comrades, and, having asked for
the Captain, was told he was in his tent. Arthur
looked around in vain for a tent, but saw none. The
beetling crags on both sides of the dell seemed to be
the only shelter that the place afforded. But against
the rock, a hundred yards below, and directly beneath
the spot from which Schwartz had given notice of
his presence, hung a piece of tent-cloth. One edge
of this was tacked to a pole which lay horizontally
against the rocky wall, the ends being supported by
forks about ten feet long. This proved to be a sort
of door to a wide-mouthed cavernous recess in the
rock, deep enough to afford room for the few little
conveniences which an officer can expect to keep
about him in active service. Approaching this,
Schwartz lifted the corner, and our travellers stood
in the presence of Douglas.
He was seated at a coarse table, poring over a
rude manuscript map, and did not lift his head until
he heard the word `brother' uttered by the
well-known
voice of Arthur. In a moment they were in
each other's arms, and, in the next, the new-comer
was overwhelmed with questions about his father,
mother, and various friends. Some indeed were not
named; for, though Schwartz was in the secret of the
fact, he was incapable of being let into the deeper
mystery of hearts like those of Douglas and Delia.
To such the utterance of a beloved name in the
presence
of the uninitiated is an unpardonable
profanation
.
But though that of Delia was not spoken,
Arthur took care so to emphasize his account of the
health of his uncle's family, as to convey to the mind
of Douglas an assurance of all he wished to hear.
But if Schwartz was not deep in the tender mysteries
of refined and delicate love, no man better
understood
a hint, or better knew how to improve it. He
accordingly interrupted the conversation, just to say
that he brought important intelligence, which must
be communicated that night; adding that he would
leave them together for an hour. He now withdrew,
and afforded the desired opportunity for unreserved
conversation.
My Delia, said Douglas; I understand that
she is well, and, I hope, happy.
She is happy, said Arthur. She hears of
you, from the impartial voice of public fame, in terms
that fill her heart with pride, and leave no room
there for alarm or melancholy. She feels as becomes
a soldier's wife, anxious for her husband's fate, but
confident in his fortunes. She has caught this
notion
from Mr. B, who is her oracle, and who seems
to have imparted to her, not only all his sentiments,
but all the energy and buoyancy of his self-confident
mind.
Thank God! said Douglas. Just so would
I have her to be. I knew it would be so. I saw
her noble mother, when danger threatened my uncle;
and I saw her too. But this is the first positive
information
,
on
that
point, that has reached me since
I have been here. Mr. B and I can only
correspond
by messages through Schwartz, and though
he is plain and accurate as a printed book in
repeating
what he understands, yet ideas of this sort are
not in his line. And my good and venerable old
fatherare you here with his permission?
I am not; nor does he know where I am. I
have no doubt that I should have his approbation if
he did. I am sure
you
have.
I! exclaimed Douglas, with a start of violent
surprise. What does he know of me.
Nothing at all, said Arthur, smiling. But he
knows of a certain partisan leader, whom the world
calls Captain Douglas, and if I can read the old
man's eyes, when he hears that name, he would
rather call that man his son than any other on
earth.
As Arthur spoke the eyes of Douglas filled, and,
pressing his hand to his brow, he bowed his head a
moment on the table. Then rising, he stood erect,
and looking up with a rapt and abstracted air, his
eye flashing through his tears, he folded his arms, and
speaking in the measured tone of one who feels
deeply, but in whose mind thought masters feeling,
he parodied that noble speech which Shakspeare puts
in the mouth of Prince Henry:
Then in the closing of some glorious day,
When I shall wear a garment all of blood,
And stain my favors with a bloody mask,
I will be bold to tell him, `I am your son.'
And my Delia!my virgin bride! O! for that
day,
When woman's pure kiss, sweet and long,
Welcomes her warrior home.
I tell you, Arthur, that, in thoughts like these,
there is a rapture which makes this hole in the rock
a palace, and this flinty couch a bed of down. Are
you prepared, my dear fellow, to partake with me in
such feelings? That, I know, depends in part on
Lucia. What of her?
She is to me, said Arthur, all that Delia is
to you; though she is too young to have the same
strength of mind, and I have no right to expect the
same confidence in my prowess and fortunes.
Never fear. It will not be wanting at the pinch.
A woman never fears for the safety of him she loves
but when she doubts his truth. Let her feel that she
is his second self, and self-confidence calms her
fears. Let her feel that she lives in his heart, and,
strong in love, she defies the dagger which assails it.
Calphurnia trembled for Csar. Why? He was
the husband of every woman in Rome. Had he been
true to her, she would have felt only that prudent
fear that he would not have derided. He would,
perhaps, have yielded to her discreet remonstance,
and her love would have justified the confidence
which characterizes the love of woman, by saving
his life. But, what a rhapsody I am uttering! You
say my father does not know where you are? How
is that?
I was not at liberty to acquaint him with your
secret. Your absence has drawn on him some
displeasure
from those in power, and their minions are
all around him. It seems that you are supposed to
be in the South for no good purpose, and not
without
an understanding with him. My disappearance
will attract farther notice. For that he cares little;
but he is so scrupulous in his notions of honor and
truth, that, were he questioned about us, he could
hardly conceal any thing he might know. Your
letters
,
I see, still come from the South, though they
say nothing of your whereabout. Of course, he thinks
you are there; and I, without undeceiving him,
simply
asked leave to go to look for you. That his
feelings
are with us, I have no doubt. But he is so
beset
by spies, and so hampered by the position of our
brothers in the army and navy, that he even tries to
hide the secret of his thoughts from himself.
Thus the brothers conversed until Schwartz
returned
and claimed the Captain's ear; who began
by asking what news he brought from B.
The Colonel (so he always designated B) likes
your plan mightily, sir, replied Schwartz, if you
can rub through with it. But he is afraid, from all
he can learn, that them fellows at Lynchburg may
be too many for you; so, he says, you must find out
exactly how that is, and if you don't think it a pretty
good chance, just slip down along the line, toward
the middle of November, and join him.
If I do so, where am I to find him precisely?
asked Douglas.
Just where the Petersburg railroad crosses the
line, said Schwartz. You see the folks there are
all friendly, because as long as things stay as they
are, their railroad an't worth an old flint, and so they
are patching up all the old cars, and fixing every
thing for the Colonel, as soon as he can start a
regiment or so, to make a dash at Petersburg, and
so hold on there till the rest of his men join him.
Now, if we were to be the first there, Captain, I have
8
a notion that we'd be the very boys for them chaps
at Petersburg.
I should like that well, said Douglas. But
I understand my old acquaintance, Col. Mason, at
Lychburg, has a great desire to see me, and I should
hate to disappoint him.
I don't think he commands there now, said
Schwartz. There is another regiment come from
the North to join him, and they say the other is the
oldest colonel.
That is of course, said Douglas, for Mason
is the youngest in the army. But I am not sorry for
the exchange, for they have hardly sent as good a
one. There is not a man among them I would not
rather meet than Mason. Have you been able to
learn the particulars of their force there?
As well as I can understand, replied Schwartz,
the whole number is not far from a thousand, and
may be a few more.
A thousand! Can we raise men enough to strike
at them before they think of it?
I have not a doubt of it, sir, if we could get at
them on fair terms. The people along down between
here and Staunton river don't like the thoughts of
what them fellows may do to them, and they are keen
to take them before they are ready. I talked to the
head-men among them, as you told me, and they all
see that the right way is to try to get the first blow.
Because, you see, Captain, when we an't gaining we
are losing. If we let the enemy hold Lynchburg, and
they find two regiments will not do, they will bring
four, and so on, till they get the upper hand, and
then they will pay these poor fellows about here for
old and new. But if we could make out to give
them a real beating, and so drive them clean off, why
all the country as far as the Rappahannock would
rise that minute, and they'd have enough to do to
hold their own at Fredericksburg.
I suppose you said all this to Mr. B?
To be sure I did, sir; and he thinks just as we do
about it, only he is dubious about attacking a fortified
camp, as they call it, just with rifles.
He is right about that, replied Douglas.
Riflemen are the best troops in the world to
defend
a breast work, but they are the worst to attack
one. I had hopes, however, that we might have
drawn out the enemy by some device, even when
Mason commanded. He is too brave to be
ashamed
to be prudent. I wish I knew whom they have
sent to supersede him. But, whoever he is, it is a
hundred to one, that being set over the head of an
abler man, he will be impatient to show his
superiority
by reversing his predecessor's plans, and
shaming
the prudence of Mason by some hasty display of
valor. If I did but know who was in command!
I tried to find that out, replied Schwartz;
because I knew you were pretty well acquainted
with the most of them. You remember, sir, you told
me from the first almost exactly how this Col. Mason
was going to do. But I could not find any body that
could tell me the new Colonel's name. But,
whoever
he is, Mr. B thinks, and so do I, (but that is
nothing,) and I have a notion you do too partly, sir,
that if we mean to do any thing with them, we must
try to catch them somewhere between here and
Lynchburg.
I am afraid that is all too true, said Douglas,
and if no such chance offers, we shall have to give
them the slip as B proposes; and I should hate it.
And so would I, said Schwartz; and so, you
see, sir, I have been trying to fix a sort of a plan to
draw them out, and that is what I want to tell you
about.
What this plan was, the next chapter shall
disclose
.
CHAPTER XXXII.
And yet I knew him a notorious liar;
Think him a great-way foolsolely a coward.
Shakspeare
You
must understand, Captain, continued
Schwartz, that I had allotted to fall in with your
brother about Little Roanoke bridge, where our roads
come together. The people there are friendly, and
mighty clever people, and if they don't know all about
me, they don't want much of it; for they are our own
sort of folks, and true as steel. So I thought I could
depend on them to take notice for me when such a
man might pass, and let me know. When I got
there, by all I could learn, your brother had not gone
by; and, as I was pretty tired, and that is one of the
places where I commonly lie by to pick up news, I
thought I would stop a while.
I had not been there long, before here comes
the Captain that commands the company at
Farmville
;
and, if ever I saw a conceited fool, you may
be sure he is one. What he was after, the Lord
knows. He said he was a reconnoitering, but I have
8
a notion he was just looking for some body to talk
to; and as the folks there an't got much chat for any
body, he just claps to talking to me. And he run
on about one thing and another, and there was
nothing I wanted to know but what he told me, only
just I knew it all before. But I thought, may be, I
might get something out of him, so I let him talk,
and I sot and listened.
After a while he gets to talking about you. And,
Lord! how he wished you would come in his way;
and how he would have served you, if you had tried
to beat up his quarters, like you did them fellows at
Lynchburg. But he was in hopes to have a clip at
you yet, only just you were always hiding and
skulking in the mountains, like a wolf, and then
coming down in the night to kill sheep. And he
reckoned
you knew
where the
dogs
was, and took
care to keep out of their way. And then he laughed,
and thought he was mighty smart. So, thinks I,
`stranger, if you have a mind to get into hot water,
may be you may have a chance.' So I speaks up;
and, says I, `after all, that Captain Douglas an't
half the man he's cracked up for, no how.'
Do you know him? says he.
I guess I do, says I; he is cunning enough,
and he has got tricks enough, and signs and
countersigns
to keep out of harm's way; but, says I,
if a man could just get hold of his signs, and so
get at him, he an't nothing for a right, real, hard
fight.
They tell me, says he, there an't no such
thing as getting in twenty miles of him, or more,
may be; and all the folks through the country there
stands guard for him, and nobody else knows where
he is.
That's very true, says I; but then, you see,
stranger, when too many folks has got a secret,
then it an't a secret no more.
It's a wonder, says he, some of them don't
tell.
May be they cannot get any thing by telling,
says I. There's many a poor fellow there, to my
knowing, that don't see a dollar once a year, and its
mighty little the sight of a few yellow jackets would
not make them tell, only just they never seed any,
and don't know what they are. But they'd be right
apt to find out.
You talk like you know that part of the country,
says he. May be
you
know something about it.
May be I might, says I. But then, says I,
it don't become a poor fellow, like me, to know
any thing that a grand officer, with his fine
apperlets
,
all of solid gold, don't know. Lord! says I,
if I had but half the money you give for your
apperlets, I
reckon
I'd know something then.
And with that, he looks right hard at me, and
says he, may be you'd like to list for a soldier.
May be I would, says I, if they pays me
well. 'Cause, you see, says I, sir, as to the
country and the President, and all that, its what I
don't know nothing about; only I takes their part as
takes my part. And that's the reason, says I, I
would not stay up yonder.
Why, says he, do you live there, when you
are at home?
I cannot say, says I, that I have got a home
rightly any where. But I did
live
there, after a
fashion; and they wanted me to do like the rest of
them, and quit my business and keep guard, and
stop every man that could not give the signs. And
what was I to get by it? Just nothing at all. If I
had any bread of my own to eat, why, I might eat
it; and if I killed a deer, they'd take their share, and
thought they did great things if they let me keep the
skin; but as to pay, they don't think of such a thing.
But that would not do for me, says I; and, more
than that, it won't do for more, besides me,
whatever
Captain Douglas may think of it, I can tell
him.
Well, says he, if you'll list with me you shall
have pay, and bounty, and clothes, and rations, and
all. 'Cause, says he, the President, he keeps
the key of the treasury, and we are his soldiers, and
we all live like fighting cocks, I can tell you.
Well, says I, I'd like to list well enough,
only just I guess if once you had me for a soldier,
you'd make me tell all I know, and ax me no odds;
and, says I, I have been a-thinking, if I could
meet with any right clever gentleman, that would
pay me for telling, I'd tell it all first, and then list
afterwards.
Well, says he, do you know Douglas's signs,
enough to carry a man to his camp as a friend?
I guess I do, says I, and more than that,
too.
And what do you know, says he.
That's telling, says I.
But, says he, I
want
to know all about it,
says he, because Col. Mason, there, at Lynchburg,
is determined to break Douglas up, if he can get at
him; and he is looking every day for more men from
the North to help him.
Well, says I, I can put him in a way to get
at him, and not go up there into the mountains,
neither. 'Cause, says I, that's an ugly place. It
an't one regiment, nor two neither hardly, that could
do much there. And then, again, if Douglas was to
find too many coming against him, he'd be away
t'other side of Salem before they'd get there.
And how is a body to get at him? says he.
Ah! says I, that's a long story.
Well, says he, I see what you are after, and
if you'll put me in a way to give Col. Mason a fair
clip at him, it will make my fortune, and then I'll
be bound to see you paid handsomely.
That an't what I am after, says I.
Why, don't you want money? says he.
To be sure I do, says I; but that an't
money.
Well, says he, tell me what you can do, and
I will tell you what I'll do.
That's something like, says I. As to what
I can do, I can put you in a way to catch Captain
Douglas out of the mountains, with as many men as
you please to bring agin him.
Well, says he, if you'll do that, I'll pay you
a hundred dollars.
The dear Lord! says I. A hundred dollars!
I never expected to have that much money in my
life!
May be it's too much, says he. May be fifty
will do?
No, no, says I; a hundred will do mighty
well; so let me have the cash, and I'll tell you all.
That won't do, says he. How do I know
that what you are going to tell me will do me any
good?
Well, says I, I reckon if one won't another
will.
So, with that, he studied a while, and says he:
Well, I'll give you my note for a hundred dollars,
to be paid directly after Col. Mason gets a lick at
Douglas in the low country, by my help.
Cannot you give me an order on Mr. Morton,
here, in the same way? says I.
You are mighty tight, says he; but may be
I can.
So, with that he speaks to Mr. Morton, and he
agreed to accept the order. You see, sir, Mr.
Morton, as I told you, is a true-hearted Virginian;
and he knows me, and I just sorter winked at him,
to let him know all was safe. For as to that fellow
paying him again, after he paid me, Mr. Morton
had'nt no thought of it, nor I neither. But he seed
what I was after, and says he to the Captain: To
be sure, sir, its nothing I would not do to serve the
country. And with that they fixed the order all
right, and gives it to me, and I slips it back again
into Mr. Morton's hand. And then I takes the
Captain out again, and tells him the way up here;
and, says I, Now, if you can get to see Captain
Douglas, you must fix a good story to tell him.
And what must that be? says he.
Why, you have only just to tell him that you
have raised a parcel of men in Bedford county, or
somewhere thereaway, sorter toward Lynchburg,
and you want to know where to join him. Then
he'll be sure to tell you when he is coming down out
of the mountains, and he'll name a place for you to
meet him at, and then if you don't fix him about
right, it an't my fault.
But how am I to get to him? says he.
That's it, says I, and that's what you never
could do without help. You see, says I, sir, every
man in that country lives by hunting, more or less;
and every man has a rifle for himself, and one for
every one of his boys, and may be more. And when
a fellow is going any where, he never knows when
he may see a deer; so you never can catch them
without their rifles. But then you may travel all
through the country, and you won't see a man that
looks any ways like a soldier. And when they want
to stop a man, they don't bawl at him and ask
for the countersign. That sort of thing may do in
an army, but it won't do with folks that have not
got an army to back them. So you may fall in with
ever so many of them, and they'll find you out; but
if they choose to let you pass, you'll never find them
out, nor know what they are after.
But how are they to find me out, says he, if
they an't got no countersign?
They an't got no countersign,
rightly
, says I;
but it is pretty much the same thing, if a man asks
you a civil question, and you don't know what
answer
to give him. Now, suppose you was travelling
along there, and you meets one of them fellows, and
he was to ask you, mighty innocent like, what parts
you were from. What would you say?
I don't know, says he. May be I'd tell him
I was from down about Halifax court-house.
And that minute, says I, he'd know all about
you.
How's that, says he.
Why, that 's the way they ax for the
countersign
,
says I.
What is the countersign? says he.
Currituck
, says I; when they ax you that,
you must say you come from Currituck.
And is that all? says he. Why, that is a
countersign, sure enough. But don't they never
change it?
No, says I; the men are too much scattered
all through the country, for that; but it answers
mighty well, the way they fix it. They don't let
you off with one question, just so, but they'll ask
you a heap more; and they'll say a heap of simple
things to you, just to hear what you'll say; and just
about the time you think you have fooled them,
they'll find you out. There's a parcel of sharp fellows
up thereaway, mind, I tell you; and you'll have to
get your lesson mighty well before you go there.
You see, some will ask you one question and some
another. You don't know what its going to be; so
I must tell you all the straight of it, and you must
practise before we part; and then, says I, you
can write it all down, and all the way you go you
can be saying it over. So, with that, sir, I tells
him the biggest part of our questions; but you may
be sure I give him wrong answers to every one of
9
them. But then I told our people at the different
stations
along about him, and told them to pass him, and
never let him know but what his answers were all
right. So then I tells him that when he got to you,
you would want to know, may be, how he came by
the signs; and, says I, when he axes you that,
you must tell him you got them from Job Dixon,
says I. That's a fellow the Captain keeps busy
recruiting away down the country, and when he
hears that, he wont suspicion you the least in the
world; 'cause you see, says I, the man they call
Job Dixon has got another name besides that, and
that name an't nothing but a sort of a countersign
for the Captain to know the men by that he sends
in. You see, Captain, I fixed all this way, that I
might let you know exactly, so that if the fellow
should come when I was out of the way, you might
know what to think of him, just as if I was here.
And it won't do to let him see me, no how.
Job Dixon!
said Douglas. Well, let me
make a memorandum of that name.
Saying this, he took a letter from his pocket, and
endorsing the name of Job Dixon on the back of it,
as that of the writer, threw it on the table.
That will do, said Schwartz. He will be
here bright and early in the morning, and when he
sees that, he will feel as safe as a rat in a mill.
Here in the morning! said Douglas. How
can you be sure of that?
I seed him from the top of the mountain,
replied Schwartz, when Witt stopped him. I told
Witt to keep him all night, and send him on in the
morning, with a couple of fellows to show him the
way, and guard him.
If that is the case, said Douglas, I can meet
him at the piquet, and stop him there; for I would
rather he should not see this place. But what
arrangement would you advise me to make with
him?
Why, the Colonel says, replied Schwartz,
that he wants you to join him at his rendezvous
about the last of November, or may be a little earlier;
so whatever you do ought to be done time enough
to fall back, if we get worsted, and slip along down
the line, according to your old plan. So I am a
thinking it would be well to fix the time for meeting
this fellow about the tenth of the month, and then, if
we can catch them in their own trap, we shall have
time to follow up the blow and break up their whole
establishment there at Lynchburg, and then march
boldly down the straight road.
Do you know of any crossing place on Staunton
river, in the direction of Lynchburg, asked
Douglas
,
that would answer for an ambuscade?
I have a notion, said Schwartz, that Jones's
Ford would suit as well as any other; because there's
a deep hollow comes down on both sides of it, and
thick woods on the hills.
That will do then, said Douglas. So now
let us take our supper and go to rest; for I must be
at the picket in time to meet your man. Before you
go to sleep, suppose you send one of our boys to
tell them to stop him if he gets there before me.
The supper was produced, and fully justified
what Witt had told Arthur of the fare he might
expect. As to lodging, bear-skins were plenty, and
so were blankets, which had been collected during
the expedition against Lynchburg. But a rock is a
hard bed, put on it what you will. Yet youth, and
health, and high excitement, gave Arthur a most
luxurious supper, and a night of such sleep as the
best lodged prince in Europe might envy.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
The sunken glen, whose sunless shrubs must weep.
When
Arthur awoke, he found himself alone.
The sun was high in the heavens, but a deep shadow
hung over the dark glen, into which his rays never
looked, except at noon-day. Arthur now walked
out, and amused himself with gazing around on the
singular spot which his brother had chosen as a place
of refuge. It was, indeed, a place of strength, which
seemed calculated to bid defiance to any thing but
famine.
The glen, at this point, might be some two
hundred
feet deep. Above and below, the little stream
filled the whole chasm, pouring furiously along
between
overhanging cliffs. The tops of these, except
in the immediate vicinity, were crowned with lofty
trees, which, nodding to each other across the gulph,
in some places nearly intermingled their branches.
The valley, just where Douglas had pitched his camp,
was somewhat wider. Just above, the stream
seemed
to gush from the very bowels of the mountain,
dashing, as it tumbled over a fall of twenty or thirty
feet, against the dark evergreens which clustered both
sides of the gulph. From thence, flowing through
9
a wider space, it still confined itself to a narrow and
deep channel, scooped into an almost cavernous bed,
under the western cliff. Thence, turning abruptly to
the southeast, it swept across the dell to the opposite
hill, from which it again recoiled in like manner.
There was thus, on each side, between the hill and
the receding stream, a spot of dry ground, or rather
rock. It was indeed nothing but a rocky shelf, a
little above inundation, jutting in a half moon from
the base of the cliff. About the middle of its passage
from hill to hill, the stream tumbled over a ledge,
the highest points of which, rising above the water,
served as stepping stones, and afforded a passage
across, practicable indeed, but neither commodious,
nor, to the eye of a stranger, even safe.
The sort of stair which afforded the only approach
to this savage den, hung directly over the stream, at
the point where, having crossed from the western
side of the glen, it again whirled back, leaving, as I
have said, a dry spot on its eastern margin. At the
upper corner of this shelf, where it touched the cliff,
the path reached the bottom; and an hundred yards
below, at the lower extremity of the same platform,
hung the tent-cloth that indicated the quarters of the
chief.
The sort of cave, the mouth of which was
concealed
by this, was but a deepening of the recess under
the cliff, which every where afforded a partial shelter
from the weather, and a complete defence against
rocks tumbled from above. Under this were the rude
beds and camp-fires of the men, and in front of them
a breast-work of logs, raised high enough to afford
protection from any shot fired from the opposite hill.
Between the upper log and that next below it, was
a sort of loop-hole, made by cutting corresponding
notches in each; and as the edges of the cliffs had
been shorn of all their growth, a man could not show
himself on either, without being exposed to the fatal
fire of men directing their aim with a rest; and in
all the coolness of perfect safety.
The most curious part of the whole establishment
was a sort of mill. At the point where the stream,
breaking over the rocky ledge of which I have spoken,
swept away around the shoulder of the platform, was
placed a small log pen. The end of a shaft,
projecting
from it, overhung the water. Into this were
driven stakes, fitted at one end into large auger-holes,
and, at the other, spread out like a broad oar. These
fan-like extremities dipped in the water, and,
yielding
to its force, kept the shaft revolving night and
day. Machinery equally rude connected its
movements
with those of a pair of light mill-stones, which
found no rest, and required no attention. Though
grinding less than a bushel in the hour, it still ground
on and on, affording coarse bread for the whole
company, and showing how true the old adage, that
fair and softly go far in a day. One man was
seen to replenish the hopper. Others were passing
and repassing, each with his share of meal. The
whole was covered with rude boards. Exposed to the
fire of each cliff, it was, of course, capable of being
made to command both, and some of its features
showed that it was intended to be occupied as a
tower of strength in case of attack.
In short, to the unpracticed eye of Arthur, the
whole presented the appearance of impregnable
security
and well arranged preparation. There was
indeed no present danger, but the place had been
chosen and fitted with a view to the last extremity.
The course of the stream, tending to the South, led
in a few miles into the State of North Carolina, and in
that direction there was an outlet practicable, though
difficult. Between the camp and the State line there
was no point at which the glen could be entered;
and Douglas, if driven to retreat in that direction,
had none but natural obstacles to overcome.
Cold weather was now approaching, and there
was no station where the troops of Douglas were so
little exposed to the severity of the season as this.
The soft air from the waterfall, though never warm,
was never intensely cold, and no other wind but that
from the south ever entered the glen. Hence as
many men as were not engaged on active duty were
assembled here. Still the number present was but
small. Some were at the piquet, some on the scout.
Besides, it was now the hunting season, and many
were abroad in the woods, as the carcasses brought
in during the course of the morning plainly showed.
Arthur now looked around for Schwartz; and
hearing
his voice behind one of the breast-works, passed
around the end of it, and silently joining the circle,
listened to his discourse, which seemed to be a sort
of military lecture.
You see, boys, said he, as to
tictacs
, or
whatever they call it, that sort of thing an't made for
the like of us. When a parcel of fellows lists for
soldiers, just because they an't got nothing else to
do, and may be one half of them is cowards, and the
other half not much better, they are obliged to have
rules to go by. Because, if once you can beat it into
a fellow's head that after he has got into danger it
is safer for him to stand still than to run away, why
then the worse scared he is the surer he will be to stay
there. But it an't so with us, because if any of us
was any way scary, he would not be here no how.
The only rule for us is the Indian rule.
In the first place, it is our business always to
know where the inimy is before he knows where we
are, and then, if we dont want to fight him, keep
out of his way. Now the right way to do that, is
just to squander, like a flock of partridges.
Then if you are going to fight, the only rule is
to give the word, and let every man kill all he can,
and take care of himself the best he can. Now that
way the riglars fight; if one man in ten kills a man,
they call it desperate bloody work. But I reckon if
there was an inimy now coming up the valley to the
foot of the Devil's Back-bone, and the word was
to kill all we could before he got there, any of us
here would feel mighty cheap if he did not kill
somebody
.
And mind, boys, whether we fight or run, whether
we keep together, or squander, `two and two,' is
the word. You must all mate yourselves two and
two, to stand together and run together, to fight
together and die together. One of you must call
himself
number one, and the other number two, and then,
if there's a hundred together and the inimy comes,
number two never fires till number one has fired and
loaded again. You see, men, a fellow takes good
aim, when he knows there's another one by, to hit if
he misses; and fifty rifles in that way, will do more
than a hundred when every one knows that's his last
chance. Fifty rifles will stop a troop of horse, and
a hundred cannot do no more. But if the guns are
all empty, then here comes what's left of them
slashing
away with the broad-swords like devils. But
let there be a few more guns to pepper away at them
while the first are loading, and they will go to the
right-about mighty quick.
Now mind what I tell you, boys, and the first
time it comes to the pinch, you'll say old Schwartz
did'nt fight Indians so long for nothing. And as to
running, any man that's afraid to run when he sees
cause, is half a coward, any how. Do you run just
when you please. I God! I'd hate to depend on a
man to fight that I could not trust to run. There is
no harm in running, if you know where you are
running to, and your friends know it too; and the
right way is to fix a place, every morning, to meet
at night, and let every man get there as he can, and
do what mischief he can. But, mind, if it comes to
that, always run two and two, and then one can help
another; and if one comes up missing, the other
can tell what's become of him.
I'm telling our boys, continued Schwartz, who
now observed Arthur, some of the lessons I learned
among the Shawnees. You see, Mr. Arthur, (you
must not think strange of my calling you so, sir, for
all your family seem like my own flesh and blood to
mefor all you don't know how that is;) you see,
sir, the Captain is a regular officer, built plum from
the ground up; but for all that, he knows that all this
is true; and, before now, when he and I have been
setting over the fire, at night, he has told me about
one Gineral Braddock, I think they called him,
that got his men shot all to pieces, and himself too,
just because he would not believe that there was any
other way to fight but just his way. Now, you see,
sir, the reason why he was taken at an
onplush
was,
that he was fighting agin Indians. Well, suppose
we fight Indian-fashion; will not that be pretty
much the same thing? May be we an't exactly up
to that, but we must do the best we can; for as to
fighting the riglars just in their own way, why
they'll beat us as long as the sun shines.
Do you mind that night, continued Schwartz,
laughing, when the Lieutenant and his men came
there to your uncle's to take him and the Captain?
That was Indian play for you. I God! if I had not
heard
that the Colonel was there, I should have
knowed he was at the fixing of that business. You
see, sir, that is what a man learns by living in places
where a body is never safe; and the upshot of it is,
that after a while he gets so that he never can be in
any danger. It's like learning to sleep with one eye
always open.
Schwartz now rose from the ground, where he
had been sitting, and brushing the ashes from his
leathers, joined Arthur, and they repaired to the tent
where their simple meal awaited them. From him
the youth learned that his brother had repaired to
the piquet at an early hour; and to the piquet,
gentle reader,
we
will now follow.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
He has merit;
Sufficient for itself its own reward.
Why think of him! An honorable fool,
He seeks no other guerdon.
Anonymous
.
Douglas
was at the piquet long enough before
the arrival of his guest, to make such arrangements
as should prevent the stranger from suspecting that
this was not the camp he was desirous to see. He
had no mind that his enemy should know the real
nature and precise position of his main strong-hold.
Hence he had determined to give him the meeting at
the piquet, and took pains to provide, as if for his
own ordinary accommodation, such a breakfast as he
would have been content to furnish at his own
quarters
for the most honored visiter.
The spy, who had learned little of his profession
but that self-indulgent art which is technically
called playing old soldier, had been in no
haste to leave his rest, and Witt, who understood
Schwartz's game, did not hurry him. The breakfast
hour, therefore, had fully arrived before he made
his appearance. He came accompanied by Witt and
10
another of his party; and, in appearance and
manners
,
fully answered the description of him given by
Schwartz. He was a tall, red-haired man, vain,
pert, and full of self-complacency. Indeed, so
much did he display of a satisfaction, at once
chuckling and childish, that Douglas, even though
unwarned, must have suspected treachery. Besides,
he never could have believed a being, manifestly so
frivolous and foolish, capable of the high purpose of
devoting himself to a life of toil, hardship, and
danger. The vain and self-indulgent may receive
momentary impulses, under the influence of which
brilliant achievements may be suddenly
accomplished
;
but from such the tasks of study, virtue,
and enduring courage, must never be expected.
He seemed, at first, more intent upon his
breakfast
than any thing else, and when it appeared, made
faces at his coarse fare which ill accorded with his
professed indifference to all personal inconvenience.
But, bad as it was, he contrived to swallow enough
to show that he was not prepared to play the ascetic
any more in regard to the quantity than the quality
of his food.
You see, said Douglas, the life we lead. If
you are not prepared to submit cheerfully to
privations
,
compared to which what you see here is
luxury, you should not join us.
Damn luxury, said the other. What do I
care about luxury? To be sure, I have been used to
it all my life; coffee or tea, one, every morning for
breakfast, and good light bread, and potatoes, and
pies; and then, for dinner, pork or fresh meat, or
codfish
,
at least every day in the week, and all sorts of
sass
, and then pies again, and cheese, and all that.
But I am ready to give it all up to serve my country,
and live as hard as any body.
I am glad to hear it, said Douglas, drawing
some papers from his pocket. Among these he
affected to search in vain for a particular paper, and
in doing so, carelessly threw on the table the letter
endorsed with the name Job Dixon. He saw that
it caught the other's eyes, and, expressing some
dissatisfaction at his own carelessness, said: You
have a right to know, before you join us, all about
our force, and I ought to show you my last return;
but I have it not at hand, though I believe I know
pretty well the number of my men. But stay,
continued
he, interrupting himself with a start, and
looking at the gallant Captain with a keenness that
made his very back ache, How came you by my
pass-words, sir?
I got them from a man they call Job Dixon,
replied the trembling Captain.
Job Dixon! replied Douglas, immediately
resuming
his complacency; then all is right.
O yes! all is right, said the other, recovering
from his alarm, but more fluttered and confused than
ever. He told me that wa'nt his name, sure
enough, and he said that name was only a sort of a
countersign to you.
It cost Douglas some effort to suppress a smile at
seeing the delicate and dangerous office of a spy
undertaken by one so destitute of all the qualities
necessary to it; but he commanded himself, and
asked whether the other was now content to join
him.
To be sure I am, said he; and not only I,
but fifty more as good fellows as ever stepped
shoe-leather
.
You see, that was what I doubted about.
I thought may be as I had such a company, I had a
right to set up for myself; but after I heard all about
you from that man, Job Dixon, or whatever else his
name is, I made up my mind to join you.
Where are your men? asked Douglas.
They are all about home yet, said the Captain,
but I can bring them together any day, and any
place you please to name. I suppose you don't
mean to stay up here in the mountains all the time,
and may be it might suit as well for me to fall in
with you somewhere.
That is true, said Douglas. We are not so
well off here for rations, as to want any body before
we have use for them. As long as we stay here we
are strong enough. A regiment of men could not
climb the Devil's Back-bone before our faces. But
I propose to move shortly, and should be glad of a
reinforcement on the way. What county are your
men in?
In Bedford county, replied the other, repeating
his lesson exactly.
That will do, then, said Douglas. I propose
to march against Mason, at Lynchburg, early in
November, and on the fifth day of the month I will
meet you at Jones's Ford, on Staunton river.
I cannot say that I know exactly where that is,
said the spy.
It is little out of your way into any part of
Bedford
county, said Douglas; and as I want to see
some of our friends down in that quarter, I will ride
there with you. I am told Mason is pretty strong,
and I want to get all the force I can, and that is not
so much but what I shall be glad of your help.
How many men have you? asked the Yankee
Captain.
I have but a handful
here
, just now; but I am
sending out orders for more to join on the route, and
I am in hopes to reach the river with four hundred
at least. I shall stay there, at all events, till more
come in; because it would be foolish to attack
Mason's regiment with less than five or six hundred.
That will do, said the other; for Mason is
not more than four hundred strong.
Indeed! replied Douglas, affecting surprise
and pleasure. Then I am pretty sure of him. I
had heard as much before, but I don't trust every
10
body. I was afraid there was a trap set for me; but
now I am satisfied, and if I can leave Staunton river
with six hundred men, I shall gather force enough
before I get to Lynchburg to drive Mason and his
regiment before me like chaff.
Having said this, Douglas set about the necessary
arrangements for accompanying his new
acquaintance
to Jones's Ford. As the distance was too
great for one day, he proposed to pass the night at
the house of a trusty friend, from whence the Yankee
officer would have it in his power to reach a tavern,
two miles beyond the river, the next day. He now
despatched a note to Arthur, saying that he wished
to examine the ground at the river, in company with
him and Schwartz. He therefore directed them to
follow at a cautious distance, so as not to be seen
by the spy; to pass them in the night, and take up
their quarters at a house in advance, and the next
day proceed to the dwelling of Mr. Gordon, (a
staunch friend,) near the river, and wait for him
there. Meantime a horse, that stood piqueted hard
by, was saddled, and Douglas set out, accompanied
by the treacherous Captain and the faithful Witt.
The journey was made without any occurrence
worth noting. In the conversation of the stranger
there was nothing to beguile Douglas from his own
thoughts. The vain babble of the prating coxcomb
was all wasted on the impenetrable Witt; and, after
a few fruitless attempts to overcome the taciturnity
of his companions, he followed their example, and
the greater part of the journey was made in silence.
Late on the second evening they reached the river.
The spy was directed to the public house on the
other side, and Douglas and Witt returned to Mr.
Gordon's, where they found Arthur and Schwartz.
As they were now in a land of civilization and
comfort, Douglas was not sorry to obtain, once
more, a good night's lodging, which his hospitable
friend was delighted to afford. But this rare
enjoyment
did not make him forgetful of the necessity of
watching the motions of his enemy. He accordingly
despatched a scout to the house to which the Yankee
had been directed, to make sure that he had gone on.
At a late hour the man returned, and roused
Douglas to inform him that the spy had indeed
gone as far as he had intended, and that he had
there fallen in with a party of a dozen dragoons,
commanded by a subaltern, who were on a scout
through the country. With this officer he had been
seen to be engaged in private and earnest
conversation
,
and orders had been issued to the men to look
well to the condition of their arms, and to be in
readiness
to move at day-light.
It at once occurred to Douglas that a new scheme
had entered the head of the vain and frivolous being
who had thrust himself into an affair requiring
qualities so different. It was probable that he wished
to avail himself of the presence of this little party to
endeavor to surprise his enemy, whom he had reason
to believe to be still near the Ford. The folly of
risking the defeat of his favorite enterprise by
joining in the attempt, and thus throwing off his
mask, was not likely to occur to him. The question
with Douglas was, whether by abiding the attack he
should afford the bungling fool, whom he had been
leading into his own trap, a chance to escape from
it by his own blunder. In this apprehension,
however
,
he did not give that worthy due credit for his
discretion. He had indeed considered Douglas as
his proper prey; and though he had been unable to
restrain his disposition to babble, he sorely repented
his indiscretion, when he found the other officer
disposed to anticipate him. He had accordingly
earnestly dissuaded him from attempting any thing;
and, not prevailing in this, had determined to go on
alone, and leave the other to execute his project as
he might.
But though uncertain what might be the conduct
of the spy, Douglas could not resist his inclination
to throw himself in the way of the expected attack.
It was necessary that he should examine the ground
carefully, and he had not time to wait until the
scouting party should have left the neighborhood.
Besides, he was anxious to inform himself precisely
of the force and position of the enemy, and the name
of their new commander. For this purpose he was
eager to make at least one prisoner. And, after all,
perhaps not the least moving consideration, was his
desire to taste once more the stormy joy of battle.
Upon the whole, he determined to turn the tables
on his enemy, if possible; and, instead of returning
to bed, prepared immediately for action. All things
were soon ready. The master of the house, his two
sons, and three of the neighbors, who, hearing that
he was there, had called to see him, added to his own
party, made a force of ten men, with which he was
not afraid to abide the attack of thirteen. At the
head of these he took the road, and by daylight had
occupied the ground where he wished to meet the
enemy.
At the point of which we speak, the road, after
passing for some miles over a broad and level ridge,
at the distance of a quarter of a mile from the river,
dives suddenly into a steep defile between two hills.
The descent is rapid, and, in less than a hundred
yards, the hills come down abruptly on either hand,
leaving between them barely space enough for the
road, which is quite narrow. They are steep,
rugged, with projecting rocks, and altogether
impracticable
to cavalry; and are moreover covered with a
heavy growth of timber and brushwood. At the
distance of about two hundred yards from the plain
above, the road turns sharp to the right. It then
pursues a course nearly direct, for a like distance;
and then, turning short to the left, the river, ford,
and the opposite landing, are at once in full view.
A point a little below the first mentioned bend
was selected by Douglas for his position. He
posted Witt and three others on one side of the
road, behind rocks and trees, while he, Arthur, and
one more, disposed themselves, in like manner, on
the other. Schwartz, with the rest, passed through
the defile, with orders to hide themselves near the
bank, and let the enemy pass without interruption.
A pole had been thrown across the road, some
twenty yards in front of Douglas and his party. The
crossing of this, by the enemy, was to be the signal for
firing. The officer was designated to be the mark
of Witt. The right and left hand man of the
leading
file, had each his appropriate executioner
appointed; then the two next, and then two more,
were in like manner foredoomed, so that no shot
should be thrown away. While these arrangements
were making, Arthur bethought him of Schwartz's
lecture on tactics, and was at once sensible of the
vast superiority of untaught courage and sagacity,
on occasions like this, over the sort of discipline on
which the martinet is so apt to pride himself.
About sunrise, the enemy appeared, consisting,
as the scout had said, of a dozen men, under the
command of a single officer. To the great relief of
Douglas, the redoubtable Yankee Captain was not
with them. As the hill was steep, they advanced in
a walk, while the officer, who was in the rear,
occasionally turned his horse's head to the hill,
seeming
to examine for some recess in which his party
might draw aside, and form a sort of ambuscade.
But there was no such spot. The ground was every
where too steep for cavalry; and, disappointed, he
put spurs to his horse, and pushed forward to resume
his place at the head of the party. They were now
near the fatal point; every rifle was in rest, and duly
levelled at its mark, and in the moment that the
leading file were crossing the pole, six saddles were
emptied, and six horses ran masterless. The aim of
Witt at the officer, who was much more distant, and
moving rapidly, was less fatal. But his ball took
effect, as was plainly shown by the sword arm,
which, at the moment, fell powerless. The men
went to the right about in a moment, and a shout,
which the echoes of the steep gorge multiplied into
a hundred voices, sent them down the hill at full
speed.
The officer, though wounded, was not quite so
ready to take to his heels, and called to his men to
halt. With all but one, he succeeded; but that
one, wild with terror, dashed on. In the mean time,
Schwartz and his little party had planted themselves
in the road, near the river, and their array was the
first object that met the eye of the affrighted soldier
as he turned the angle of the road. But panic is
as apt to hurry a man into danger as away from it,
and the sight of this new enemy only urged the
poor wretch to a more desperate effort to escape,
by breaking by them. In vain did the men throw
up their arms, and call to him to stop. He rushed
on, right upon Schwartz, who stood in the middle
of the road, and who, as a
dernier resort
, stopped
his career with a bullet. The report of his rifle, and
a glimpse of Douglas's men advancing along the
side of the hill to get within shot, decided the officer
that it was time to look to his safety. Turning the
angle of the road, he saw the fate of his fallen
soldier, and the cause of it. Immediately calling
on his men to follow, he dashed on with an
impetuosity
which showed a determination to force a
passage or perish.
The result was inevitable. Schwartz was in the
act of loading his rifle. The other three leveled
theirs. They had not been trained in Schwartz's
school of tactics, and all three, attracted by the
epaulette
and plume and sash of the officer, fired at
him. He fell dead, and the rest, perceiving their
advantage, rushed on the mountaneers, who, of
necessity
,
sprang aside, and let them pass. One of
them was not so nimble, but that, as he clambered
up the rocky face of the hill, a sweeping back-handed
stroke inflicted a deep gash in the back part of his
thigh. This was the only injury received by the
party of Douglas in the affair, and dearly did it cost
the man who gave it. Schwartz marked him, and
coolly went on loading his rifle. By the time he had
effected this, the soldier was half way across the
river, and, the next moment, tumbled from his horse,
and went floating down the stream. The other five
gained the shore before another rifle could be loaded,
and, doubling a rocky point around which the road
turned, disappeared.
11
CHAPTER XXXV.
This
victory, though on a small scale, was
complete
in itself. It was a favorable omen, too, and
might serve as a sort of rehearsal of the more
important
battle to be fought on the same ground. In
one thing only Douglas had been disappointed, by
the eagerness of Schwartz's men. He had made
no prisoners, and the fallen enemy were all either
dead, or not in condition to be harassed by such
questions as he wished to ask. They were
necessarily
committed to the care of such of the party as
lived in the neighborhood; and their horses and arms
being secured, were placed in the same hands for
safe keeping.
The feelings of Arthur, as he looked on this
fearful
scene of slaughter, were such as might be
expected
to possess the mind of a youth, who, as yet,
had never seen the blood of man shed in strife. But
these are nothing to the purpose of my tale. It is
enough to say, that the contemplation of it wrought
the usual change in his character. He now felt that
to kill or be killed was the order of the day; and,
though his next sleep was haunted by visions of the
ghastly objects that lay before him, he awoke from
it with a mind prepared for the stern duties of war.
Requesting the company and advice of his host,
Douglas now proceeded to examine the ground. He
found the river hills every where intersected, on
both sides of the river, by ravines such as that I
have described. The ford was shallow, but just
above was deep water, which, on the north side,
came down quite near to the gravel bar, which served
as a dam. Here a steep and high rock bounded the
river, and along the base of it, the water eddied in a
deep pool, and then swept away in a stong, but
shallow current. At a short distance below was
the mouth of a ravine, overgrown with lofty trees,
and clustering with brushwood, at a distance of fifty
yards from the landing-place. The road, issuing
from the river at the foot of the rock, holds a straight
course for twenty yards, or thereabouts, and then
turning short to the left, is no more in sight of the
river. From thence a short, but steep ascent through
a deep cleft in the hills, brings the traveller to the
top, where he turns again to the right, and resumes
the direction towards Lynchburg. After a thorough
examination of the whole, the party returned to
breakfast
at the house of Mr. Gordon.
Douglas rode slowly and thoughtfully. At length
he said apart to Schwartz:
Your plot is admirable; but I am afraid it will
fail.
What chance of that? asked Schwartz. They
will be ashamed to bring more than a thousand men
against you, even if they had them. We can raise
as many as they can, and we shall be on the ground,
and have the same advantage we had just now.
But suppose they come and take possession
first; said Douglas.
Oh! no danger of that. They'll be in no
hurry to leave their snug quarters any sooner than
they can help; and we can be here a day or two
before the time.
It may be so, said Douglas; but I don't
think Col. Mason takes me for an absolute fool; and
if he does, he has reason to know that I have
sharp-witted
men about me. But any man's wits may fail
him sometimes. For example, it has never occurred
to either of us, that Mason will certainly not believe
that we have been fooled by such a fellow as this
Yankee of yours. Will he not, therefore, at once
suspect the truth, and conclude that we are trying to
catch him in his own trap?
I God! said Schwartz, that is true. I had
not thought of that. The fellow is too silly to be
made bait of, sure enough. But then, you see,
Captain, we can fix them any how. Mr. Gordon
here can raise men enough, in three days, to keep
them from crossing the river, until we are ready for
them; and then, you know, we can push across a
part of our men, and toll them over. If once we
get them into a right sharp fight, they 'll follow us
across the river fast enough.
I have no doubt of their coming to look for us,
said Douglas; and no doubt of a fight; but we
must be prepared to meet more men than we have
bargained for. Depend upon it, they will bring every
man they can raise. Why, would you believe it, the
fellow talked to me about living at home on codfish,
and potatoes, and cider, and pies, and
all sorts of
sass?
Such a simpleton could not impose on a
child. Col. Mason has talents worthy of a better
cause, and he will see through the whole affair. I
suppose he is superseded; but he is an honorable
man, and will frankly give the benefit of his
suspicions
to his superior, who can hardly be such a fool
as to disregard his suggestions. We must bestir
ourselves, therefore, or give up the game and escape
from our own plot.
Gentlemen, continued Douglas, speaking aloud,
and in a sustained and decisive tone, this is our
place of rendezvous; the time mid-day on the third
of November. Every man must come prepared for
action, and such as mean to accompany me to the
lower country, must bring with them all their
necessaries
.
Mr. Gordon, I must depend on you to hold
this pass, and keep the enemy from crossing the
river. I shall send a force to support you, if
necessary
.
You, Schwartz, know what to do better than
I can tell you. You, Witt, will return with me, and
11
we will talk, as we ride, of what is to be done. Mr.
Gordon,
we
could travel without food, but our horses
cannot. We must trouble you for something for all,
and then we part until the day of rendezvous. Until
that time, `Vigilance and Activity' is the word; but
then, `
Freedom, Independence
, and
Glory
.'
As Douglas said this they arrived at Mr. Gordon's
door. The ready meal was hastily swallowed, the
horses fed, and they departed for the camp. On the
way Schwartz, turning to the left, kept a southward
course through the district, along the foot of the
mountains, to rouse the inhabitants in that quarter,
and to collect a party to support Mr. Gordon. The
rest returned to the camp, from whence runners were
despatched throughout all the adjacent country, and
even beyond the mountain to the head-waters of the
Holston. Leaving them thus employed, let us repair
to the head-quarters of the enemy.
In the handsome parlor of a handsome house, in
the suburbs of Lynchburg, we find two officers seated
at a game of piquet. The hour is nine at night.
The room is richly furnished. A bright fire burns on
the hearth, and the blaze of sconce and astral lamps
sheds its soft, luxurious, moonlight beams into
every corner. Wine, cordials, fruits, and cigars are
placed on a table, and every-thing betokens comfort
and luxury, ease and indolence. The dress of these
officers corresponds with the scene. Both glitter
with gold and flutter in lace, and their richly
mounted
swords and highly finished pistols, which lie on
the table, show that the owners abound in the means
of display and self-indulgence.
Such was indeed the fact. The pay of the army,
gradually increased by law during thirty years, had
grown to a noble revenue. The
emoluments
, as they
are called, under a system of fraud and connivance,
had advanced (
without law
) yet more rapidly; so
that to be a Colonel in the army of the United States
was to be a rich man. Such was the rank of both
these officers. It was true that the treasury had
already begun to feel the drain of the vast sums
accumulated under an iniquitous tariff, and now
employed to fortify the tyranny that had enforced
that pernicious system. The loss of the southern
trade gave reason to fear that the supply now on
hand, if once exhausted, would not be speedily
renewed. But the rulers felt but the more sensibly
that the energetic employment both of force and
corruption was necessary to retain the little that
remained, by holding Virginia in subjection. With
this view, the same system of wasteful expenditure,
commenced twenty years before, was kept up; and
all who served the crown with becoming zeal were
encouraged to hold open their mouths that they
might be filled.
In another part of the room a company of
subalterns
fluttered around a bevy of fair damsels. To
these young ladies the mistress of this mansion had
of late become an object of much increased regard.
No friend was so dear, no society so desirable, no
house so pleasant to visit at as hers. Many an extra
visit did she receive, since the abounding loyalty of
her husband had invited the commandant of the post
to make it his head-quarters. Many a wistful glance
had been cast during the evening, from the assiduous
subalterns, toward the handsome and unheeding
wearer of two epaulettes, to whose authority all who
approached him were bound to bow. But it was all
in vain. Sufficient to himself, he valued not the
admiring eyes which were bent upon him; or if they
occupied any thing of his attention, it was to be
made the subject of invidious comparison with the
ladies of the highest fashion in the northern cities,
whose lavish attentions had rendered him totally
heedless of the vulgar admiration of a parcel of
half-bred
Virginia girls.
These remarks, however, apply to only one of the
officers in question. The other manifested no such
insensibility, though his attentions to the fair were
only marked by a staid courtesy, hardly more
flattering
than the perfect indifference of his companion.
Still he paid such attention as it becomes a
gentleman
to pay to every thing that wears the exterior of
a lady. But the day when he was himself an object
of court to them was past. Indeed, the ladies had
already begun to despair of thawing the coldness of
his temperament, when, being superseded by a
younger and handsomer commander, he was laid on
the shelf and condemned as quite
pass
.
But it is high time to make the reader acquainted
with the two military gentlemen, to whose presence
he has been introduced.
The reader, without doubt, already understands
that, of the two officers before us, the elder in years,
though the younger in commission, is Col. Mason,
late commandant of the post. His companion is
Col. Owen Trevor, whose impatience for distinction
has been indulged by sending him to Lynchburg
with his regiment. Here, taking rank of Mason, he
has been in fact placed in command of a brigade,
with an understanding that time and opportunity
will be afforded him to show himself qualified for the
rank, by discharging the functions of a brigadier.
This post has been assigned him because in this
direction is the only enemy actually in arms.
Although the force under the command of Douglas
had been originally but a handful, Mason had seen
that it possessed, in a marvellous degree, the faculty
of occasional expansion. His intelligence had taught
him to expect that it would ere long be greatly
increased
,
if not crushed by a vigorous movement on his part.
Hence he was desirous of acting on the offensive,
especially as he had no doubt, from the past, that
Lynchburg was the object of Douglas. But he had
seen enough of the character and resources of his
enemy to know that a small force would be
unavailing
,
and had therefore earnestly desired to be
reinforced
.
In answer to this request he had received,
not the moderate aid that he had desired, but an
order to surrender his command to Col. Trevor,
whose well-appointed regiment was ordered to the
post.
Col. Mason was a man of honor and talent. He
was one of the many subjects of that strong delusion
which had so extensively prevailed; and, under the
influence of which, Virginia, for thirty years, had
been sacrificing the
substance
of liberty and
prosperity
to the
forms
of a constitution devised to
secure, but perverted to destroy them. He belonged,
moreover, to that unfortunate class of partisans whom
it is safe to neglect. Acting on
principles
, however
erroneous, it was clearly seen that these alone were
sufficient to bind him to the service to which he had
devoted himself. It was at the same time little
doubted that a change of opinions would be followed
by a renunciation of all the advantages of his
situation
,
whatever they might be. To waste on such a
man the means of corrupting the corruptible, and
securing the faithless, would indeed have been
ridiculous excess. He had won his way to his
present rank by the strict performance of every duty
of the subordinate offices, through which he had
risen by regular gradation. In the shuffling and
cutting of the military pack, he had seen junior
officers placed above him by that sort of
legerdemain
which had so long before procured his master
the name of the magician. He had not indeed
acquiesced tamely in this, but means had been
always found to soothe him, and he had been
retained
in the service by dextrous appeals to that
magnanimity which they who knew not how to
appreciate, yet knew well how to play upon.
But he had not yet forgotten how, ten years
before, some pretext had been found for reversing
the relative rank of himself and Col. Trevor, when
both were very young and both subalterns. But on
that occasion, as usual, some complimentary though
temporary arrangement had been devised to
reconcile
him to that which gave the rank of Captain to
one, whom he, still a Lieutenant, had once
commanded
.
Having repressed his dissatisfaction at
that time, he now felt bound to acquiesce in the
circumstances which placed his former subordinate
immediately in authority over him. If this
occurrence
made him repent his former tameness, now
when it was too late to remonstrate, he did not say
so, but addressed himself with grave precision to the
fulfilment of all his commander's orders.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
Fortuna nimium quem fovet, stultum facit.
Colonel Trevor
was the spoiled child of fortune
and patronage. He was old enough to remember
his father's rise in life. Hence, in estimating his
consequence in society, he had formed a habit of
comparing him with the class from which he sprung,
and not with that more intellectual order of men, in
which he had at last found his proper place, and
where he had long remained stationary in well
ascertained
equality. This circumstance alone made an
important difference between him and his younger
brothers. The sort of retrospect with which he was
most familiar teaches any thing but humility,
however
it may
impress
that lesson on the mind that has
already learned it.
In the commencement of Col. Trevor's military
career, the approbation of his father had been of
more consequence to the usurper than now, when his
throne stood strong on its own foundations. The
character of that worthy gentleman, too, had been
less understood. The President had not been aware
how absolutely the convictions of his own mind and
his high sense of duty supplied the place of those
douceurs
, the frequent repetition and continued
expectation
of which is necessary to bind the faith of
the unprincipled. Before this discovery was made,
Col. Trevor had been already advanced to a rank,
and invested with an adventitious consequence,
which made it important to cultivate him on his own
account. His early training had taught him the
grand maxim of the court: Nothing ask, nothing
have. He had discovered that any display of fixed
principle, however favorable to the usurper's plans,
was no passport to advancement; that rewards were
only for the mercenary, and that they were always
dispensed with a freedom duly proportioned to the
eagerness with which they were sought. The caustic
wit of John Randolph had unintentionally and almost
with his last breath supplied the faction with a
countersign
not to be mistaken. If any man talked about
his principles, (as all men do and must at times,)
there was always at hand some dextrous pimp, whose
business it was to ascertain their number. If they
were found to be either more or less than seven, the
discovery was fatal to his hopes of advancement.
The character of Douglas Trevor had been formed
under circumstances directly the reverse of those
which had operated on his elder brother. He only
remembered his father in the same circles and the
same place in society in which his latter days had been
spent. No change of condition had led the youth to
turn his back on the companions of his boyhood; no
12
rapid promotion had filled him with a fond conceit of
his own consequence, or an overweening eagerness
for rank and emolument; and his unbought fidelity
had shown that he was of the number of those on
whom rewards would be wasted. Thus it happened,
(as it so often does,) that two young men, sons of
the same parents, educated in the same school, and
trained to the same profession, were just the reverse
of each other, in particulars wherein nature had
probably
made little difference between them. So it
was, that while the one was indifferent to duty,
frivolous, self-indulgent, and mercenary, the other
was assiduous, discreet, temperate, and disinterested.
It may be inferred from what I have said, that the
rank of Col. Trevor was already above his merit.
The consequence was, that having reached his
present
elevation by the force of causes not within
himself, his own consciousness afforded no standard
for his farther pretensions. He could see no reason
why he should not be a field-marshal as well as a
colonel. And so it was; for he had no just claims
to either rank on the score of service or qualification.
A stone thrown up, were it endued with
consciousness
and thought, could see no reason, as long as it
was ascending, why it might not fly to the moon. If
my experience in life has taught me any thing, it is,
that a man who sets no bounds to his aspirations,
unless his daily intercourse with the world affords
daily proofs of an intrinsic superiority over all he
meets, is already raised above his merit.
The gentlemen, of whom I have been speaking,
were busily engaged in their game, when the Orderly
in waiting entered and announced an officer who
wished to report himself to the commandant of the
post.
Let him call in the morning, and be damned to
him, said Col. Trevor. Is this an hour to
disturb
a gentleman?
The Orderly saluted and withdrew, but presently
returned to say that the officer had particular
business
with Colonel Mason, and wished to see him
immediately. Mason accordingly left the room, and
was gone but a few minutes, when he too came back.
This officer, sir, said he, asked to see me,
supposing me still in command here. His
intelligence
is for you; and, from what I heard before I
discovered his mistake, it may be important that you
should receive it to-night.
Well, said Trevor, in a tone at once lazy and
peevish, I suppose I must see him. But it is
damned hard that I cannot have a moment's leisure.
Let him come in.
He was summoned accordingly, and proved to be
no other than our acquaintance, the Yankee spy,
whom I now introduce to the reader, as he
announced
himself. He is Captain Amos Cottle, of
the 20th regiment of infantry, in the army of the
United States. His name, I presume, (like that of
the fourteen James Thomsons, in Don Juan,) had
been bestowed in honor of the illustrious bard
immortalized
by Lord Byron. He was invited to take
a glass of wine, and, having seated himself, requested
a private conference with the commanding officer.
This was a signal for the dispersion of the ladies,
and their assiduous attendants, who adjourned to
another room. Mason was about to follow, but the
Colonel carelessly requested him to remain.
Captain Cottle was then invited to open his
budget, which he did by telling what the reader
already knows. Not a sentence did he utter, in
which some indication of folly, vanity, or
indiscretion
did not escape him. All this, however, passed
unmarked of Col. Trevor, whose eyes sparkled at
the welcome intelligence. Nothing could be more
apropos to his wishes, or to the plan of the
President
.
Veni, vidi, vici. The exploit of Csar
was the only parallel to that which he proposed to
achieve. Occasionally he looked to Mason for
sympathy and concurrence with his unexpressed
thoughts. As often he withdrew his eye, chilled
and perplexed by the cold, steady, thoughtful look
of his companion. What could this mean? Could
Mason be insensible to the advantage of the plot, or
indifferent to its issue? Could envy so far prevail
with a man heretofore distinguished by his
disinterested
zeal for the service, as to damp his ardor in
an enterprise of so much promise? He was at first
indignant at this idea, but a little reflection made
him judge his brother-officer with more candor.
Poor Mason, said he to himself. I don't
wonder that he is a little mortified at my good
fortune
.
It is something hard that he should have held
this post so long, without a chance to do any thing,
and that I should have come just in time to rob him
of this. But then, damn it! it is his own fault.
What did he want with a reinforcement against a
parcel of ragged militia? It was right to supersede
an officer who would ask more than one regiment to
meet any number of such ragamuffins that could come
against him. Besides, he ought to have broken up
their den long ago. If Douglas escapes me this
time, it shall not be long before I smoke him out of
his hole, or there is no virtue in gun-powder.
Having thus reasoned himself into a state of
exquisite
self-complacency, he heard the story of
Captain Cottle to the end, and then asked the
opinion of Mason.
I cannot say, replied that gentleman, that I
am prepared to give an opinion.
I hope, said Trevor, that you don't mean to
deny me the benefit of your thoughts.
So far from it, that I make it a point of
conscience
not to speak without having first thought.
When I have done so, I will tell you what I think.
To speak now would be but to give you the crude
12
suggestions of unreflecting and impertinent
presumption
.
I cannot understand, said Trevor, how you
can require time to think in so plain a case.
I might say, in reply, answered Mason, that
as the case is so clear to you, you can hardly need
my advice. Indeed, I understand your request of
it but as a compliment to which I am not insensible,
and which I shall not decline. When I am prepared
to speak, therefore, I shall speak as plainly as if the
case were as full of difficulty to you as it is to me.
Having said this, Mason drew Cottle into
conversation
;
enquired the particulars of his visit to the
mountain; encouraged him to recite his
conversations
with Douglas; and, filling him full of vanity
and conceit by his deferential deportment, made the
light shine through him, so as to expose his folly to
the most careless observer. At length he was
dismissed
for the night, and Mason, addressing Trevor,
said: I am now ready to give you my thoughts. I
could not do so in Captain Cottle's presence; and,
indeed, my mind was not clear until I had some
more conversation with him. I am now satisfied.
Let's hear, then, the result of your cogitations,
asked Trevor, with something of a sneer.
Mason colored slightly, but said, in a calm tone:
I have had some experience of this Captain
Douglas
,
and am morally sure he has not been deceived
by this man, as he supposes.
What! exclaimed Trevor. Do you forget
that Captain Cottle is an officer whose rank is a
pledge for his honor, and who would forfeit his
commission
and his life by bringing false intelligence to
his commander?
I don't doubt his truth, said Mason, but his
sagacity I do doubt. The man is palpably a
Yankee
And the cunning of the Yankee is proverbial,
interrupted Trevor.
It is, indeed, replied Mason; but as he is
not only a Yankee, but obviously so, he could not
have made Douglas believe that he was an
influential
inhabitant of Bedford, a native of the county, and
a zealous stickler for the sovereignty of Virginia.
You give your Captain Douglas credit for a
great deal of sagacity.
And not without reason, said Mason. His
plans, and his manner of conducting them, all show
it. His intelligence appears to be always correct
and ready, and his devices for the concealment of
his own schemes are commonly impenetrable. It is
clear, from many circumstances, that he has agents
who pass through the country unsuspected; and I
should not be surprised if Cottle had fallen in with
one of them. I have no doubt that Douglas will be
found at Jones's Ford on the day appointed; but my
life upon it, instead of coming there to be surprised,
he proposes to come there to surprise you.
Surprise
ME! said Trevor, scornfully.
I have no apprehension that he will surprise
you, said Mason, because I am sure you will take
all proper precaution. I merely mean to say that he
will attempt it.
And be punished for his presumption, said
Trevor. As to precaution, I must use it, to be
sure, superfluous as it may be against a set of
inexperienced
militia.
Of one sort of experience, said Mason, and
that not the least important, they have had more than
we. They have tasted danger more than once; and
their skill in the use of the rifle is such as men who
live with the weapon in their hands, and they alone,
can be expected to acquire.
I hope to bring in some of them as prisoners,
said Trevor, and then we shall see how that is.
I will pit a dozen of our sharp-shooters against a
dozen of them, my horse to yours.
I am not in the habit of betting, replied Mason,
smiling quietly; but, in this case, I dare say I may
do it innocently, as the offence will hardly reach
beyond intention; so I take your bet.
How do you mean? asked Trevor, sharply.
I mean, said Mason, that I am not very sure
that you will take a dozen of them.
Not sure! exclaimed Trevor; how can they
escape me?
I don't profess to understand their craft, said
Mason; but they are hard to catch. In short,
Colonel Trevor, my instructions require me to afford
you all the information I have acquired here. It is
therefore my duty, even without question from you,
to assure you that you are in the midst of a
disaffected
country, and that you are going against an
enemy not to be despised, and among a people
universally
hostile. Knowing these things, and invited
by you to advise what is to be done in this affair,
my advice is to march your whole disposable force
to the appointed place, using every precaution to
guard against surprise. It might be as well to
anticipate
Douglas, so far at least as to understand the
ground, and to occupy it before the day.
And so he takes warning, and escapes me.
By no means. Cottle's scheme will have been
made available so far as to draw him down from the
mountains. You neither need nor desire any other
advantage. But I see that I cannot easily make
myself understood, because our minds are occupied
with different things. You are thinking about the
trap set for Douglas, and I am thinking about the
snare he has laid for you. Depend upon it, Colonel
Trevor, that the old story of catching a Tartar, may
be illustrated by catching Douglas among the river
hills. He may be caught; and yet, neither come
away nor let you come. Observe, continued
Mason
,
when I inquired of this Captain Cottle about
the nature of the ground at the Ford, behold, he had
not taken notice of it! but, on cross-examination,
by finding what he did not see, I am satisfied that
there is no low ground, nor cleared land at the place;
that the hills come sheer down to the river, and, by
almost necessary consequence, that the road leads
through a deep defile. The choice of such a place
confirms my suspicion of Douglas's plan, and affords
the means to counterwork it. If we occupy the
strong points of the ground, and he comes with only
such a body of men as Cottle expects, we take him
without effusion of blood. If he comes in force, our
position will give us all the advantage he seeks;
and, trust me, in that case we shall have need of
them.
Need
of
advantages
against
irregulars!
drawled
Trevor, sneeringly, and emphasizing every word.
Our discipline and experience are of little
consequence
,
said Mason, if we do not use them.
One use of them is to know how to take
advantages
.
Be it so, said Trevor; I shall seek none. A
fair field and a clear sky are all I ask; and I shall
be careful to take no measures which may alarm this
mountain wolf, and drive him back to his den before
I can come up with him.
These words were hardly spoken when the
Orderly
announced that a sergeant of dragoons had just
returned from a scouting party with important
intelligence
,
and had come to make his report to the
Colonel. What this was the reader will infer, when
told that he was the non-commissioned officer on
whom had devolved the command of the four men
who had escaped with him from Jones's Ford. His
information confirmed Mason's suspicions, and might
have served as a damper to the flattering
anticipations
of a man less sanguine than Colonel Trevor.
Its only effect on him was to sharpen his eagerness
for the expected rencontre. Yet the Sergeant, when
questioned, frankly admitted that his party had not
been out-numbered. But it was clear that their
design
had been, by some means, disclosed to Douglas;
and his advantage had been the result of judicious
dispositions, and the skill of his men in the use of
that most terrible of all weapons.
But all this abated nothing of Colonel Trevor's
contempt for a foe unskilled in the manual exercise,
ignorant of the grand manoelig;uvres, and dressed in
buckskin. Every attempt on the part of Col. Mason
to bring him to listen to reason proved fruitless.
Indeed the conversation occasionally took such a
turn as to create a doubt in the mind of that
gentleman
,
whether to press his advice any farther might
not make it difficult to reconcile with his own
self-respect
the deference which he knew to be due to
his commander. He therefore determined to receive
and execute in silence all orders which might be
given, and leave the event to Providence.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
More dreadful far their ire
Than theirs, who, scorning danger's name,
In eager mood to battle came;
Their valor, like light straw on flame,
A fierce, but fading fire!
Freed
at length from his troublesome adviser,
Col. Trevor was left to the uninterrupted enjoyment
of his anticipated triumph. He seemed to tread on
air, and, with a flashing eye, and spread nostrils, to
look forward to the glories, and snuff up the carnage
of the expected fight. Such was his impatience for
the adventure, that, in the eagerness of anticipation,
he gave no thought to the necessary preparations.
It was enough to issue the customary order for the
troops to be in readiness for the march, with a
supply
of cartridges and rations suitable to the
expedition
.
The third day of November at length arrived, and
the troops took up the line of march. As they
issued in glittering rank from the barracks above the
town, the Colonel, proudly mounted on his stately
charger, posted himself in the gateway of the house,
where he had taken up his quarters, and received
their passing salute. The portico of the house was
crowded with female figures; the windows were
clustered with fair faces; the noble oak-trees in the
yard were hung with garlands, in token of the loyalty
of the household, and of anticipated triumph in his
assured victory. But the Colonel saw nothing of
this. His eye saw not the waving of handkerchiefs,
his ear heard not the cheering farewells issuing in
tones of music from rosy lips. He heard only the
spirit-stirring drum and clanging bugle; he saw
nothing but the stately steppings of his well-trained
troops as they marched by; and then, his eye,
following
them, dwelt with delight upon their
picturesque
appearance as they wound along the slope of
the hill, and crossed Blackwater-bridge. Beyond
this, imagination presented objects of yet greater
interest,the battle-field, the tumult of the strife,
the rout, the pursuit, the carnage, the vanquished
leader led in chains to the foot of the throne, the
gracious smile of approving majesty, and the rich
rewards of successful valor. These things he saw;
but saw not the gaunt figure of his host, who stood
near, his strong features and manly person illy
sorting
with the abject part he condemned himself to
act. He sought in vain to catch the eye of the
excited commander, desirous, in his parting words,
to convey some expression of loyalty and zeal.
Colonel Trevor marked him not; and, as the rear
13
of the column was about to pass, put spurs to his
horse, and galloped to the front.
At this point of my story, I must crave the
indulgence
of the reader, while I introduce my humble
self to his notice. A native of South Carolina, and
the heir of a goodly inheritance, which, during a
long minority, had been at nurse in the hands of an
honest and prudent guardian, I was just of age, the
master of a handsome income, and of a large sum of
money in hand. Having a taste for military life, my
guardian had procured me a situation in the military
academy, which had been established by the State,
as a counterpoise to that institution at which the
Federal Government had taught so many of our
southern youths to whet their swords against the
only sovereignty to which they owed allegiance.
My proficiency had been seen, and gave entire
satisfaction
to my teachers. I had imbibed political
opinions which made me a zealous advocate for the
rights of the States, and a strenuous assertor of the
unalienable independence of South Carolina. When,
in compliance with the request of Mr. B, enquiry
had been made for a young man qualified and
disposed
to aid young Trevor in his enterprise, I had
been selected for that purpose. I was invited to
Columbia; made acquainted with the plans of the
insurgents in Virginia, and provided with letters to
my future commander. Journeying to Virginia by
the route that he had pursued, on the evening of the
first day of November I entered the valley described
in the first chapter. I soon encountered a crowd of
men, who filled the road and the yard of a house
contiguous to it. There were wagons, horses, and
arms; and the men, moving quietly but busily, seemed
all earnestly engaged in some important preparation.
I was presently stopped, courteously though
peremptorily; and having expressed a wish to see
Captain Douglas, was conducted to the house. There,
pen in hand, and busily engaged in writing, sat a
young man of small stature and slight figure. Though
quite handsome, there was nothing remarkable in
his features, but a bright gray eye, of calm,
thoughtful
,
and searching expression, strongly contrasted
with the dark brown curling hair that clustered over
his brow.
Being accosted by my conductor, he raised his
head; when I stepped forward, and handed him my
letters. He glanced hastily to the signature of the
first he opened, then read it leisurely, and looking at
me with a beaming countenance, extended his hand.
You are welcome, sir, said he; welcome to
danger's hour. In the morning we march on an
expedition which may decide the fate of the
campaign
.
My engagements must excuse my seeming
neglect of you this evening. But let me make you
known to your future comrades.
Then turning to a fair haired youth, already known
to the reader as Arthur Trevor, he introduced him as
his mother's son. I was then made acquainted with
Schwartz and Witt, and several others. Among the
number were a few young men from the lower
counties
,
of good families and education, who, in this
crisis, had left their homes to engage in this
expedition
.
These, like their leader, had all learned to
accommodate themselves to the fashions of that wild
country, and its wilder climate, and especially to their
own wild life. Each individual was dressed, from
top to toe, in leather, no otherwise differing from the
dress of the rudest mountaineer, than in neatness,
and a certain easy grace, and air of fashion, which
no dress can entirely conceal. In any dress, in any
company, under any circumstances, Douglas Trevor
would have been recognized as a gentleman.
I hardly remember how I fared, or how I passed
the night. As a stranger, I presume somewhat better
than most others; but I took pains to show that I
was content to eat what I could get, and to lodge as
I might.
At daylight we were on the road. But little
attention was paid to order. No enemy was near,
and nobody was inclined to desert. There was
therefore no necessity for harassing men and horses,
by forcing them to keep in ranks. Each man rode
where, and with whom he pleased, except that a
few were directed to keep near the wagons, not so
much to guard as to assist in case of need. It is
impossible to conceive a military array, with less of
the pomp and circumstance of war. The horses
were, for the most part, substantial, and in substantial
order. Their equipments were of the rudest sort.
Plough-bridles and pack-saddles were most
common
.
The only arms were the rifle, knife, and
tomahawk, with their appropriate accompaniments
of powder-horn, charger, and pouch. Douglas,
indeed, had a sword, and the few sabres taken from
the dragoons had been distributed among the
principal
men. But they were all too wise to encumber
their persons with these weapons, which might have
been troublesome in their mode of warfare. A strong
loop of thick leather, stitched to the skirt of the
saddle, in front of the left knee, received the sword,
the hilt of which stood up above the pummel. Two
or three of the saddles were of the Spanish fashion,
the horn of which served to support any trifle the
rider might wish to hang on it. Douglas, in
particular
,
carried, in this way, a leather case,
containing
his writing materials, and serving as a tablet for
writing on horseback.
But rude as these equipments were, yet to one
acquainted with the object of the expedition, there
was an appearance of efficiency in the whole which
gave the corps a truly formidable aspect. The
perfect order of the arms, the strong though rude
dress of the men, their sinewy frames, their
sunburnt
faces; and, above all, the serious and
resolved
expression of countenace which generally
13
prevailed, were tokens which none but a martinet
would overlook.
As yet no duty had been assigned to me, so that
I was perfectly disengaged. It was not until we had
rode several miles, that Douglas found leisure to
converse with me. He then joined me, accompanied
by Schwartz, to whom, in my presence, he explained
my situation. Schwartz heard him with thoughtful
attention, and then said: It is all mighty well, sir,
if Mr. Sidney will only just take it right. You see,
sir, continued he, addressing me, there an't no
officers among us, and we only just call the
Captain
so for short. If he was a Captain or a Gineral
it would not make much odds, because these fellows
just go for what is right and hard fighting; and him
they believe in, him they mind. But as to who is
first and who is second, that's neither here nor there.
I have not a doubt that you are the sort of a man we
want; but all that we can do, is to give you a fair
chance to let the men see it. The Captain can be
asking your advice, now and then, and I and Witt
will do the same, and when they see that, they will
begin to find out what you are. And then, you see,
sir, when once we get to fighting, a man is never in
such a flurry himself, but what he can see who knows
what he is about, and who does not. So, by the
time we have had a skrimmage or two, the men will
know all about you; and whenever the Captain is
out of the way, they will all be looking to you to
know what to do; just in the way of giving your
opinion
, mind; but,
after a while
, it will get to be
orders
. And then, if any thing happens to the
Captain, and Witt and I don't see cause to change
our mind, why, we only just have to follow you, and
the men they follow us, and all will go straight. So
you must just make yourself easy and keep quiet.
We'll tell you when to speak, and after a while you'll
find yourself second in command before you know it.
I had no difficulty in acknowledging the
reasonableness
of these ideas, though it seemed a new thing
to find a man possessing the influence and authority
of Schwartz, devising means to transfer them to
another. But he knew, and the event showed that
he was right, that there were some duties of a
commander
for which he was not fit; and that there
were other things to which a chief could not devote
himself, for which he was better qualified than any
other.
On the third of November we reached the
rendezvous
,
at the house of Mr. Gordon. On the way we
had received frequent accessions of strength, and
here we were joined by a yet larger reinforcement.
Our whole number could not have been much, if at
all, short of a thousand men.
Meantime scouts came in, from whom we learned
that the same day had been fixed for the march of
the troops from Lynchburg. It followed that we had
abundance of time for our preparations. It so
happened
,
that they had not learned the name of the
new commander; but it was understood that a
reinforcement
had arrived, and that nearly the whole
disposable force was on the march. This included a
troop of dragoons and a company of artillery, with
two pieces of cannon, in addition to a full regiment
of infantry, and one battalion of another.
Having ascertained his force, and fixed on those
on whom he could rely to understand and execute
his plans, Douglas proceeded to make a temporary
organization, suited to the occasion. The men were
divided into corps, to each of which a post was
provisionally
assigned, to be occupied as soon as the
approach of the enemy should be announced. Across
the road, near the head of the defile, and just above
the first angle next the top of the ascent, was
constructed
a barricade of logs, similar to those already
described. This reached, on each side, to the foot of
the hills, at steep, rocky, and impracticable points.
It was long enough for twenty men to man its
twenty loop-holes, and as it reached above their
heads, they were quite concealed. An hundred men
were allotted to this post, who were ranged five deep
behind the barricade, and instructed to fire in turn,
each man falling back to the rear to reload as soon
as he had discharged his piece.
Others were distributed along the opposite faces
of the hills overlooking the road, and directed to
seek out hiding-places behind rocks, trees, and
bushes. These men were under the immediate
orders of individuals selected for the occasion, but
attached to the command of Witt, who was stationed
at the barrier.
About a hundred were placed in ambush in the
mouth of the ravine, just below the road, on the
north side of the river, under Schwartz. These were
all picked menour steadiest and coolest
sharp-shooters
who
were placed there for the purpose of
attacking and carrying the guns of the enemy at the
water's edge.
Douglas himself, at the head of the rest of his
corps, prepared to occupy the road on the north side
of the river, to bring on the action. These were
divided into two equal bodies, and the whole ranged
in platoons, at open order, across the road. Of the
two battalions, as they may be called, the foremost
was placed under my command. The other Douglas
commanded in person. My orders were to post my
headmost platoon just at the bend of the road, on the
top of the hill where it turns to the right. They were
instructed to fire
ad libitum
, each man choosing and
making sure of his mark, and then to file away by
the right, and, taking to their heels, to run down to
the river, cross it, and dispose themselves on the
other bank, so as most effectually to gall the enemy,
should he attempt to cross. Each platoon, in
succession
,
was to march up to the same ground, and,
having fired, to execute the same manuvre. The
remaining column, under Douglas, were to stand their
ground until the enemy should come in view on the
top of the hill, and then to fall back fighting, and
cross under cover of those who should have passed
before. But the best account of what was ordered
will be gathered from what was done.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
The triumph and the vanity,
The rapture of the strife;
The earthquake voice of victory,
To thee the breath of life;
All quelled:Dark spirit, what must be
The madness of thy memory?
While
these arrangements were in progress,
scouts were hourly arriving. The country being
altogether friendly, they were readily provided with
fresh horses; and, before the enemy were half way
from Lynchburg, we were fully apprised of their
number, equipments, and order of march. First
came a squadron of dragoons; then a light company;
then Trevor's regiment, about five hundred strong;
then a company of artillery; then one battalion of
Mason's regiment, consisting of something more
than two hundred men; the whole followed by a few
light troops, by way of rear-guard. The whole might
amount to a thousand men, well appointed and
prepared
at all points for efficient action.
On the morning of the fifth of November, the men
were ordered to betake themselves to their allotted
posts; and Douglas, having visited each, and seen
that all was right, and rightly understood, addressed
himself to his particular command. Where every
man is an officer, each must be told individually
beforehand what is expected from him. Panic apart,
they will be apt to fulfil such instructions, and will
fight with the terrible efficiency of individual
animosity
.
Hence the formidable character of partisan
warfare.
At length the enemy made their appearance.
Clinging to the idea of surprising Douglas, Col.
Trevor sent forward no advance, but determined to
bring the whole strength of his corps to bear upon
him at once. If he employed any scouts, they were
either unfaithful, or were not permitted to approach
near enough to learn any thing of the position or
movements of Douglas. The consequence was, that
Col. Trevor received the first intimation of his
presence
from a sharp firing in front, which sent his
horse to the right-about and back to the rear.
Pressing
forward, he immediately ordered his
sharp-shooters
to disperse and take positions to gall us,
while he pushed on his solid column of heavy
infantry. The reception prepared for them was such
as he had not dreamed of. His men fell like leaves
in autumn; and, as fast as one platoon of the
mountaineers
discharged their pieces, another was on the
same ground to pour in again that terrible fire, of
which the martinets of the regular service have so
inadequate an idea. Instead of the deep-mouthed
peal of muskets, discharged simultaneously, there is
the sharp, short crack of rifle after rifle, fired by men
no one of whom touches the trigger until he sees
precisely where his ball is to go. The effect was
suitable to the cause; but yet the steady infantry
pressed on,
Each stepping where his comrade stood,
to form an unbroken front, in order to charge with
the bayonet.
Suddenly the firing ceased, and, behold, their
enemy seemed to have fled from the expected
charge. The fact was, that my last platoon, having
fired, had withdrawn like their predecessors, and
were running at full speed after their companions,
down the hill and across the river. At the water's
edge, I stopped and joined Schwartz in his ambush.
It had been arranged that I should do this; because,
in case we should be so fortunate as to seize the
cannon, my skill as an artillerist might be of great
use. Meantime, my men having crossed over,
dispersed
themselves along the bank, the face of the
hills, and across the road, to cover the retreat of
those who remained.
The regulars had necessarily spent a few moments
in repairing the wreck of their shattered column
before they advanced. They then moved forward;
but, before they turned the angle of the road, most of
my men were across the river. At the same time, the
column under the immediate command of Douglas
14
was seen drawn up in the road, near the foot of the
hill, with the rear resting on the water's edge. As
the enemy advanced the front platoon fired, faced to
the right, and filing along the flank of the column,
entered the river and crossed just below the ford.
They next filed to the left in the same way, and
crossed above the ford. In this manner the whole
column disappeared, one platoon after another, while
their fire was answered by a roar of musketry,
which, being discharged from the higher ground, did
more harm to those on the farther bank of the river
than to the nearer enemy. At length the last platoon
was withdrawn, and the regulars rushed down
toward
the river for the purpose of annoying them in
crossing. In this attempt they were again checked
and driven back by the terrible fire of my men, who,
having already crossed, were drawn up, as I have
said, on the other bank.
Col. Trevor now saw the necessity of advancing
his artillery, which was accordingly hurried down to
the water's edge to clear a passage for the infantry.
By the time the cannon were untimbered, not a man
of the mountaineers was to be seen. As soon as
their companions had crossed, they dispersed with
every appearance of confusion and alarm; some
scampering along the road, and some clambering up
the hills on both sides of it.
The way was now open, and the infantry
advanced
to cross the river. At this moment Colonel
Mason, riding up to Colonel Trevor, pointed out the
advantageous position of the artillery as a cover to
his rear, if he should be forced to retreat. Give
me leave to suggest, said he, that it may be well
to leave the cannon where they are. The cavalry,
too, cannot act with effect among those hills, and the
two together, should the fortune of the day be
unpropitious
,
may be of more use here than on the
other side.
You say true, said Trevor. It shall be as
you advise, and you, Colonel, will remain in command
of this reserve.
I earnestly beg, sir, said Mason, that you will
not deny me a share in the work of the day. The
Captains of artillery and dragoons are all-sufficient to
the command of their respective corps.
Pardon me, sir, said Trevor. None can be so
proper to execute your prudent and cautious device
as you, its author. You will be pleased, therefore,
to repair to the rear, rally the dragoons, and bring
them down to the water's edge. Let them be ready
to cross at a moment's warning, to assist in the
pursuit
as soon as I have driven the enemy into the
plain.
Saying this, Colonel Trevor turned off, and giving
the word to march, dashed into the river. Poor
Mason
,
insulted and mortified, nevertheless patiently
addressed
himself to the duty assigned him. Thus was
this able and brave man denied all participation in an
affair which his arrogant and sanguine commander
believed to be an abounding source of honor to all
who might be engaged it.
I have omitted to mention that, as soon as the
plan of endeavoring to surprise the artillery had been
adopted, Schwartz had requested me to draw the
outline of a piece of mounted ordnance in the sand,
and to mark the proper positions of the artillerists
employed about it. While I did this, some ten or
fifteen of our best marksmen stood by, looking on
attentively. When my sketch was done, he turned
to one of them, and pointing to one of the marks
made to stand for an artillerist, said coolly: Now,
this is your man; and to another, this is yours.
Thus he went on till he had doomed every victim.
While we are supplying this omission in our
narrative, the reader will please to suppose that Col.
Trevor's regiment have forded the river, and have
passed up the road and out of sight. It will be
remembered
that the hills on both sides of the defile
had been lined with concealed marksmen, and that
the greater part of the advance had, on recrossing
the river, thrown themselves into the same places of
concealment. But the idea that they had done so
for any purpose but that of safety, entered not into
Col. Trevor's mind. Indeed, if he had had any
doubt, it must have been removed when he found,
that as his column wound through the deep defile,
not a shot molested their march. At the first angle
of the road he halted and let the column march past
him. He could see, from this point, both the head
of it, as it advanced, and the rear as it came up. As
the latter passed the spot where he stood, the
leading
platoon was in the act of turning the next angle
of the road. At that moment he heard the startling
report of a volley of rifles. He set spurs to his horse
to gallop to the front, when every rock and every
tree of the surrounding hills burst into flame, and
the deep ravine echoed to the report of a hundred
rifles. A shot struck his horse, and another piercing
his hat, grazed the top of his head deep enough to
lay bare the skull, and stun him, as he fell under his
slaughtered horse. He was thus placed
hors du
combat
, owing the preservation of his life to the
insignia
of his rank which had endangered it.
The sound of this firing was the signal for us.
Each of the selected marksmen fixed his aim
on his appropriate victim; and, at a word from
Schwartz, the artillerymen at the guns fell as if
swept away by the breath of a tempest. Rushing
from our hiding-place, the cannon were instantly in
our possession. The company of artillery were not
slow to disappear behind the angle of the rock, and
one or two who peeped out, being instantly picked
off, we saw no more of them.
Presently we heard the heavy tramp of the
squadron
slowly descending the hill, accompanied with
the peculiar sound of dragoons, dressing the front in
14
preparation for a sudden and overwhelming charge.
While this was passing, our guns were all reloaded.
Mind, boys, said Schwartz; all of number
one. The word was understood, and every alternate
man stood ready, with rifle cocked and trigger set,
to receive the enemy. The charge was sounded, and
the leading horsemen, wheeling around the rock,
were rushing on at full speed, when horses and
riders were seen to go down in one promiscuous
heap. The greater number of the squadron were still
out of sight; and, had the way been open, might
have followed to share the fate of their companions,
and finally to ride us down when our guns should
have been all discharged. But the work had been
done too effectually. The dead and wounded (both
horse and rider) nearly filled the road; and for
dragoons to pick their way among such appalling
obstacles, in the face of fifty loaded rifles, at a
distance of twenty paces, was out of the question.
A few who made the attempt found this to their cost.
The charge was not renewed, and some of our men
advancing to the angle of the rock, and occupying
inaccessible but commanding points on the hills,
soon made them draw off to a safe distance.
While this was doing, I, with the few men
selected for the service of the artillery, gave my
attention to that. Glancing my eye along both
pieces, I saw that both had been accurately pointed
into the road on the other side. I had nothing,
therefore, to do but to apply the port-fire, which was
still burning in the clenched hand of a dead
artillerist
.
By this time the column had fallen back,
and the road below the first angle was fast filling
with the retreating mass. I had never before
witnessed
the effusion of blood; and, heated as mine
now was, it ran cold as I applied the match. As
the smoke cleared off, I saw the enemy throwing
away their arms, and stretching out their hands,
some toward me, and some aloft to the unseen foe
that galled them from the hills. The fire instantly
slackened, and cravats and handkerchiefs being
raised on the points of swords and bayonets, it
ceased altogether. The mountaineers now poured
down from the hills into the ravine, securing the
arms of the enemy, mixing among them and
hemming
them in on every side. Douglas, whose place,
since he had recrossed the river, had been among
these concealed marksmen, was one of the first to
approach the enemy. Advancing to those whose
rank was most conspicuous, he made known his
authority, and received their swords.
Meantime Col. Trevor had recovered his senses,
and found himself fastened to the ground by the
weight of his horse, which lay upon his leg. He
was presently discovered, relieved, and helped to
rise. At this moment he caught the eye of Douglas,
who hastened to him, less from impatience to
demand
his sword, than to offer assistance to one who
seemed to be an officer of high rank, and badly
wounded. In the figure before him, all smeared
with blood and dirt, he saw nothing by which he
could recognize his brother. To the Colonel, the
disguise of Douglas was hardly less complete. He
had seen him receiving the surrender of others, and
stood prepared to go through the same humiliating
ceremony. He felt that his own disgrace was
complete
,
and the form of surrender was thought of with
indifference. He had already reached the lowest
depth of abasement.
But in that lowest depth a lower deep seemed
to open, when, as he extended his hand to deliver
his sword to the victor, he discovered that the hand
put forth to receive it was that of Douglas. He
flung down his sword, stamping with rage, and
immediately
after called to his men to resume their
arms. The voice struck the ear of Douglas, though
dissonant with passion. The figure, too, confirmed
his suspicion of the truth; and he immediately rushed
to screen his brother with his own body from the
rifles pointed against him. Calling for aid to those
around, he presently succeeded in securing the
Colonel, and after one or two fruitless attempts to
soothe him, ordered him away to the house of Mr.
Gordon. To that gentleman he spoke aside, and
explaining in confidence the strange scene that he
had just witnessed, besought him to take command
of the escort, and to pay all imaginable attention to
the health, comfort, and feelings of the Colonel. He
was accordingly led away, raging and foaming at
the mouth like a spoiled child who has been deprived
of his toy, or baulked in his amusement. The
mortification
of Douglas was extreme; but he had the
satisfaction to find that Arthur was not present;
and to no other person but Schwartz and myself did
the name of Colonel Trevor afford a hint of the
connexion.
CHAPTER XXXIX.
If thou didst but consent
To this most cruel act, do but despair;
And if thou want'st a cord, the smallest thread
That ever spider twisted from her womb
Will serve to strangle thee; a rush will be
A beam to hang thee on! Or, wouldst thou drown thyself,
Put but a little water in a spoon,
And it shall be, as all the ocean,
Enough to stifle such a villain!
I shall
not detain the reader with a detail of
the farther particulars of this skirmish. Indeed we
hardly staid to acquaint ourselves with its exact
results. As at least half the men who had fought
under Douglas on that day had no intention to
follow
him any farther, we left to them the care of the
killed, wounded, and prisoners. The body of Col.
Mason alone was selected for a more honorable
burial than the rude hands of the mountaineers could
bestow. It was dragged from beneath the
incumbent
mass of men and horses, placed on a suitable
carriage, covered with the colors of his regiment,
and taken to Lynchburg, to be there restored to his
companions in arms. The band of his regiment
were also marched to that place to assist in
rendering
the last honors to their late commander.
Having given the necessary orders, Douglas
snatched a moment to ride to Mr. Gordon's, where
he hoped to find his brother in a more reasonable
mood. The Colonel had been confined in a private
room; and, being treated with great courtesy and
respect, had lost nothing of his arrogance. Such is
always the effect of delicate attention to the
undeserving
.
A man of merit would have been softened
and melted by the deference with which Colonel
Trevor was treated. To him it seemed but that sort
of spontaneous homage to greatness which the heart
pays unconsciously. The effect of it was, that being
told by Mr. Gordon that his brother had come to
visit him in his room, he sent him the following
magnanimous note, pencilled on the back of a
letter:
I am your prisoner. Do with me as you please.
Inflict on me any death, however cruel; but spare
me the sight of one whose treasons have dishonored
our common name, and who has deprived me of my
only chance to restore its former splendor.
Douglas was inexpressibly shocked at this
manifestation
of a temper at once savage and coldly
selfish. But he had no time to waste in parleying
with the ungoverned passions of his brother, and
wrote an answer in these words:
You are
my
prisoner, and
mine
only, and shall
be treated with all tenderness and respect. I am
responsible to no one for your custody, and you shall
soon be at liberty. Go home. Go to our venerable
father, and comfort his declining years. If the
instincts
of your heart do not restrain you from fighting
against your brothers, (for Arthur is with me,) let a
sense of honor make you regard yourself as a
prisoner
on parole, not at liberty to fight again against
Virginia. Meantime your sword shall be restored,
and you shall be treated in all things as the brother
of D. T.
While Douglas was engaged in this painful duty,
Arthur was employed in preparing a formal report of
the events of the day. This was signed by the
Chief on his return, and with it the young man was
despatched to B, with instructions to ask his
orders, and return with them, unless another
messenger
should be preferred. In the meantime all
things had been made ready for the march to
Lynchburg
.
I shall not give the history of this. It was
triumphal, as far as complete success and the
applauding
gratulations of the people could make it so. We
had no difficulty in adding to our numbers as many
men as the fruits of our victory enabled us to supply
with arms. Some joined us instantly, and others
engaged to rendezvous at Lynchburg in a few days.
There was nothing to damp the pleasure of
Douglas
,
but the conduct of his perverse brother, and the
presence of the dead body of his old friend, Colonel
Mason. On our arrival before the camp at
Lynchburg
,
I received orders to present myself with a flag
before the gate, at the head of a detachment which
escorted the body, accompanied by the music of
his band, and all the sad and imposing insignia of a
military funeral.
An officer came out to meet us, and thus received
the first authentic history of the fate of the
expedition
.
I was instructed to deliver over the body of
Colonel Mason with every circumstance of respect
and courtesy. I was also charged to demand the
surrender of the entrenched camp, and of the garrison
as prisoners of war.
A negotiation ensued, which ended in a
suspension
of arms for five days, and an agreement to
surrender
if, in that time, no reinforcement arrived.
This arrangement was by no means unwelcome to
Douglas. It gave him time to receive and organize
the new recruits that were pouring in, and to await
the return of Arthur. In the meantime, much of
that sort of intercourse which is common on such
occasions took place. There are few things in life
more pleasant than it is. There must be less of
malignity in human nature than is generally
supposed
,
or men would not seize, with so much
eagerness
,
on opportunities to lose the idea of public
hostility in the kindly interchange of courtesy and
good offices. Friendships are never formed more
suddenly and cordially than under such
circumstances
.
So we found it on this occasion. Major
Wood, the officer in command, was a gentleman
15
and soldier, honorable, frank, generous, and
accomplished
.
I was brought much into contact with
him, and found him enthusiastic in his
acknowledgments
of the merits of Douglas, and eager to become
acquainted with him. But the time had not come
when he was willing to be known by his true name;
and besides that he was acquainted with the Major,
there were many others in the camp who would have
recognized him. He therefore confined himself to
his quarters, on various pleas of business; and, to
make his seclusion effectual, took lodgings in a house
in the suburbs of the town. By his advice, I mixed
much with the men; and, as I had acquitted myself
to their entire satisfaction in the late affair, I found
that I was in a fair way to be recognized as second
in command. Schwartz and Witt made a point of
consulting me publicly on all occasions; and this
circumstance, together with my daily attention to the
organization of the troops, obtained me full credit
for all my military skill, and a great deal more.
The five days passed away quite pleasantly. The
regulars, finding that they were not like to fall into
the hands of savages, were becoming reconciled to
the fate which now seemed inevitable; and we parted
on the last night of the truce, with no unpleasant
anticipations of the surrender which was to take
place the next day at noon.
The morning came, and our men paraded in high
spirits, and with considerable show of order and
discipline. This was particularly the case with a
small company which had been detailed for the
service
of the artillery, who took their stand at the
guns with the air of men proud of their new
acquirements
.
I had indeed taken great pains to train and
exercise them, and, by universal consent, was
recognized
as the immediate commander of this corps,
which was drawn up with the cannon planted directly
against the gate of the camp.
All this time Douglas did not make his appearance.
At length the hour approached for the garrison to
march out, and lay down their arms, when Schwartz
went to his quarters to receive his orders. He soon
returned, and taking me aside, told me that Douglas
was not at his quarters, and was nowhere to be
seen.
We had already observed appearances in the camp
not at all answerable to the expected surrender, and
I was now startled at this intelligence. The
character
of Major Wood forbade indeed any suspicion of
foul play. But the time was near at hand when the
enemy should march out, and we heard nothing of
their drums, calling the men to parade. We
determined
,
therefore, to send a flag to the camp on some
pretext. The officer who carried it was immediately
warned off, and having said that he had a
communication
for Major Wood, was told that that officer was
no longer in command, and that
Col. Trevor
would
receive no communication from rebels and traitors.
This was decisive. The quarters of Douglas were
not very distant from the enemy, and such had been
the appearance of perfect good faith in all their
proceedings
,
that our camp had been guarded even
more negligently than is common with militia. It
seemed, indeed, almost incredible that Col. Trevor
could have been guilty of an act of base treachery
against the life or liberty of his generous brother;
but to Schwartz and myself, who knew the
connexion
,
even this seemed hardly less extravagant than
his former conduct. That he had escaped, joined
the troops, and disclaimed the capitulation entered
into by Major Wood, was certain. To have surprised
and carried off Douglas could not be much worse.
We now consulted with Witt, to whom we
communicated
our suspicions, at the same time disclosing
the true name of our young commander, and his
relation to Col. Trevor. What was suspicion with
us, was at once absolute certainty with him. I do not
think I ever witnessed such a change as our
communication
made in the whole appearance and demeanor of
the man. Heretofore, I had always seen him cool,
cautious, deliberate, and thoughtful. There was,
besides, a prevailing tone of benevolence in all he
said, which, added to his sobriety and strong sense,
gave him some claim to the title of philosopher.
But now the expression of his countenance was
terrible
and awful. He had made no show of regard
for Douglas; but his attachment was deep and
abiding, and his alarm for his safety was in the
same degree. He was impatient of a moment's
delay, sternly protested against wasting time in
discussion
,
and insisted on immediately storming the
camp.
Schwartz was nothing behind him in zeal, though
less disturbed by passion; and we presently
determined
to bring matters to extremities. As soon,
therefore, as the hour appointed for surrender
arrived
,
our captive drummer was ordered to beat a
parley
.
To this the only answer was a general fire of
musketry from the whole line of the camp on that
side, by which a few men were hurt. But the
distance was too great for any serious mischief.
Enough, however, was done to excite the men to
fury; and without waiting for the word, they rushed
to the assault. Their movement determined me.
To rush up to the piqueted entrenchment, behind
which the enemy were in comparative safety, was to
expose themselves to destruction. It was
indispensable
to open a way for them. This I effected
by a discharge of both pieces of artillery, which
tore the gate away, and pointed their attack to this
accessible point. The moment after, Colonel
Trevor
,
with his untractable rashness, appeared in
the gateway, shouting, and calling to his men to
sally forth against us. He was instantly recognized
by the incensed Witt, whose fatal aim brought him
15
to the ground. His men fell back; and in a moment
after, a white flag was raised.
It was no easy matter to prevail on our men to
pay any regard to this signal; but we succeeded in
restraining them before it was too late. Of course
we demanded the instant surrender of the place,
which was unhesitatingly given up. Major Wood
now came forward to apologize and explain. Col.
Trevor, having made his escape, had returned to the
camp soon after tattoo. His whole behavior was
that of a man beside himself, and actuated by some
inscrutable motive to some inscrutable purpose. Of
these he said nothing to his officers, but peremptorily
disclaiming the capitulation, gave orders that all
things should be prepared for a renewal of hostilities
the next morning. Nothing more was known but
that he had summoned to his quarters a favorite
sergeant of his own regiment, who had been left
sick in camp when he marched against Douglas.
This sergeant and four soldiers, as it seemed from
the morning report, had disappeared in the night.
Major Wood assured us, that all that had been
since done had taken place under the immediate
orders and superintendence of Colonel Trevor, and
in spite of his own most earnest remonstrances. In
proof of his sincerity, he appealed to the fact of his
unconditional surrender the moment he was apprised
of the fall of the Colonel. With all this I was
perfectly
satisfied, and gladly returned him his sword,
with a proper acknowledgment of his gentlemanly
conduct.
And now, Major, said Schwartz, there is
another matter we want to talk to you about. Do
you know any thing of our Captain?
Of Captain Douglas? said the Major.
Certainly
not. But I hope I may now have the pleasure
of seeing him.
Look here, Major, said Witt, whose eye still
glared with ferocity not at all abated by the fall of
Trevor; that a'nt the thing; and we want a
straight answer. Captain Douglas is missing, and
we want to know what's become of him.
Missing! said the Major, with unfeigned
amazement. I assure you, upon my honor, I
know nothing of him.
Is there any body here that knows, or is like to
know? said Schwartz.
None that I can imagine, was the reply.
Is there not a Captain here, asked Schwartz;
a red-headed fellow, that commands the company
at Farmville?
Captain Cottle? Yes.
Well, I want to see him.
He was immediately summoned, and presently
made his reluctant appearance. His alarm increased
on seeing Schwartz and Witt.
See here, Mister, said the former; here is a
piece of villany that we want to know about; and
there is nobody, I reckon, so apt to tell us as
you.
Indeed, sir, said Cottle, I declare, sir, I
don't know a word about it.
You don't, eh! said Schwartz. Well, any
how, you are mighty quick to
find out
that you don't
know; that I must say for you.
Did you ever see me before? said Witt, fixing
his terrible eye on the alarmed Captain. Did you
ever see me before? repeated he. Do you
remember
where it was? Do you remember your
business there; and did you ever hear of such a
thing as a man being hung for a spy?
The collapse of deadly terror came over Cottle at
these dreadful words. His face, already pale,
became
livid; his eye no longer blenched under the
fearful glance of Witt; but the lids opened as if
by mutual repulsion, while his lip and under jaw fell
powerless. He was roused from this state by
Schwartz, who asked him what had become of
Captain Douglas.
He was now effectually scared out of all thought
of concealment, and answered without prevarication
that Captain Douglas had been surprised, during the
night, by the order of Col. Trevor, and sent away
immediately under the guard of a sergeant and four
men, across the river. He could not say, certainly,
where he was gone; but he suspected to Wasington,
as Col. Trevor appeared to have been writing busily
all the time the party were engaged in the capture of
Douglas. It was vain to attempt concealing that he
had a hand in this, though the disclosure was made
with great reluctance. It appeared, moreover, that
he had been anxious to accompany the prisoner,
supposing him to be ordered for Washington; but
Col. Trevor had refused to send him. Indeed, he
sent none but those who had not been engaged in
the action at the ford, and was certainly right not to
trust the vain babbler, whose idle garrulity could
hardly have failed to rub off any gloss he might
have thought fit to spread over the affair.
How did they get across the river? asked
Schwartz. We have a strong guard on the other
side, and they had orders to keep a strict watch.
Col. Trevor told the sergeant, replied Cottle,
just to float quietly down the river and land away
below; and a handkerchief was tied over the
Captain's
mouth to keep him from making a noise, and
if he did, they were ordered to shoot him.
I have no words to express the horror with which
I heard this last circumstance. I trusted, and indeed
Major Wood seemed to be of that opinion, that Col.
Trevor had really been beside himself; but regarding
his conduct even as the effect of frenzy, it was
hardly less shocking. From Schwartz the
communication
only called forth some pithy expressions of
detestation, without seeming to interrupt the
working
of his thoughts, which were at once busy to
devise some remedy for the evil.
Witt was differently affected. His whole frame
and countenance assumed an appearance of stony
rigidity, betokening fixed and fearful purpose. He
turned his glaring eye to the spot where Col.
Trevor
had fallen, with an expression that showed his
vengeance quite unsatisfied. A glance of fierce
scorn fell for a moment on Cottle; and then, with a
searching look, he addressed himself to Major Wood.
Major Wood, said he, with a voice whose
deep, stern tones, demanded the truth and the whole
truth, did you know any thing of this business?
Upon my honor, I did not; and Captain Cottle,
who did know, will tell you so.
I would hardly take
his
word
against himself
,
said Witt, with cold contempt, and not even turning
his eye on Cottle. Then pausing a moment, he
added, with the same look of severe scrutiny,
Major
Wood, do you know who Captain Douglas is?
Do you know that he is Col. Trevor's own brother?
Great God! exclaimed the Major. Douglas
Trevor! That fine, intelligent, accomplished, noble
young man!
Did you know him? asked the other.
I did, said Wood, and loved him well. Poor
fellow! Poor fellow! His doom is sealed.
That's enough, said Witt. I see now that
you had no hand in it. But is it not your duty,
Major Wood, to bring back Captain Douglas and
set him at liberty?
Would to God that I could, said the Major;
but he is quite beyond my reach before this.
See here, Major, said Schwartz; write an
order to that sergeant to bring him back, and give
me a pass to follow him without being stopped, and
I will have him back in no time. Them fellows lost
ground here crossing the river, and I can catch
them.
That might do, said the Major, hesitatingly;
and I am bound in honor to do it, because his
capture was a breach of my truce. But I shall never
be forgiven. No matter; it shall be done if they
break me for it.
You
may thank the Major, said Witt, turning
his implacable eye on Cottle, for that word; for it
has given
you
a chance for your life. But for that,
you would have been hanging like a dog in half an
hour. Now, Major, I don't want you to come to
any harm; and so you shall have a fair excuse.
Bring Captain Douglas back to us, and we will let
this fellow go. But if the Captain is not here
before
the week is out, then, as sure as there is a God
in Heaven, he shall be hanged for a spy, as he is.
There is a difference between the certainty of
being hanged in half an hour, and a chance of
escape
,
however unpromising. To Captain Cottle,
who had not ventured nearer to Jones's Ford than
the rear of the dragoons, and who was now in greater
peril than he had ever willingly encountered, the
difference was of great importance. Yet his hopes
were faint, for he had heard the orders of Trevor,
which enjoined despatch; and he was equally
earnest
in hurrying the Major and Schwartz. His
impertinence
was cut short by ordering him to close
custody in jail; and the credentials of Schwartz
being soon prepared, he set out on his journey.
16
CHAPTER XL.
That lies like truth, and yet most truly lies.
Let
us again intrude into the sanctuary of majesty.
The President is alone, as before. He has the same
air of somewhat impatient expectation. A shade of
anxious thought is on his brow, and his cheek is
flushed with some little excitement. Yet these
elements
are all so mixed as to be scarcely perceptible;
and were he conscious that we are looking at him,
they would be completely concealed. On the table
lie a number of letters recently received. Two of
them are separated from the rest. He takes up one
and reads it a second time. Let us look over him.
It runs thus:
The wisest may be deceived; the most vigilant
may be betrayed: for the MOST trusted are often the
most treacherous.
Caution
.
What means this? said the President,
musingly
.
Who is it that I am warned against? The
word `MOST' is underscored. Who does that point
at? Whom do I trust
most?
I trust nobody. But
I
seem
to trust; and whom
most?
Surely, it cannot
be he. I should, indeed, be wrong to trust to his
fidelity
. But he is too wise to be false to his own
interest. But may he not have an interest that I am
not aware of? It must be considered.
He then took up the other letter, which I beg
leave to lay before the reader, as a specimen of the
art with which the truth may be so told as to make
others believe what is false. I recommend it
particularly
to military gentlemen, reporting the results
of a battle.
Head Quarters, Camp near Lynchburg,
November, 12, 1849.
Sir
: I have the honor to lay before your
Excellency
an account of the operations of the troops
under my command, since the date of my last
despatch
.
In pursuance of the information I had received, of
which your Excellency has been already advised, I
marched on the third inst., at the head of my own
regiment, one battalion of the 15th, a company of
artillery, and one of dragoons, to meet Douglas on
his descent from the mountains. At Jones's Ford,
on Staunton river, I encountered him, when about
half his force had crossed over. I attacked him
immediately; and, after a sharp conflict, drove him
across the river. By the advice of Col. Mason, I
left the artillery and draggons on the north bank, to
protect our rear, placing them under the command
of that distinguished officer.
Pressing hard upon the rear of the enemy, we
came up with him just as he had fallen back on the
reserve. Here he rallied, and the fight was renewed.
I regret to say that, at the first fire, my horse fell
under me, imprisoning my leg by his fall. At the
same moment a ball struck my head, and I came to
the ground insensible.
You will judge my astonishment, when, on
recovering
my senses, I found that all my men near
me had thrown down their arms, and that I was in
the hands of the enemy, who assisted me to rise. I
immediately called to my men to resume their arms;
but am sorry to inform you that I was not obeyed.
As I had not surrendered, I was seized and hurried
away to the house of a ring-leader of these rebels,
where I was confined. From that time I had no
means of receiving any information on which I could
rely concerning the events of the day, as I had no
intercourse with any but the rebels.
Two days ago I was so fortunate as to make my
escape. Returning to this place, I find my camp,
which had been left under the command of Major
Wood, beleaguered by the rebels, and a treaty for
surrender in full progress. I rejoice that I have
returned in time to prevent a consummation so
disgraceful
.
It is now midnight, and a small party has been
sent out to endeavor to surprise the leader of this
banditti. In the meantime all things are put in
readiness for a sortie in the morning. I shall not
close my letter until I can give some farther account
of the success of these operations.
Two o'clock, A. M.
My scouts have come in,
and brought in the hostile chief, who proves to be
the last man in the world whom I could have wished
to find in arms against the generous master who so
well deserved his grateful devotion. I speak of that
unfortunate youth, whose fault, (I must not use a
harsher term,) nearly twelve months ago, dishonored
our common name and parentage. Your Excellency
will appreciate the struggle in my bosom, between
a sense of duty and the foolish but inextinguishable
relentings of nature. I have determined to put an
end to this painful strife, and to take security against
my own weakness, by sending him on immediately
to you, without awaiting the result of the meditated
sortie in the morning. He therefore travels in
custody
of the bearer of this letter, under guard of a
sergeant and four men.
Having returned to the camp this night, after
tattoo, I am unprepared to give any account of our
loss, or that of the enemy. I have nothing authentic
but the lamented death of Col. Mason, who fell
fighting bravely.
I beg leave to express an humble hope, that your
Excellency will be pleased to attribute the partial
failure of my enterprise to the unfortunate wound
which put me
hors du combat
, at a moment, up to
which we had successfully driven the enemy before
us for nearly half a mile and across the river.
I remain, sir, with the most profound respect,
your Excellency's most humble and faithful servant,
Owen Trevor
, Col. 18th Inf.
A worthy gentleman, said the President,
folding
up the letter. A most worthy gentleman! Let
any man doubt henceforth, if he can, that the only
way to judge in advance of what a man will do, is to
ascertain his interest. See how readily it settled this
nice point of casuistrythis delicate question of
conflicting duties. Trust! Yes, I will trust; but
not as fools do. I will trust no man's honor, but
every man's interest. The experience of my whole
life has taught the lesson, and every day confirms it.
Here comes a new example, added he, as the
doorbell
sounded, and was echoed by the single stroke in
the room.
The door opened, and the honorable Mr. Baker
appeared. His figure had lost nothing of its
deferential
bend; his step nothing of its creeping,
cautious
tread; his countenance nothing of its abject
servility. But there was more of anxiety and less of
hope, with a slight appearance of peevish
dissatisfaction
.
You are very good, my dear sir, said the
President. You are always almost present to my
16
wish. Government would be an easy task, were
all officers like you.
I humbly thank your Excellency, replied the
Judge. Were not your approbation precious to
me, I might be tempted perhaps to look more than I
ought to public opinion. Perhaps I do so, as it is;
for though my duties are clearly necessary to the
good of the State, I find it hard to bear the loud
reproaches of a misjudging multitude, that reach me
through a factious press.
Let it not reach you, my dear sir. The storm
does but rage without. Why need you hear it when
it touches you not. Shut your ears and sleep
soundly
;
or open them only to the more pleasant tones
that issue from loyal lips. I take care not to know
what is said of me by malcontent scribblers; but I
hardly flatter myself that I should preserve my
equanimity
,
if I read all that is written.
It is sometimes impossible not to hear, said the
Judge; and there are words which convey
reproach
,
which, though uttered in a single breath,
reach the heart. I can never, I fear, make myself
proof against such a phrase as `
judicial murder
.'
But you must find consolation in your own
enlightened conscience, my dear sir. Some feeling
must be expected when the edge of the law falls on
victims whose offences demand punishment, and yet
are such as those the world calls honorable and
upright
are most likely to commit.
The misfortune is, replied the other, that it
is only for such offences, and on such victims, that
my office seems to be made to act; and when the
curse rises up against me, loud as well as deep, and
uttered and echoed on every side, I pray your
Excellency
to pardon me, when I say, that I find its
honors and emoluments a poor compensation.
It will be some relief to you, then, replied the
President, that you are like to have a subject of a
different sort to act upon. One whose crimes offend
against the laws of God as well as man; and who is
not more obnoxious to State policy, than to the
detestation of all good men, and of none more than
yourself.
Of whom is your Excellency pleased to speak?
asked Mr. Baker.
Of no other than that young fellow, Trevor,
whose ill luck snatched him away from our hands,
when perhaps he was not quite ripe for punishment.
But he has since made himself perfect in crime, by
becoming the leader of a desperate benditti. In
short, he is no other than the famous Captain
Douglas
,
and is now in my power. I think you will find
in his case a fair set-off against some of the
mortifications
of which you complain; and think no more
of denying your services to the public, at least until
he has fulfilled his destiny.
The effect of this communication on the mind of
the honorable gentleman, was such as the President
had anticipated. To every being of the name of
Trevor he bore a mortal antipathy. In the case of
Douglas, this was rendered more intense by the
sympathy
of a father with a favorite son. An envious
malignity was a striking feature in the characters
both of father and son; and this had been provoked
to the utmost by that unfortunate young man. Both
were sensible that the younger Baker had been in
bad odor with the public, ever since the affair at the
falls; and hence, it was not only grateful to their
malice, but to their pride, to fasten on Douglas a
stigma so dishonorable as to have relation back, and
to excuse his adversary with those who did not
know all the circumstances, for not seeking such
redress as
gentlemen
demand of
gentlemen
only.
The good humor of the Judge was now manifestly
restored, and the President went on to give him some
particulars of the late military occurrences. Douglas,
he said, was on the road, and would reach
Washington
the next day. The letter, it seems, had been
brought by a soldier who had orders to outgo the
rest of the party, and ride express to Washington.
It is well, said the President, that I have
this timely intimation of his approach. The custody
of State prisoners cannot be safely entrusted to any
but the military; and that of this young man must
be committed to no corps in which he had any
acquaintance. It seems that he was a universal
favorite among men and officers. I am about to take
measures to guard against any such blunder.
In such conversation half an hour was past, when
the Minister made his appearance. He had been
sent for, and to him the President communicated the
history of the capture of Douglas. Had he turned
an eye of close scrutiny on the favorite, at the
moment
when he uttered the name, and announced the
fate of his victim, he might have seen a slight
expression of countenance, which it would not have
been easy to interpret. But this escaped him; and
he went on to direct that the true name of the
prisoner
should be kept secret; that his arrival should
be watched for; and that he should be at once
conducted
to a place provided for the separate
confinement
of State prisoners. It was, moreover, ordered,
that a detail of officers and men for that prison should
be carefully made, so as to exclude any persons
whose loyalty was at all doubtful; and especially all
who, from former associations, could be supposed to
feel any kindness for Douglas.
Finally, it was agreed that, should he arrive in the
course of that night, or the next day, he should be
brought, on the following night, before the
triumvirate
,
in the room where they then were.
You were right, continued the President,
addressing
his Minister, when you said that this
young man had talent. The discovery of his identity
explains the marvellous organization and efficiency
of that wild banditti that he commanded. His
capture must be fatal to their future success. They
must be powerless now that they have lost their
leader, and must soon disband. That is well. The
two regiments may now be marched from Lynchburg
to Richmond, and save us the necessity of sending a
reinforcement from this quarter. The troops there,
with this aid, will certainly be sufficient to cheek the
insurrectionary movements that we hear of in the
southern counties, and to cover the meeting of the
Legislature. Col. Trevor has certainly deserved well.
I am afraid his unfortunate wound may have
occasioned
the loss of more men than we could well
spare, who seem to have surrendered while he was
insensible. But the disbanding of Douglas's corps
will, of course, set them at liberty to return to their
duty. But this takes nothing from Col. Trevor's
merit. He must be brevetted. As to Major Wood,
in the regular course he should succeed Mason; but
I must hear more of this negotiation for a surrender
of his post, before he is promoted. That affair must
be satisfactorily explained, or he will hardly escape
a court-martial.
The President now went on to give some farther
orders, and then dismissed his guests.
CHAPTER LXI.
Treason can never take a form so hideous,
But it will find a glass, that shall reflect
A comely semblance, on which self may look
With a complacent smile.
On
his departure from Lynchburg, Schwartz had
been provided with a suit of clothes half military, to
prevent the notice which his rude mountain attire
would have attracted. The day was half spent
before
he was on the road, and the sergeant and his
party were already far in advance of him.
Colonel Trevor had been desirous, for obvious
reasons, that his letter and prisoner should reach
Washington as soon as possible, and had ordered
the party to proceed with all practicable despatch.
But, as they might be somewhat retarded by the
necessary care of their prisoner, he had directed that
the letter should be sent on, as we have seen, by a
single soldier, who had reached Washington on the
second night. But the sergeant was not far behind,
and had used such diligence that he crossed the
bridge the next morning at an early hour, just as
poor Schwartz came in sight.
He recognized the party by the peculiar dress of
Douglas, with which he was so familiar; but it was
too late. He followed, however, disconcerted by his
failure, but not desponding. At the farther end of
the bridge he was struck with the countenance and
manner of a fine looking young man, of genteel but
plain appearance, who stood gazing earnestly after
the prisoner and his guard.
Observing Schwartz, he asked eagerly who the
prisoner was, and was told it was Captain Douglas.
Good God! exclaimed he, in a tone of deep
concern; is it possible? But thank God! it is no
worse.
Did you think it was any body you knew?
asked the quick-witted Schwartz.
Yes, replied the other. I was almost sure it
was a friend of my own.
And what was your friend's name, stranger? if
I may be so bold.
You are bold enough, said the youth. I am
not in the habit of answering questions, unless I
know who asks them, and why.
I don't mean no harm, young man, replied
Schwartz; and if you tell me your friend's name
and your own too, may be you won't be sorry for it.
The stranger looked hard at Schwartz, and in his
serious, earnest, and sagacious countenance saw
enough to make him curious to know what this
meant. He therefore replied, that his friend was
Lieutenant Trevor, late of the United States
Dragoons
.
Then I have a notion, replied Schwartz, that
your name is Whiting.
My name
is
Whiting, replied the other, in great
surprise; but how should you know it?
I have heard the Captain talk about you many
a time.
The Captain! What Captain?
Him
, replied Schwartz, pointing toward the
distant party.
Him!
And how was he to know any thing
about me?
Just because he is the very man you thought he
was.
Douglas! exclaimed Whiting. Trevor!
Douglas Trevor! Good God, what an ass I have
been! O Trevor, my friend! how earnestly have I
wished to know where to find you! Had I been
with you, this might have been prevented.
May be it is best as it is, said Schwartz.
The Captain did not want for friends where he
was. May be one friend here will do him more good
than a hundred any where else. That is what I am
here for now.
You are a friend to Trevor, then, replied
Whiting
;
perhaps one of his followers.
You may say that, said Schwartz. Any
how, I'm his friend.
Then come with me to my lodgings. You can
tell me every thing, and we will see what is to be
17
done. Trevor has friends enough here. Thank
God! I saw him. But for that we might not have
found out who he was till it was too late.
Whiting now showed Schwartz where to bestow
his horse, and afterwards conducted him to his
lodgings
.
These were in an obscure suburb, humble,
plain, and poorly fitted up. Appearances showed
that the occupant spent most of his time with the
pen, although many of the relics of his former
military
equipments were to be seen about the room.
But the dust on his cap, which hung against the
wall, and the mould on the belt and scabbard of his
sword, showed that these had been long unused.
In truth, the escape of Douglas and his uncle had
been fatal to him as a soldier. He had been
dismissed
the army; and now, as it seemed, earned a
poor livelihood by doing for small wages the manual
labor of those offices, the salaries of which are
received by men who do nothing at all.
During their long walk through the streets of that
city so magnificent in distances, as Monsieur
Serrurier said of it, and while a hasty breakfast was
preparing for Schwartz, he gave Whiting the
particulars
of the late battle at Jones's Ford; of Douglas's
capture, and of his brother's death, and the
surrender
of the camp. As soon as he had seen his guest
provided for, the young man left him alone. Going
out, he proceeded to the first stand of coaches,
and stepping into one was driven to the Minister's.
Here he alighted, showed a ticket to the porter,
entered, threaded several passages, descended a dark
stair, and, going into a small room in the basement,
touched the spring of a bell. No answering sound
was heard; but, in half an hour the Minister
appeared
.
I am glad to see you, said he. Have you
heard that your friend Trevor is in the power of his
enemies, and is expected here to-day?
I had not heard it, said Whiting; but I have
seen him. He is here.
Indeed! That is well. We have the more
time.
Where will he be lodged, and under what
custody
?
In the state prison. I am instructed to select
his guards from among those who are strangers to
his person, and well-affected to the Government.
That will be no easy task, as it seems that all
the troops of that description have been marched
into Virginia, and that, except raw recruits, there
are none here that it was thought safe to trust on
that service.
That is true, said the Minister; and
therefore
I must select those same raw recruits. Think
you there are many here who could be relied on to
peril every thing on behalf of your friend?
No doubt of it. I was long enough in the army
after his disgrace to know that his whole regiment
were indignant at it. A hundred can be found ready
to wipe it out with the blood of the President, or
their own.
It is well. He will be taken to the palace this
night, under the cloud of darkness. Have all things
in readiness, and watch for his return. You will
know what to do. Did you know those who had
him in custody?
I knew the sergeant, and he knew me.
All right. You then must be charged with the
disappearance of Douglas; you must therefore make
your escape with him. I shall, of course, see you
no more. We have no time for compliment; but
you will have my best wishes; and the time may
come when you may have it in your power to do me
justice. My country is to me, Mr. Whiting, what
yours is to you. When New England was permitted
to join in what you will call the plunder of the South, I
was not very scrupulous about the means of securing
her share. But nearly all that was worth having is
irretrievably lost. What remains can only be
retained
by means which will but make it an
instrument
of power in the hands of this man, and so
enable him to perpetuate his reign according to the
forms of the constitution. Take that away, and
leave the matter altogether to the votes of the
northern States, and I shall not long have to play
second to him. In order to preserve his power, he
would be compelled to break up the system of
monopoly
contrived for the exclusive benefit of his
favorite Empire State; or perhaps to concur with
me in severing a Union, the benefits of which are
now lost, by the escape of our common prey, and
of which
we
bear all the inconveniences. Of course,
I do not pretend that the place to which the favor
of my countrymen may advance me in either event,
has no charms for me. But you will see that I am
actuated by no low and sordid ambition. I am
desirous you should see it in this light. It is not
my fortune to command the services of many whose
esteem is eminently desirable. I am, therefore, the
more ambitious of yours. Should I succeed, my
acts will vindicate my motives. Should I fail, (and
if Virginia disenthrals herself I shall not fail,) you
will do me this justice. What news have you of
the movements of B?
He is about to take up arms, with the probability
of assembling a force which, with the concurrence
of the corps of Douglas, will secure his object.
But is not the band of Douglas dispersed?
By no means; but much increased. They have
still their mountain leaders, and a young man from
the South Carolina military school, who seems well
qualified to act, for the time, as the
locum tenens
of
the Chief.
Then farewell, sir, said the Minister. You
carry with you my good wishes for yourself and
your cause, and I pray you to commend them to
Mr. B.
17
About the time that these gentlemen thus
separated
,
the President was informed that a gentleman
and lady craved the favor of a private audience.
He directed that they should be shown into the
room, the privacy of which we have so often violated,
and soon after he entered it.
A lady, whose figure and dress denoted youth,
was seated on the sofa. She was in deep mourning,
and a black veil completely hid her face. By her
side sat a gentleman far advanced in life, and of a
most venerable aspect. His fair complexion had
blanched by time into the cold dead whiteness of
age. The color had, in like manner, faded from his
pale blue eye; and the quivering of his livid lip,
and the trembling of his eyelids, betokened deep
and anxious distress.
His
dress also was of black,
mournfully contrasting with the almost unearthly
whiteness of his face.
At the entrance of the President both rose; and
the trembling and agitated old gentleman might be
seen to give way for a moment, as if about to throw
himself on his knees before the dreaded prince
whose will was fate. But he recovered himself,
and with an air of suppliant dignity, stood as erect
as the weakness and infirmity of age permitted. The
President approached him with a look of perplexity
and doubt; and, gazing earnestly at him, said: I
beg to know, sir, who it is. Bless me! Mr. Trevor,
is it possible that I see you here, at this moment?
I am here, sir, replied the old gentleman, a
broken-hearted, bereaved father, lamenting the loss
of one son, and suppliant for the life of another; and
this is my niece, who is come to join her prayers to
mine, on behalf of her betrothed husband.
There was enough in these words to add to the
maiden confusion of poor Delia, but not enough to
prevent her from lifting a timid glance, in which
there was as much of entreaty as her proud spirit
could descend to. She met the eye of the President,
as with an air of quick and eager surprise he turned
towards her; and in his eye she read a meaning,
which, in the moment, blasted her hopes and
confirmed
her in all her detestation of the cold, selfish,
and crafty politician, whom she now beheld for the
first time. She saw, instantly, that she was the
object of some subtle purpose; and felt, that by
putting herself in his power, she had but prepared
for her husband a deeper distress than all the
severities
of the law could inflict. But she quailed not
at the thought. Her proud and bold spirit came in
aid of her weakness; her pale cheek burnt with an
indignant glow, and the tears were dissipated from
her eyes in the bright and almost fierce glance that
flashed from them. Even through her veil too much
of this appeared to escape the notice of the President.
He instantly turned away; and, with an air and
tone of the most candied courtesy, addressed Mr.
Trevor: You speak in riddles, my dear sir, said
he; I beg you to explain.
My task is more painful than I had anticipated,
said the poor old man. Have I, then, to be the
herald of my poor Owen's death, and of the yet more
disastrous fate of my other noble boy?
Col. Trevor dead, sir! exclaimed the
President
.
Impossible! I have just received a letter
from him, written on the 12th.
That day was the last of his life, said the
afflicted father. He fell next morning. I received
the news yesterday by the railroad; and by travelling
all night by the same conveyance, I am here to
entreat that the axe may not glean what the sword
has left me. My poor boy Douglas, I am told, is in
your power, and perhaps here.
I had
heard
of this; but I assure you your son
is not here. I will not deny that I expect him; and
regret that it is under circumstances which will not
allow me the pleasure of extending to him the same
courtesy I shall be happy to render to you.
Compose
yourself, my dear sir; let me beg you and your
niece to retire to rooms which are always ready to
receive you where I am master; and let me send for
your baggage.
Delia, who thought there was something of
hesitancy
in her uncle's mind, instantly exclaimed: No,
my uncle! No, my father! The palace of a tyrant
is a prison. There is no mercy here. No hope for
my noble husband. Save yourself. Return home
while you may, and leave me here to share his fate.
Our friends
may
rescue us. They WILL avenge us.
But in that cold eye there is no relenting.
You are harsh, lady, said the President; I
will not add, unjust. I will prove that, by permitting
your instant departure, without even enquiring where
you lodge.
He now bowed them out, and immediately
summoning
a servant, said: Take the number of that coach,
and let the driver attend me this evening. Then,
as the servant left the room, he went on: Why,
this is better and better. I think I have holds enough
now on Baker to bind him to his task, however his
heart may yearn after his beggarly estate in Virginia.
It seems, forsooth, that after all that has passed, his
son yet has a hankering after this girl; the only
woman, as he says, that he ever truly loved. It may
be but spite against his favored rival; or it may be,
in truth, that every thing that bears the shape of man
is susceptible of love, or what passes for it. Be it
so. He may be gratified; but his father shall fulfil
conditions.
In the evening of the same day the following letter
was put into the hands of the President:
Your captive has arrived. Beware how you
remand him to his prison, when you dismiss him
to-night
.
Order him to be confined within the palace;
and when you give the order, mark well its effect on
him you most trust.
Caution
.
Why, here is
proof
as well as accusation, said
the President. Here
is
treason. How else is it
known that Trevor was to be brought here to-night?
I will improve this hint. A rescue is to be
attempted
!
Is that it? Then the guard will be attacked
on their return without the prisoner. Wo to the
traitor if it prove so!
I have been interrupted in my narrative. I have
hesitated whether to give this fragment to the public,
until I have leisure to complete my history. On
farther reflection, I have determined to do so. Let
it go forth as the first
Bulletin
of that gallant
contest
,
in which Virginia achieved her independence;
lifted the soiled banner of her sovereignty from the
dust, and once more vindicated her proud motto,
which graces my title page,SIC SEMPER TYRANNIS!
Amen. So mote it be
.
THE END.Head Quarters, Camp near Lynchburg,
November, 12, 1849.
Sir
: I have the honor to lay before your
Excellency
an account of the operations of the troops
under my command, since the date of my last
despatch
.
In pursuance of the information I had received, of
which your Excellency has been already advised, I
marched on the third inst., at the head of my own
regiment, one battalion of the 15th, a company of
artillery, and one of dragoons, to meet Douglas on
his descent from the mountains. At Jones's Ford,
on Staunton river, I encountered him, when about
half his force had crossed over. I attacked him
immediately; and, after a sharp conflict, drove him
across the river. By the advice of Col. Mason, I
left the artillery and draggons on the north bank, to
protect our rear, placing them under the command
of that distinguished officer.
Pressing hard upon the rear of the enemy, we
came up with him just as he had fallen back on the
reserve. Here he rallied, and the fight was renewed.
I regret to say that, at the first fire, my horse fell
under me, imprisoning my leg by his fall. At the
same moment a ball struck my head, and I came to
the ground insensible.
You will judge my astonishment, when, on
recovering
my senses, I found that all my men near
me had thrown down their arms, and that I was in
the hands of the enemy, who assisted me to rise. I
immediately called to my men to resume their arms;
but am sorry to inform you that I was not obeyed.
As I had not surrendered, I was seized and hurried
away to the house of a ring-leader of these rebels,
where I was confined. From that time I had no
means of receiving any information on which I could
rely concerning the events of the day, as I had no
intercourse with any but the rebels.
Two days ago I was so fortunate as to make my
escape. Returning to this place, I find my camp,
which had been left under the command of Major
Wood, beleaguered by the rebels, and a treaty for
surrender in full progress. I rejoice that I have
returned in time to prevent a consummation so
disgraceful
.
It is now midnight, and a small party has been
sent out to endeavor to surprise the leader of this
banditti. In the meantime all things are put in
readiness for a sortie in the morning. I shall not
close my letter until I can give some farther account
of the success of these operations.
Two o'clock, A. M.
My scouts have come in,
and brought in the hostile chief, who proves to be
the last man in the world whom I could have wished
to find in arms against the generous master who so
well deserved his grateful devotion. I speak of that
unfortunate youth, whose fault, (I must not use a
harsher term,) nearly twelve months ago, dishonored
our common name and parentage. Your Excellency
will appreciate the struggle in my bosom, between
a sense of duty and the foolish but inextinguishable
relentings of nature. I have determined to put an
end to this painful strife, and to take security against
my own weakness, by sending him on immediately
to you, without awaiting the result of the meditated
sortie in the morning. He therefore travels in
custody
of the bearer of this letter, under guard of a
sergeant and four men.
Having returned to the camp this night, after
tattoo, I am unprepared to give any account of our
loss, or that of the enemy. I have nothing authentic
but the lamented death of Col. Mason, who fell
fighting bravely.
I beg leave to express an humble hope, that your
Excellency will be pleased to attribute the partial
failure of my enterprise to the unfortunate wound
which put me
hors du combat
, at a moment, up to
which we had successfully driven the enemy before
us for nearly half a mile and across the river.
I remain, sir, with the most profound respect,
your Excellency's most humble and faithful servant,
Owen Trevor
, Col. 18th Inf.